


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Dynamic Global Bond Fund (RPIEX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Dynamic Global Bond Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				RPIEX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments



			
			 	 Formerly T. Rowe Price Global Unconstrained Bond Fund
			 	 				 	 
			
		







 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/21/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$9.85
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.02
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/21/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								-1.89%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$9.78
							
							-
							
								$10.22
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$358.54

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 05/31/2017



Overall

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


3 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


5 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


10 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						




				Morningstar rated the Dynamic Global Bond Fund among 
N/A,
N/A,
N/A
and 
N/A
Nontraditional Bond
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 05/31/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The objective is to seek high current income.
		
30-Day Yield2 



Annualized Dividend
							
								as of 
								 
									(07/21/2017)
								
							



						
						
							0.62%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/ Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							2.19%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/o Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							2.10%
						
					


Average Annual Total Returns 3



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					0.20%
				
			

				
					0.20%
				
			


3 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


5 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


10 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 2.76%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							2.76%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							January 22, 2015
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						1.16%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.65%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						Contractual
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
					
						
							April 30, 2019
						
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, yield and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   
			



2 The 30-day dividend yield represents the average daily dividends for the 
30-day period, annualized and divided by the net asset values per share 
at the end of the period; it is available the first quarter after the 
fund's inception.  The SEC standardized yield is computed under an SEC 
standardized formula and reflects an estimated yield to maturity 
(assuming all portfolio securities are held to maturity); it is 
available the first month after the fund's inception.  
			

3
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Sun Jul 23 03:02:47 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund





















404 Page Not Found















Page Not Found




We apologize for any inconvenience, but we are unable to locate the page you requested. 
                                This could be due to either of the reasons below: 


                                    If you manually entered the URL, please make sure it is correct. 
                                    Check that the capitalization matches, that all words are spelled correctly, 
                                    and that all the punctuation, like periods (.) and slashes (/) are correctly placed. 
                                    Be sure that you are using the forward slash (/) and not the backward slash (\). 
                                    Remember, there are no spaces in URLs.
                                

                                    If you have bookmarked this page, this page may have been renamed, moved, or deleted. 
                                    Please return to our homepage, and reset your bookmarks.
                                












Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services | T. Rowe Price





















 










>
	




Home
Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services












Introducing T. Rowe Price® 
ActivePlus Portfolios.
Save time with a diversified portfolio-powered by our experts.



		                    Get Started
		                    
		                












My Account   





Remember User Name

Log In

Log In



Forgot user name


Register for online access 




Open an Account






















Mutual Funds









We offer over 120 no-load mutual funds to address your specific investing needs.











                        See All Mutual Funds
                    

















Rollover IRAs









Changing jobs or planning for retirement? Our specialists make rolling over your 401(k) account easy.











                        Learn More
                    

















IRA









Plan for retirement with the help of a Roth IRA or Traditional IRA.











                        Learn More
                    

















            
                
                    
                    See all Products and Services
                    
                         


















Find low-cost mutual funds to help you achieve your financial goals.












Search Mutual Funds
























129







No-Load Mutual Funds
Providing a broad set of opportunities



















Historical Performance





Daily Prices





Download a Prospectus
















Mutual Fund Categories





We offer a full range of investment strategies across multiple asset classes, capitalizations, sectors, and styles.







Fund Type
Number Available
Stock Funds
54
Asset Allocation Funds
34
Money Market Funds
8
Target Date Funds
26
Bond Funds
36






















            
                
                    
                    See all Mutual Funds
                    
                         


















Over 80% of our mutual funds beat their 10-year Lipper average as of 3/31/17*











            
                
                    
                    Learn More
                    
                         















T. Rowe Price Insights®





Access our latest investment thinking, information on retirement planning, and perspectives on the markets.







Asset Allocation





An Inside Look at T. Rowe Price® ActivePlus Portfolios

July 13, 2017









Retirement Planning





6 Key Ingredients for Retirement Planning

July 10, 2017









Markets & Economy





Quarterly Market Review

June 30, 2017













            
                
                    
                    See all Articles
                    
                         




















Ready to Get Started?







                        Open an Account
                    










Or Call 1-888-285-2612





















View firm's background on FINRA's BrokerCheck
T. Rowe Price mutual funds are subject to ongoing management fees and may be subject to redemption fees. An IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when an IRA is closed. See prospectus for details.

The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
*144 of our 330 mutual funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes and excludes funds used in insurance products). 122 of these 144 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 204 of 311 (66%), 175 of 213, 140 of 178 (79%), of T. Rowe Price funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
24 of our 39 Retirement Funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes). 23 of these 24 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 38 of 39, 35 of 36, and 35 of 36 of the Retirement Funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
Source: Lipper Inc. 168 of 213 funds (excluding institutional and bank institutional funds as defined by Lipper) more than 6 months old had expense ratios below their Lipper averages based on fiscal year-end data available as of 3/31/17.
The principal value of the Retirement Funds is not guaranteed at any time, including at or after the target date, which is the approximate year an investor plans to retire (assumed to be age 65) and likely stop making new investments in the fund. If an investor plans to retire significantly earlier or later than age 65, the funds may not be an appropriate investment even if the investor is retiring on or near the target date. The funds’ allocations among a broad range of underlying T. Rowe Price stock and bond funds will change over time. The funds emphasize potential capital appreciation during the early phases of retirement asset accumulation, balance the need for appreciation with the need for income as retirement approaches, and focus on supporting an income stream over a long-term postretirement withdrawal horizon. The funds are not designed for a lump-sum redemption at the target date and do not guarantee a particular level of income. The funds maintain a substantial allocation to equities both prior to and after the target date, which can result in greater volatility over shorter time horizons.















x


You are using an unsupported browser version that might prevent you from accessing certain features on our site.
 
We suggest clicking an icon below to download a supported browser version.
 
 

Google Chrome
Mozilla Firefox
Internet Explorer
Safari















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now




































	CEF Types & Strategies: Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt Funds | Nuveen















































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us















			Strategies



MF
CEF
SMA
ETF
COM
UIT



CEF




Overview
Taxable Income
Tax-Exempt Income
Multi-Strategy
Equity










			Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt Funds
			


		About Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt

		Tax-exempt municipal bonds are debt issued by a state, city, or other municipality for general governmental needs or to finance special
		projects. These municipal bonds pay interest that is free from regular federal income tax, and state-specific bonds can provide residents
		of those states with income free from state and, in some cases, local income taxes as well.* Tax-exempt municipal bonds can be an
		advantageous alternative to taxable investments, particularly for investors in higher tax brackets. To make a fair comparison between
		a tax-free investment like a municipal bond and a taxable investment, one should adjust the tax-free investment's yield to account
		for money saved in regular federal, and sometimes state, income tax.
	

* Interest on out-of-state bonds and dividends paid by national funds may be subject to state and local taxes. Income may also be
			subject to the Alternative Minimum Tax.



				About Nuveen Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt Closed-End Funds

				Nuveen offers several national tax-exempt municipal bond closed-end funds, and as well as state-specific funds focusing 15 different states. Municipal Closed-End
				Funds can potentially help you balance your desire for income and growth by:

Meeting current expenses with monthly tax-free income;
Potentially realizing attractive, long-term, after-tax total returns;
Diversifying your income portfolio;
Reducing the amount of your investment income subject to taxes.


				The Tax-Free Advantage






						Tax-Free Yield
					






						4%
					

						5%
					

						6%
					

						7%
					

						8%
					





Tax Rate


Taxable Equivalent Yield




						25%
					

						5.33%
					

						6.67%
					

						8.00%
					

						9.33%
					

						10.67%
					



						28%
					

						5.56%
					

						6.94%
					

						8.33%
					

						9.72%
					

						11.11%
					



						33%
					

						5.97%
					

						7.46%
					

						8.96%
					

						10.45%
					

						11.94%
					



						35%
					

						6.15%
					

						7.69%
					

						9.23%
					

						10.77%
					

						12.31%
					



						39.6%
					

						6.62%
					

						8.28%
					

						9.93%
					

						11.59%
					

						13.25%
					



				You can see you would need to earn much more from a taxable investment to match a municipal bond's after-tax yield. For instance,
				if your fund is yielding 5.00% tax-free and your tax rate is
				28%, you would need a taxable investment to yield 6.94% to match the same after-tax cash flow. 
			

This chart is for illustrative purposes only and is not intended to reflect past or predict future performance 
				for any particular investment. They do not take into account the effects of the federal alternative minimum tax (AMT) 
				or capital gains taxes.  This information is general in nature and should not be considered tax advice.  
				Nuveen is not a tax advisor and investors should consult with a qualified tax consultant as to their particular 
				situation.






						Investor Profile

						Are these CEFs right for you?

						The features and investment objectives of these funds might be especially appealing to investors seeking:


							Potential for attractive, monthly tax-free income

							Diversification of a portfolio otherwise comprised of taxable fixed-income
							and equity securities

							Reduction of the amount of investment income subject to taxes.


						What are potential risks?


							Municipal bond fund income may be subject to state and local income taxes and the alternative minimum tax. Capital gains, if any, will
							be subject to capital gains tax.

							Municipal bonds are subject to interest rate risk, or the risk
							that the bonds will decline in value because of changes in market interest rates.

							Municipal bonds are also subject to call risk, and credit risk.









			Nuveen's Municipal Bond Closed-End Funds


Select a national fund...
Nuveen Quality Municipal Income Fund-NAD
Nuveen Municipal Credit Income Fund-NZF
Nuveen Enhanced Municipal Value Fund-NEV
Nuveen Intermediate Duration Municipal Term Fund-NID
Nuveen Intermediate Duration Quality Municipal Term Fund-NIQ
Nuveen Municipal 2021 Target Term Fund-NHA
Nuveen Municipal High Income Opportunity Fund-NMZ
Nuveen AMT-Free Municipal Credit Income Fund-NVG
Nuveen AMT-Free Quality Municipal Income Fund-NEA
Nuveen Municipal Value Fund, Inc.-NUV
Nuveen Municipal Income Fund, Inc.-NMI
Nuveen Select Tax-Free Income Portfolio-NXP
Nuveen Select Tax-Free Income Portfolio 2-NXQ
Nuveen Select Tax-Free Income Portfolio 3-NXR
Nuveen Select Maturities Municipal Fund-NIM
Nuveen AMT-Free Municipal Value Fund-NUW




Select a state fund...
Nuveen Arizona Quality Municipal Income Fund-NAZ
Nuveen California Quality Municipal Income Fund-NAC
Nuveen California AMT-Free Quality Municipal Income Fund-NKX
Nuveen California Municipal Value Fund, Inc.-NCA
Nuveen California Select Tax-Free Income Portfolio-NXC
Nuveen California Municipal Value Fund 2-NCB
Nuveen Connecticut Quality Municipal Income Fund-NTC
Nuveen Georgia Quality Municipal Income Fund-NKG
Nuveen Maryland Quality Municipal Income Fund-NMY
Nuveen Massachusetts Quality Municipal Income Fund-NMT
Nuveen Michigan Quality Municipal Income Fund-NUM
Nuveen Minnesota Quality Municipal Income Fund-NMS
Nuveen Missouri Quality Municipal Income Fund-NOM
Nuveen New Jersey Quality Municipal Income Fund-NXJ
Nuveen New Jersey Municipal Value Fund-NJV
Nuveen New York Quality Municipal Income Fund-NAN
Nuveen New York AMT-Free Quality Municipal Income Fund-NRK
Nuveen New York Municipal Value Fund, Inc.-NNY
Nuveen New York Select Tax-Free Income Portfolio-NXN
Nuveen New York Municipal Value Fund 2-NYV
Nuveen North Carolina Quality Municipal Income Fund-NNC
Nuveen Ohio Quality Municipal Income Fund-NUO
Nuveen Pennsylvania Quality Municipal Income Fund-NQP
Nuveen Pennsylvania Municipal Value Fund-NPN
Nuveen Texas Quality Municipal Income Fund-NTX
Nuveen Virginia Quality Municipal Income Fund-NPV
























Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE







See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.

	14831-INV-AN-03/17




















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds




















	CEF Types & Strategies | Nuveen














































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us













Strategies


MF
CEF
SMA
ETF
COM
UIT



CEF




Overview
Taxable Income
Tax-Exempt Income
Multi-Strategy
Equity









CEF Types & Strategies

Find out more about the types of closed-end funds we offer and their investment
			strategies using the chart below.





Multi-Strategy



				 

Global Debt

Equity Option



Preferred Securities

MBS

Global Equity



Floating Rate

MLPs

Domestic Equity



Municipal Debt

REITs

				 





Chart Definitions
Income-oriented closed-end funds make payouts largely from interest	and dividends.
Income and capital appreciation funds seek regular cash	flow made up of interest and dividends, with the remainder from capital appreciation or, if necessary, return of capital.
Capital appreciation and income closed-end funds seek cash flow mainly from capital appreciation.
Single-asset-class funds invest primarily in one asset class, which can be used as components in a well-diversified income portfolio.
Pre-packaged combinations are funds featuring multiple asset types, which are designed to work together to diversify fund cash flow risks.






















Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE







See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.




















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds





















	Page Not Found | Nuveen Investments































Nuveen Investments













Page Not Found

The page you are trying to reach is unavailable.
Please visit the Nuveen.com Home page or try to find the page you are looking for with the search page.


Additional Starting Pages
In addition to the Nuveen.com Home page, there are several other locations on the site from which to start.


Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts




Literature Center
Featured Commentary
Videos
Retirement Solutions
Knowledge Center















Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









Before investing, carefully consider fund investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. For this and other information that should be read carefully, please view the prospectus or summary prospectus.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE







See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.












	Income Investing | CEF | Nuveen



















































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us


































Closed the Income Gap®
with Nuveen Closed-End Funds



Closed-End Funds Offer Attractive Income Potential
In the search for increased income opportunities, closed-end funds can be a smart choice. Designed and built for income, closed-end funds seek to provide regular, stable cash flow over time and can serve as a compelling tool for optimizing an income portfolio.
Consider closed-end funds if you’re seeking to:1


1


Enhance Income and Cash Flow
Because of their unique closed structure and ability to use leverage,2 closed-end funds offer potentially higher distributions3 than traditional income investments.4


2


Manage Interest Rate Risk 
Floating rate, shorter duration or equity closed-end funds may help reduce a portfolio’s interest rate sensitivity.


3


Protect Purchasing Power
Closed-end funds that invest in real assets and dividend-paying stocks, which typically increase their payments with rising inflation, may help buffer the effects of rising inflation.


4


Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Nuveen offers a wide array of national, state specific and AMT-free municipal closed-end funds that may help reduce your tax liability on investment income.5


5


Improve Diversification
With strategies that provide access to specialized asset classes, including alternatives, Nuveen closed-end funds may enhance portfolio diversification.





Additional Resources



How Do CEFs Compare? 


Additional Advisor Resources










What is a Closed-End Fund?
Anne KritzmireClosed-End Fund & Structured Products










Consider Nuveen closed-end funds if you’re seeking1



Fund Name
Ticker
Leveraged?
Primary Investment Focus 
Enhance Income
Manage Interest Rate Risk
Protect Purchasing Power
Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Improve Diversification 




Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt


Nuveen Quality Municipal Income Fund
NAD
•
Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen AMT-Free Municipal Credit Income Fund
NVG
•
AMT-Free, Hybrid Investment Grade/High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal Value Fund, Inc.
NUV

Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal High Income Opportunity Fund
NMZ
•
High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•





Taxable Debt


Nuveen Credit Strategies Income Fund
JQC
•
Senior Loans
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Mortgage Opportunity Term Fund
JLS
•
Mortgage-Backed Securities
•
•


•


Nuveen Preferred Securities Income Fund
JPS
•
Preferred Securities
•






Nuveen Global High Income Fund
JGH
•
Global High Yield Securities
•
•


•




Equity


Nuveen Real Asset Income and Growth Fund
JRI
•
Real Assets
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Tax-Advantaged Total Return Strategy Fund
JTA
•
Equity-Global
•
•
•

•


Nuveen S&P 500 Buy-Write Income Fund
BXMX

Equity-Option
•
•

•
•








There is no guarantee that any of the funds will achieve their stated objectives. For detailed information on the specific risks associated with each fund, please view the fund overview by clicking on the fund name above.
1 Goal classifications represent common investor concerns when evaluating portfolio needs, are provided for informational purposes only, and are not intended to be relied upon as investment advice or recommendations.
2 Leverage typically magnifies the total return of a fund’s portfolio, whether that return is positive or negative, and creates an opportunity for increased common share net income as well as higher volatility of net asset value, market price, and distributions. There is no assurance that a fund’s leveraging strategy will be successful.
3 Potential distribution sources include net investment income, realized gains and return of capital.  
4 Different types of asset investments have different types of risks, which may provide higher returns but also greater volatility. In general, equity securities tend to be more volatile that fixed income securities. The value of, and income generated by, debt securities will decrease or increase based on changes in market interest rates. As interest rates risk, bond prices fall. In general, below investment grade (high-yield) debt securities tend to be more volatile than investment grade securities. Preferred securities are subordinated to bonds and other debt instruments in a company's capital structure, and therefore are subject to greater credit risk. The interest and principal payments of U.S. Treasury securities are guaranteed.
5 Income may be subject to state and local income taxes and the alternative minimum tax. Capital gains, if any, will be subject to capital gains tax.














Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE









See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.
21247-INV-Y-03/17



















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds




















	Closed-End Funds Video Library - Nuveen Investments | Nuveen









































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us















			Video Library



Economic & Market
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds







Closed-End Funds



Featured video





Building Income. Building America. 
Highlights of NUV’s thirty-year legacy. Since its IPO in June 1987 – the largest in the history of the NYSE at the time – the fund has given its shareholders opportunities for regular income and to help build vital infrastructure across the country.




More videos






Investing across the Capital Structure
Susi Budiman, CFA
						Fixed Income Portfolio Manager
						October 2016
						




What is a Closed-End Fund?
Anne Kritzmire
						Closed-End Fund & Structured Products
						




The Use of Leverage in Closed-End Funds
Anne Kritzmire
						Closed-End Fund & Structured Products
						




Closed-End Funds are Designed for Cash Flow
Anne Kritzmire
						Closed-End Fund & Structured Products
						




Exchange-Traded Access to Closed-End Funds
Anne Kritzmire
						Closed-End Fund & Structured Products
						




Closed-End Fund Premiums and Discounts
Anne Kritzmire
						Closed-End Fund & Structured Products
						




Understanding Return of Capital
Anne Kritzmire
						Closed-End Fund & Structured Products
						




Distribution Approaches in Closed-End Funds
Anne Kritzmire
						Closed-End Fund & Structured Products
						




4 Key Concepts for Understanding Closed-End Funds
Anne Kritzmire
						Closed-End Fund & Structured Products
						




The information provided is not a complete analysis of every market, industry, sector, or security discussed. The statements included are the views and opinions of the speaker as of the date specified, and these views may change as subsequent market conditions arise, and may also differ from other Nuveen associates or affiliates. A speaker’s assessment of a particular security, investment or strategy is not intended as a forecast, research, or recommendation to buy or sell any security. Videos and webcasts are current as of the date they were recorded and have not been updated since that time. The content may not reflect the current views of the featured speaker and may not reflect recent market activity.
No part of this material may be reproduced in any form, or referred to in any other publication, without express written permission.
Closed end funds are subject to market risk,  including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.


















Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE









See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.







		23830-INV-AN-03/18
	













Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

















































































American Funds



































































































All Funds | American Funds


























HOME



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





FINANCIAL ADVISORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets













Contact Us
Preferences
Preferences


Log in / Register
Log out



American Funds Advisor ID

Log in to the Advisor Website


Register





Log out



Client Accounts (DST Vision ID)

Log in to Client Accounts



Log out





















Your Regional eWholesaler 



Schedule Meeting
Email
Call





Your Regional eWholesaler 



View LinkedIn Profile










Schedule
Schedule a phone meeting.





Call






Email
                    Receive a response within 24 hours
		    	









CLOSE X



Welcome!

						I'm , your regional contact at American Funds.  As you browse the site, you'll see that every page gives you the opportunity to email, call, or schedule a meeting with me. I look forward to answering your questions, discussing ideas, and helping you get the most out of the full range of American Funds products and services.  
					
OK, GOT IT!


















Forms & Literature


Search




















CLIENT
ACCOUNTS






										CLIENT ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








AMERICAN FUNDS ACCOUNTS





Dashboard / Client List


Recent Transactions
















Account Forms & Guidelines










PARTNER SITES









DST Vision A link to DST Vision is available on the Client Accounts page. 





PlanPremier®-Bundled PartnerLink®


PlanPremier®-TPA PartnerLink®









Recently Viewed Accounts

You must log in to access recently viewed accounts.

Log in to Client Accounts


You have no recently viewed accounts.














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Download Fund Data


Fund Literature


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs










MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Share Class Cost Comparison Calculator










OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products & Solutions





Target Date Retirement Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Insurance Series
































PRODUCTS & 
SOLUTIONS






										PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS
									
										
										See All

Close x







SOLUTIONS FOR:





Defined Contribution
Learn about retirement solutions that encourage favorable participant outcomes.



















Portfolio Construction
Find out how American Funds builds models and portfolios to meet the real-world needs of investors.






















Fixed Income
Learn about our fixed income strategies and how they pursue durable outcomes for investors.






















Retirement Income
Learn strategies that address a retiree’s withdrawal and longevity needs.













Investment Options





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Model Portfolios


Model Portfolios - ASR View



















Target Date Retirement Series


College Target Date Series


Portfolio Series


Retirement Income Portfolio Series













Retirement





401(k)/403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs


Traditional/Roth IRAs










College Savings





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts














 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















read















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















read












CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary


Defined Contribution Insights










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global


Innovation










  





International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Municipal Bonds


Portfolio Construction


Target Date


Taxable Bonds


United States














TOOLS & PRACTICE 
MANAGEMENT






										TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT
									
										
										See All

Close x







PLANNING TOOLS





Hypotheticals


Portfolio Resources


Portfolio Analyzer


Price-It Tool: Preliminary Fee Quote


Retirement Plan Cost Comparison Tool


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs






MORE PLANNING TOOLS






Capital Group Policy Spotlight






CLIENT CONVERSATIONS





Investing Basics


Investment Planning


College Savings


Individual Retirement Planning


Market Fluctuations






MORE CLIENT CONVERSATIONS






HOW-TO GUIDES









Client Servicing





Deliver More Effective Retirement Plan Reviews




 


Conduct a Portfolio Review










Business Development





Build Your IRA Business




 


Lead an Enrollment Meeting






MORE HOW-TO GUIDES










SERVICE
CENTER






										SERVICE CENTER
									
										
										See All

Close x







CURRENT












IRA BENEFICIARY REPORT See which clients haven’t designated a beneficiary or made an update in at least five years. 






LEARN MORE








SUBMIT DOCUMENTS ONLINE Any paperwork you currently fax can be submitted online. 






LEARN MORE










ACCOUNT FORMS & GUIDELINES





New Account Setup


CollegeAmerica 529


Traditional IRA


Roth IRA


SIMPLE IRA


Individual Account






More Forms & Guidelines






OTHER RESOURCES





Life Event Checklists


Tax Center


Forms & Literature










CONTACT US





Call


Mail


Submit Documents Online




























Forms & Literature











CLIENT ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS


INSIGHTS


TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT


SERVICE CENTER

































Investments


/ American Funds                                















American Funds















 ALL FUNDS


INVESTMENT TRACKER

-- FUNDS
								


COMPARE FUNDS


DOWNLOAD DATA
























Returns


			|
		

Daily Prices & Yields


			|
		

Symbols & Fund Numbers

			
|			
Literature







FILTER BY


Objective


Growth
Growth & Income
Equity-Income
Balanced
Bond
Tax-Exempt Bond
Money Market Funds
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
College Target Date
Retirement Target Date





Or



Asset Type 
					


Equity
Balanced
Fixed Income Taxable
Fixed Income tax exempt
Money Market







Investment Tracker
--
 Funds


					Add American Funds to your Investment Tracker by checking boxes below and choosing the Add To Tracker link above or below the table.
				





 American Funds

		Important: Class B and 529-B shares were no longer available for purchase as of April 21, 2009. All B and 529-B shares finished converting to A and 529-A shares on April 10, 2017.
	
















Share Class 
							



A
C
F-1
F-2
F-3
529-A
529-C
529-E
529-F-1
R-1
R-2
R-2E
R-3
R-4
R-5E
R-5
R-6






Returns
								









Monthly








Quarterly










at MOP/with CDSC








at NAV














Show Indices







ADD TO TRACKER





 PRINT

















Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.















Fund Name

		Prices & Returns


		Yields
		



Price 
				
	
Change  ($)
			
	
Change  (%)
			
	
YTD
		
	

7-Day
		 SEC Yield at NAV
		
	
30-day SEC Yield NAV


12-Month Dist. Rate at NAV
		




At NAV as of -- (updated daily)
As of -- (updated monthly)








Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.















1- of  results
0 results



ADD TO TRACKER


















































































































































The Bond Fund of America - ABNDX | American Funds


























HOME



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





FINANCIAL ADVISORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets













Contact Us
Preferences
Preferences


Log in / Register
Log out



American Funds Advisor ID

Log in to the Advisor Website


Register





Log out



Client Accounts (DST Vision ID)

Log in to Client Accounts



Log out





















Your Regional eWholesaler 



Schedule Meeting
Email
Call





Your Regional eWholesaler 



View LinkedIn Profile










Schedule
Schedule a phone meeting.





Call






Email
                    Receive a response within 24 hours
		    	









CLOSE X



Welcome!

						I'm , your regional contact at American Funds.  As you browse the site, you'll see that every page gives you the opportunity to email, call, or schedule a meeting with me. I look forward to answering your questions, discussing ideas, and helping you get the most out of the full range of American Funds products and services.  
					
OK, GOT IT!


















Forms & Literature


Search




















CLIENT
ACCOUNTS






										CLIENT ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








AMERICAN FUNDS ACCOUNTS





Dashboard / Client List


Recent Transactions
















Account Forms & Guidelines










PARTNER SITES









DST Vision A link to DST Vision is available on the Client Accounts page. 





PlanPremier®-Bundled PartnerLink®


PlanPremier®-TPA PartnerLink®









Recently Viewed Accounts

You must log in to access recently viewed accounts.

Log in to Client Accounts


You have no recently viewed accounts.














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Download Fund Data


Fund Literature


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs










MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Share Class Cost Comparison Calculator










OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products & Solutions





Target Date Retirement Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Insurance Series
































PRODUCTS & 
SOLUTIONS






										PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS
									
										
										See All

Close x







SOLUTIONS FOR:





Defined Contribution
Learn about retirement solutions that encourage favorable participant outcomes.



















Portfolio Construction
Find out how American Funds builds models and portfolios to meet the real-world needs of investors.






















Fixed Income
Learn about our fixed income strategies and how they pursue durable outcomes for investors.






















Retirement Income
Learn strategies that address a retiree’s withdrawal and longevity needs.













Investment Options





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Model Portfolios


Model Portfolios - ASR View



















Target Date Retirement Series


College Target Date Series


Portfolio Series


Retirement Income Portfolio Series













Retirement





401(k)/403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs


Traditional/Roth IRAs










College Savings





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts














 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















read















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















read












CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary


Defined Contribution Insights










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global


Innovation










  





International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Municipal Bonds


Portfolio Construction


Target Date


Taxable Bonds


United States














TOOLS & PRACTICE 
MANAGEMENT






										TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT
									
										
										See All

Close x







PLANNING TOOLS





Hypotheticals


Portfolio Resources


Portfolio Analyzer


Price-It Tool: Preliminary Fee Quote


Retirement Plan Cost Comparison Tool


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs






MORE PLANNING TOOLS






Capital Group Policy Spotlight






CLIENT CONVERSATIONS





Investing Basics


Investment Planning


College Savings


Individual Retirement Planning


Market Fluctuations






MORE CLIENT CONVERSATIONS






HOW-TO GUIDES









Client Servicing





Deliver More Effective Retirement Plan Reviews




 


Conduct a Portfolio Review










Business Development





Build Your IRA Business




 


Lead an Enrollment Meeting






MORE HOW-TO GUIDES










SERVICE
CENTER






										SERVICE CENTER
									
										
										See All

Close x







CURRENT












IRA BENEFICIARY REPORT See which clients haven’t designated a beneficiary or made an update in at least five years. 






LEARN MORE








SUBMIT DOCUMENTS ONLINE Any paperwork you currently fax can be submitted online. 






LEARN MORE










ACCOUNT FORMS & GUIDELINES





New Account Setup


CollegeAmerica 529


Traditional IRA


Roth IRA


SIMPLE IRA


Individual Account






More Forms & Guidelines






OTHER RESOURCES





Life Event Checklists


Tax Center


Forms & Literature










CONTACT US





Call


Mail


Submit Documents Online




























Forms & Literature











CLIENT ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS


INSIGHTS


TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT


SERVICE CENTER

































Investments


/ The Bond Fund of America                                                ®


















BOND FUNDS


The Bond Fund of America ®
								(ABNDX)
JUMP TO A FUND 












Share Class
							


A
C
F-1
F-2
F-3
529-A
529-C
529-E
529-F-1
R-1
R-2
R-2E
R-3
R-4
R-5E
R-5
R-6





 
                                PRINT
                            
DOWNLOAD DATA

 
								ADD TO COMPARE
							

 
								ADD TO TRACKER
							












SUMMARY
RETURNS
RATINGS & RISK
HOLDINGS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
FEES & EXPENSES
RESOURCES





























Summary
		





A Core Bond Portfolio With Broad Diversification.						  
Our most diversified bond fund invests in nearly every sector of the bond market, with a focus on securities rated A or above.					





						Price at NAV 
					

$12.98					
as of 07/21/2017 (updated daily)



						Fund Assets
						(millions)
						
					

						$34,575.9
					


Portfolio Managers 
						

7					


Expense Ratio 
					

0.61%


Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet  (PDF)
					

Prospectus  (PDF)



















Returns at NAV
	




									Returns at MOP
						
	







Read important investment disclosures



0.24%
1-year return

        


2.27%
5-year return

        


3.12%
10-year return

        



1.80%	

		30-day SEC Yield (Fund at MOP)
		 
	




			Returns as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)
					. Yield as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly).

	



Read important investment disclosures



-3.51%
1-year return

        


1.49%
5-year return

        


2.73%
10-year return

        



1.80%	

		    30-day SEC Yield (Fund at MOP)
	




			Returns as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)
					. Yield as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)

	







Asset Mix
				









U.S. Equities0.0%

Non-U.S. Equities0.0%



U.S. Bonds81.3%

Non-U.S. Bonds13.3%



Cash & Equivalents5.4%





As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).









Volatility & Return
	


VIEW LARGER CHART


Read important investment disclosures


Fixed-Income



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the 
																						 fixed income   
																				  funds
		

 ABNDX
 Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index
																												   

 Other AF Funds




			Standard Deviation as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). Annualized return as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). 
		
 






Fund Statistics 
			




7.1 years
Average Life 


5.2 years
Average Duration 


3.0%
Average Yieldto Maturity 


2.9%
Average Coupon 




					% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).   
		
		







Morningstar Style BoxTM— Fixed-Income













Medium Quality


Moderate Interest-Rate Sensitivity



 Morningstar data as of 6/30/17 updated quarterly.














Description





				            Objective
				        

				            The fund's investment objective is to provide as high a level of current income as is consistent with the preservation of capital.
				        



						Distinguishing Characteristics
					

Broadly diversified fixed-income fund with flexibility to respond to various bond market conditions.					



						Types of Investments
					

Primarily invests in corporate debt securities, U.S. and other government securities, mortgage-related securities and cash.					





			             Holdings Outside the U.S.
			         

May invest up to 25% of assets in fixed-income securities of corporations and government entities outside the United States.			         



			            Maturity
			        

Typically, the fund will be invested in intermediate- to long-term securities.			        



			            Portfolio Restrictions
			        

The fund generally invests at least 80% of its assets in bonds, including corporate bonds, U.S. government securities and money market instruments. At least 60% of its assets will be invested in securities rated A3/A- or better at the time of purchase (or unrated but determined by the fund’s investment adviser to be of equivalent quality). It is the fund’s current practice not to invest more than 10% of its assets in debt securities rated Ba1 and BB+ or below.			        











Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							05/28/1974

						Fund Assets (millions) As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).

							$34,575.9

						Companies/Issuers
						Holdings are as of 12/31/2016 (updated as of most recent fiscal year-end).

							710+

						Shareholder Accounts
						Shareholder accounts are as of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).

							1,223,218

						Regular Dividends Paid
						

							Monthly



 


						Minimum Initial Investment
						
					
							$250

						Capital Gains Paid
						

							--

						Portfolio Turnover (2016)
						
					
							363%

						Fiscal Year-End
						
					
							Dec

						Prospectus Date
						
					
							04/07/2017

						CUSIP
						
					
							097873 10 3

						Fund Number
						
					
							8












        Returns
        
    






Month-End Returns as of 6/30/17


Quarter-End Returns as of 6/30/17




ANNUAL RETURNS CHART

Returns at NAV  
	
 | 
	
at MOP			



Read important investment disclosures




 ABNDX
 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index 















Growth of 10K
	



High & Low Prices
		            







Read important investment disclosures
For Class A Shares, this chart tracks a hypothetical investment with dividends reinvested through 12/31/2016.


VIEW LARGER CHART



 ABNDX
 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index  





For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for ABNDX through 07/21/2017.
            

 ABNDX




 






Yield
		







						12-month
					




						Distribution Rates
							




						30-day SEC Yield
							







Fund at NAV

1.78%					

							N/A   
					


Fund at MOP

1.71%					

1.80%					




As of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly).











Portfolio Management
	



LEARN ABOUT THE CAPITAL SYSTEMSM





 Years of Experience with Fund
 Years of Experience with Capital Group
 Years of Experience with Investment Industry



Pramod Atluri

19
1
1



Andrew F. Barth

32
32
7



David J. Betanzos

17
15
1



David A. Hoag

29
26
8



Fergus N. MacDonald

25
14
2



Robert H. Neithart

30
30
8



John H. Smet

35
34
28



A boldface number indicates that years of experience with Capital Group is equal to years of experience with investment industry.














Ratings & Risk




Morningstar Rating TM







Overall Morningstar RatingTM
Funds rated (856)










3-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(856 funds rated)










5-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(767 funds rated)










10-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(540 funds rated)











Overall Morningstar Risk 


			 Above Average

HIGH
 
 
 
LOW





Category 

					Intermediate-Term Bond
				




ADVANTAGES AND DISADVANTAGES OF MORNINGSTAR RATINGS


 Ratings are based on risk-adjusted returns as of
6/30/2017						(updated monthly).








Lipper Leader Scorecard
	

Read important investment disclosures







Overall
3 yr.
5 yr.
10 yr.


Consistent Return Within Category 
Funds Rated


(422)



(422)



(382)



(287)



Expense Within Category  Funds Rated


(128)



(128)



(124)



(102)



Preservation Within Category Funds Rated



							(5783)



(5783)



(4861)



(3179)



Tax Efficiency Within Category Funds Rated


(427)



(427)



(387)



(292)



Total Return Within Category Funds Rated


(427)



(427)



(387)



(292)





Category
Core Bond Funds







KEY

HIGHEST







LOWEST


 As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).







Risk Measures

For the 10 Years ending 6/30/17 (updated monthly). 


Fund

Standard Deviation 

4.35                        


Sharpe Ratio 

0.61                        










                            American Funds/Morningstar Benchmark 
As of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)





                            BBgBarc US Agg Bond TR USD
                        


R-squared 

56                        


Beta 

1.00                        


Capture Ratio (Downside/Upside) 
135/93










Quality Summary
					 
Read important investment disclosures






U.S. Treasuries/Agencies
28.7%


AAA/Aaa
29.7%


AA/Aa
4.2%


A
12.6%


BBB/Baa
16.5%


BB/Ba
2.0%


B
0.5%


CCC & Below
0.1%


Unrated
0.3%


Cash & equivalents
5.4%


% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).



 

Average Life Breakdown
	   





0-4.9 Years
44.5%


5-9.9 Years
40.3%


10-19.9 Years
1.5%


20-29.9 Years
8.1%


30+ Years
0.2%


% of net assets as of 06/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
 





Holdings





Bonds Breakdown 







Bond Details





Total bond holdings








Corporate bonds & notes
+
31.4%


Financials
7.6%


Health Care
5.1%


Energy
4.7%


Utilities
3.4%


Consumer discretionary
3.3%


Consumer staples
1.8%


Information technology
1.4%


Other corporate bonds & notes
1.3%


Industrials
1.1%


Telecommunication services
1%


Materials
0.7%









U.S. government & government agency bonds & notes
28.7%







Mortgage-backed obligations
+
21.9%


Agency
20.3%


Non-Agency
1.1%


Commercial
0.5%









Asset-backed obligations
9%







Non-U.S. government/agency securities
2.4%







Municipal securities
1.2%



% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).










Top Fixed-Income Issuers




U.S. Treasury

28.6%



Fannie Mae

8.3%



Freddie Mac

7.9%



Ginnie Mae

4.0%



Chase Issuance Trust

1.6%

% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).





				QUARTERLY HOLDINGS

HOLDINGS SEARCH












Geographic Breakdown 
		



Regions
					 |
							Currency Weighting  
					|
			
							Top Countries 
				










United States
81.30%


Europe
7.20%


Asia & Pacific Basin
2.40%


Other (Including Canada & Latin America)
3.70%


Cash & equivalents
5.40%



            % of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
        






Non-U.S. Dollar Denominated

2.8%
			


Japanese yen
2.3%


Mexican peso
0.1%


Euros
0.1%


Other currencies
0.3%


U.S. Dollar
97.2%


				Data as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
			










United States
81.3%


United Kingdom
1.8%


Germany
1.5%


Canada
1.1%


Japan
1.0%

% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).












Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2017
			

















2008-2017
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS

CURRENT DAILY DIVIDENDS









2017








RecordDate
CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




Daily
01/31/17
02/01/17
$0.0181691
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.76


Daily
02/28/17
03/01/17
$0.0174214
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.82


Daily
03/31/17
04/03/17
$0.0230002
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.80


Daily
04/28/17
05/01/17
$0.0202585
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.88


Daily
05/31/17
06/01/17
$0.0184525
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.95


Daily
06/30/17
07/03/17
$0.0191101
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.92






2017 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.11641176


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.11641176




				 as of 7/21/17
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00174905
07/03/2017


0.00119462
07/05/2017


0.00060210
07/06/2017


0.00067807
07/07/2017


0.00180535
07/10/2017


0.00061957
07/11/2017


0.00059981
07/12/2017


0.00062132
07/13/2017


0.00065259
07/14/2017


0.00183369
07/17/2017


0.00061809
07/18/2017


0.00060668
07/19/2017


0.00063126
07/20/2017


0.00066526
07/21/2017


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date





Daily

01/31/2017
02/01/2017








 






 











						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00174905
07/03/2017


0.00119462
07/05/2017


0.00060210
07/06/2017


0.00067807
07/07/2017


0.00180535
07/10/2017


0.00061957
07/11/2017


0.00059981
07/12/2017


0.00062132
07/13/2017


0.00065259
07/14/2017


0.00183369
07/17/2017


0.00061809
07/18/2017


0.00060668
07/19/2017


0.00063126
07/20/2017


0.00066526
07/21/2017


















Fees & Expenses





Fees
					







Annual Management Fees
0.19%


Other Expenses
0.18%


Service 12b-1
0.24%


As of each fund's most recent prospectus.







Expense Ratio



Fund
	

0.61%


Lipper 		 Core Bond
 Funds Average
	


0.81%			








Resources






			Literature for ABNDX
		




Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet
(PDF) 
05/17




Quarterly Attribution Report
(PDF) 
07/17





		Single Sheet
	
(PDF) 
02/17




Summary Prospectus
(PDF) 
04/17




Prospectus
(PDF) 
04/17




Statement of additional information
(PDF) 
04/17





		Semi-Annual Report
	
(PDF) 
08/16





		Annual Report
	
(PDF) 
02/17




Fund Highlights
(PDF) 
05/17











            About Our Funds
        





Share Class Pricing and Breakpoints 





American Funds Portfolio Resources 





Advisor’s Guide 




Dividend Calendar 
(PDF) 




Stats Update 
(PDF) 




Resource Guide 
(PDF) 













Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns shown at maximum offering price (MOP) for Class A shares reflect payment of the 3.75% maximum sales charge. 
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Funds are managed, so holdings will change.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
The portfolio managers shown are as of the fund's most recent prospectus dated 04/07/2017.
Lipper ratings for Consistent Return reflect funds’ historical risk-adjusted returns at NAV, adjusted for volatility, relative to peers. Lipper ratings for Expense reflect funds’ expense minimization relative to peers with similar load structures. Lipper ratings for Preservation reflect funds’ historical loss avoidance relative to other funds within the same asset class. Preservation ratings are relative, rather than absolute, measures, and funds named Lipper Leaders for Preservation may still experience losses periodically; those losses may be larger for equity and mixed equity funds than for fixed income funds. Lipper ratings for Tax Efficiency reflect funds’ historical success in postponing taxable distributions relative to peers. Tax Efficiency offers no benefit to investors in tax-sheltered accounts such as 401(k) plans. Lipper ratings for Total Return reflect funds’ historical total return performance relative to peers. The Lipper ratings are subject to change every month and are based on an equal-weighted average of percentile ranks for the Total Return, Consistent Return, Preservation, Tax Efficiency and Expense metrics.
  The highest 20% of funds in each classification are named Lipper Leaders for Total Return, the next 20% receive a rating of 4, the middle 20% are rated 3, the next 20% are rated 2, and the lowest 20% are rated 1. Lipper ratings are not intended to predict future results, and Lipper does not guarantee the accuracy of this information. More information is available at www.lipperleaders.com. Lipper Leader © 2017, Thomson Reuters, All Rights Reserved.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The Morningstar Rating™ for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods. Past results are not guarantee of results in future periods. Morningstar Rating is for Class A only; other classes may have different performance characteristics.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
Bond ratings, which typically range from AAA/Aaa (highest) to D (lowest), are assigned by credit rating agencies such as Standard & Poor's, Moody's and/or Fitch, as an indication of an issuer's creditworthiness. If agency ratings differ, the security will be considered to have received the highest 
  of those ratings, consistent with the fund's investment policies. Securities in the Unrated category have not been rated by a rating agency; however, the investment adviser performs its own credit analysis and assigns comparable ratings that are used for compliance with fund investment policies.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Source for Lipper expense ratio comparison: Lipper, based on front-end load funds, excluding funds of funds, for the most recent fiscal year-ends available as of 06/30/2017.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.
The SEC yield reflects the rate at which the fund is earning income on its current portfolio of securities while the distribution rate reflects the fund’s past dividends paid to shareholders. Accordingly, the fund's SEC yield and distribution rate may differ.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Except for Lipper rating information, the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate: Represents the U.S. investment-grade fixed-rate bond market.
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Currency Weighting  Short Breakdown: The fund's exposure to a specific currency before taking into consideration any forward currency contracts that may increase or decrease that currency's exposure.
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Morningstar rating: In an effort to classify funds by what they own, as well as by their prospectus objectives and styles, Morningstar developed Morningstar Categories. While the prospectus objective identifies a fund's investment goals based on the wording in the fund prospectus, the Morningstar Category identifies funds based on their actual investment styles as measured by their underlying portfolio holdings (portfolio and other statistics over the past three years).  
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
	



Read important investment disclosures

This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Bond Fund of America (ABNDX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested



 
Index 
 


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index     















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .











Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate: Represents the U.S. investment-grade fixed-rate bond market.








Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Tuesday, May 28, 1974) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1974), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Bond Fund of America (ABNDX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index
Lipper Core Bond Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns shown at maximum offering price (MOP) for Class A shares reflect payment of the 3.75% maximum sales charge. 
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate: Represents the U.S. investment-grade fixed-rate bond market.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income
 
Index 
 


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index






				Standard Deviation as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). Annualized return as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for ABNDX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.

















































































































































All Funds | American Funds


























HOME



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





FINANCIAL ADVISORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets













Contact Us
Preferences
Preferences


Log in / Register
Log out



American Funds Advisor ID

Log in to the Advisor Website


Register





Log out



Client Accounts (DST Vision ID)

Log in to Client Accounts



Log out





















Your Regional eWholesaler 



Schedule Meeting
Email
Call





Your Regional eWholesaler 



View LinkedIn Profile










Schedule
Schedule a phone meeting.





Call






Email
                    Receive a response within 24 hours
		    	









CLOSE X



Welcome!

						I'm , your regional contact at American Funds.  As you browse the site, you'll see that every page gives you the opportunity to email, call, or schedule a meeting with me. I look forward to answering your questions, discussing ideas, and helping you get the most out of the full range of American Funds products and services.  
					
OK, GOT IT!


















Forms & Literature


Search




















CLIENT
ACCOUNTS






										CLIENT ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








AMERICAN FUNDS ACCOUNTS





Dashboard / Client List


Recent Transactions
















Account Forms & Guidelines










PARTNER SITES









DST Vision A link to DST Vision is available on the Client Accounts page. 





PlanPremier®-Bundled PartnerLink®


PlanPremier®-TPA PartnerLink®









Recently Viewed Accounts

You must log in to access recently viewed accounts.

Log in to Client Accounts


You have no recently viewed accounts.














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Download Fund Data


Fund Literature


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs










MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Share Class Cost Comparison Calculator










OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products & Solutions





Target Date Retirement Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Insurance Series
































PRODUCTS & 
SOLUTIONS






										PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS
									
										
										See All

Close x







SOLUTIONS FOR:





Defined Contribution
Learn about retirement solutions that encourage favorable participant outcomes.



















Portfolio Construction
Find out how American Funds builds models and portfolios to meet the real-world needs of investors.






















Fixed Income
Learn about our fixed income strategies and how they pursue durable outcomes for investors.






















Retirement Income
Learn strategies that address a retiree’s withdrawal and longevity needs.













Investment Options





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Model Portfolios


Model Portfolios - ASR View



















Target Date Retirement Series


College Target Date Series


Portfolio Series


Retirement Income Portfolio Series













Retirement





401(k)/403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs


Traditional/Roth IRAs










College Savings





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts














 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















read















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















read












CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary


Defined Contribution Insights










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global


Innovation










  





International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Municipal Bonds


Portfolio Construction


Target Date


Taxable Bonds


United States














TOOLS & PRACTICE 
MANAGEMENT






										TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT
									
										
										See All

Close x







PLANNING TOOLS





Hypotheticals


Portfolio Resources


Portfolio Analyzer


Price-It Tool: Preliminary Fee Quote


Retirement Plan Cost Comparison Tool


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs






MORE PLANNING TOOLS






Capital Group Policy Spotlight






CLIENT CONVERSATIONS





Investing Basics


Investment Planning


College Savings


Individual Retirement Planning


Market Fluctuations






MORE CLIENT CONVERSATIONS






HOW-TO GUIDES









Client Servicing





Deliver More Effective Retirement Plan Reviews




 


Conduct a Portfolio Review










Business Development





Build Your IRA Business




 


Lead an Enrollment Meeting






MORE HOW-TO GUIDES










SERVICE
CENTER






										SERVICE CENTER
									
										
										See All

Close x







CURRENT












IRA BENEFICIARY REPORT See which clients haven’t designated a beneficiary or made an update in at least five years. 






LEARN MORE








SUBMIT DOCUMENTS ONLINE Any paperwork you currently fax can be submitted online. 






LEARN MORE










ACCOUNT FORMS & GUIDELINES





New Account Setup


CollegeAmerica 529


Traditional IRA


Roth IRA


SIMPLE IRA


Individual Account






More Forms & Guidelines






OTHER RESOURCES





Life Event Checklists


Tax Center


Forms & Literature










CONTACT US





Call


Mail


Submit Documents Online




























Forms & Literature











CLIENT ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS


INSIGHTS


TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT


SERVICE CENTER

































Investments


/ American Funds                                















American Funds















 ALL FUNDS


INVESTMENT TRACKER

-- FUNDS
								


COMPARE FUNDS


DOWNLOAD DATA
























Returns


			|
		

Daily Prices & Yields


			|
		

Symbols & Fund Numbers

			
|			
Literature







FILTER BY


Objective


Growth
Growth & Income
Equity-Income
Balanced
Bond
Tax-Exempt Bond
Money Market Funds
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
College Target Date
Retirement Target Date





Or



Asset Type 
					


Equity
Balanced
Fixed Income Taxable
Fixed Income tax exempt
Money Market







Investment Tracker
--
 Funds


					Add American Funds to your Investment Tracker by checking boxes below and choosing the Add To Tracker link above or below the table.
				





 American Funds

		Important: Class B and 529-B shares were no longer available for purchase as of April 21, 2009. All B and 529-B shares finished converting to A and 529-A shares on April 10, 2017.
	
















Share Class 
							



A
C
F-1
F-2
F-3
529-A
529-C
529-E
529-F-1
R-1
R-2
R-2E
R-3
R-4
R-5E
R-5
R-6






Returns
								









Monthly








Quarterly










at MOP/with CDSC








at NAV














Show Indices







ADD TO TRACKER





 PRINT

















Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.















Fund Name

		Prices & Returns


		Yields
		



Price 
				
	
Change  ($)
			
	
Change  (%)
			
	
YTD
		
	

7-Day
		 SEC Yield at NAV
		
	
30-day SEC Yield NAV


12-Month Dist. Rate at NAV
		




At NAV as of -- (updated daily)
As of -- (updated monthly)








Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.















1- of  results
0 results



ADD TO TRACKER


















































































































































American High-Income Trust - AHITX | American Funds


























HOME



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





FINANCIAL ADVISORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets













Contact Us
Preferences
Preferences


Log in / Register
Log out



American Funds Advisor ID

Log in to the Advisor Website


Register





Log out



Client Accounts (DST Vision ID)

Log in to Client Accounts



Log out





















Your Regional eWholesaler 



Schedule Meeting
Email
Call





Your Regional eWholesaler 



View LinkedIn Profile










Schedule
Schedule a phone meeting.





Call






Email
                    Receive a response within 24 hours
		    	









CLOSE X



Welcome!

						I'm , your regional contact at American Funds.  As you browse the site, you'll see that every page gives you the opportunity to email, call, or schedule a meeting with me. I look forward to answering your questions, discussing ideas, and helping you get the most out of the full range of American Funds products and services.  
					
OK, GOT IT!


















Forms & Literature


Search




















CLIENT
ACCOUNTS






										CLIENT ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








AMERICAN FUNDS ACCOUNTS





Dashboard / Client List


Recent Transactions
















Account Forms & Guidelines










PARTNER SITES









DST Vision A link to DST Vision is available on the Client Accounts page. 





PlanPremier®-Bundled PartnerLink®


PlanPremier®-TPA PartnerLink®









Recently Viewed Accounts

You must log in to access recently viewed accounts.

Log in to Client Accounts


You have no recently viewed accounts.














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Download Fund Data


Fund Literature


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs










MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Share Class Cost Comparison Calculator










OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products & Solutions





Target Date Retirement Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Insurance Series
































PRODUCTS & 
SOLUTIONS






										PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS
									
										
										See All

Close x







SOLUTIONS FOR:





Defined Contribution
Learn about retirement solutions that encourage favorable participant outcomes.



















Portfolio Construction
Find out how American Funds builds models and portfolios to meet the real-world needs of investors.






















Fixed Income
Learn about our fixed income strategies and how they pursue durable outcomes for investors.






















Retirement Income
Learn strategies that address a retiree’s withdrawal and longevity needs.













Investment Options





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Model Portfolios


Model Portfolios - ASR View



















Target Date Retirement Series


College Target Date Series


Portfolio Series


Retirement Income Portfolio Series













Retirement





401(k)/403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs


Traditional/Roth IRAs










College Savings





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts














 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















read















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















read












CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary


Defined Contribution Insights










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global


Innovation










  





International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Municipal Bonds


Portfolio Construction


Target Date


Taxable Bonds


United States














TOOLS & PRACTICE 
MANAGEMENT






										TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT
									
										
										See All

Close x







PLANNING TOOLS





Hypotheticals


Portfolio Resources


Portfolio Analyzer


Price-It Tool: Preliminary Fee Quote


Retirement Plan Cost Comparison Tool


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs






MORE PLANNING TOOLS






Capital Group Policy Spotlight






CLIENT CONVERSATIONS





Investing Basics


Investment Planning


College Savings


Individual Retirement Planning


Market Fluctuations






MORE CLIENT CONVERSATIONS






HOW-TO GUIDES









Client Servicing





Deliver More Effective Retirement Plan Reviews




 


Conduct a Portfolio Review










Business Development





Build Your IRA Business




 


Lead an Enrollment Meeting






MORE HOW-TO GUIDES










SERVICE
CENTER






										SERVICE CENTER
									
										
										See All

Close x







CURRENT












IRA BENEFICIARY REPORT See which clients haven’t designated a beneficiary or made an update in at least five years. 






LEARN MORE








SUBMIT DOCUMENTS ONLINE Any paperwork you currently fax can be submitted online. 






LEARN MORE










ACCOUNT FORMS & GUIDELINES





New Account Setup


CollegeAmerica 529


Traditional IRA


Roth IRA


SIMPLE IRA


Individual Account






More Forms & Guidelines






OTHER RESOURCES





Life Event Checklists


Tax Center


Forms & Literature










CONTACT US





Call


Mail


Submit Documents Online




























Forms & Literature











CLIENT ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS


INSIGHTS


TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT


SERVICE CENTER

































Investments


/ American High-Income Trust                                                ®


















BOND FUNDS


American High-Income Trust ®
								(AHITX)
JUMP TO A FUND 












Share Class
							


A
C
F-1
F-2
F-3
529-A
529-C
529-E
529-F-1
R-1
R-2
R-2E
R-3
R-4
R-5E
R-5
R-6





 
                                PRINT
                            
DOWNLOAD DATA

 
								ADD TO COMPARE
							

 
								ADD TO TRACKER
							












SUMMARY
RETURNS
RATINGS & RISK
HOLDINGS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
FEES & EXPENSES
RESOURCES





























Summary
		





A well-researched approach to high-yield investing.						  
Holds carefully researched, higher yielding, lower rated bonds with the potential for capital appreciation as company and economic fundamentals improve. More correlated with stocks than bonds.					





						Price at NAV 
					

$10.49					
as of 07/21/2017 (updated daily)



						Fund Assets
						(millions)
						
					

						$17,382.2
					


Portfolio Managers 
						

4					


Expense Ratio 
					

0.71%


Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet  (PDF)
					

Prospectus  (PDF)



















Returns at NAV
	




									Returns at MOP
						
	







Read important investment disclosures



11.74%
1-year return

        


5.36%
5-year return

        


5.48%
10-year return

        



3.79%	

		30-day SEC Yield (Fund at MOP)
		 
	




			Returns as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)
					. Yield as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly).

	



Read important investment disclosures



7.59%
1-year return

        


4.57%
5-year return

        


5.08%
10-year return

        



3.79%	

		    30-day SEC Yield (Fund at MOP)
	




			Returns as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)
					. Yield as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)

	







Asset Mix
				









U.S. Equities1.4%

Non-U.S. Equities0.4%



U.S. Bonds76.1%

Non-U.S. Bonds16.8%



Cash & Equivalents5.3%





As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).









Volatility & Return
	


VIEW LARGER CHART


Read important investment disclosures


Fixed-Income



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the 
																						 fixed income   
																				  funds
		

 AHITX
 Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index
																												   

 Other AF Funds




			Standard Deviation as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). Annualized return as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). 
		
 






Fund Statistics 
			




4.1 years
Average Life 


3.3 years
Average Duration 


6.5%
Average Yieldto Maturity 


6.4%
Average Coupon 




					% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).   
		
		







Morningstar Style BoxTM— Fixed-Income













Low Quality


Limited Interest-Rate Sensitivity



 Morningstar data as of 6/30/17 updated quarterly.














Description





				            Objective
				        

				            The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income. Its secondary investment objective is capital appreciation.
				        



						Distinguishing Characteristics
					

A diversified portfolio of lower rated, higher yielding bonds. The fund's portfolio managers pay close attention to balancing the fund's high current income objective with potential principal risk when selecting securities.					



						Types of Investments
					

At least 65% of the portfolio will be invested in high-yield, lower rated bonds (Ba or BB or below at the time of purchase, or unrated, but determined by the fund’s investment adviser to be of equivalent quality) and other similar securities, including preferred stocks. Up to 25% of assets may be invested in common stocks or equity-related securities.					





			             Holdings Outside the U.S.
			         

Up to 25% of assets may be invested in securities of issuers outside the U.S., which may be denominated in currencies other than the U.S. dollar.			         



			            Maturity
			        

Typically, the fund will be invested in intermediate- to long-term securities.			        











Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							02/19/1988

						Fund Assets (millions) As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).

							$17,382.2

						Companies/Issuers
						Holdings are as of 9/30/2016 (updated as of most recent fiscal year-end).

							380+

						Shareholder Accounts
						Shareholder accounts are as of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).

							717,858

						Regular Dividends Paid
						

							Monthly



 


						Minimum Initial Investment
						
					
							$250

						Capital Gains Paid
						

							--

						Portfolio Turnover (2016)
						
					
							76%

						Fiscal Year-End
						
					
							Sep

						Prospectus Date
						
					
							04/07/2017

						CUSIP
						
					
							026547 10 9

						Fund Number
						
					
							21












        Returns
        
    






Month-End Returns as of 6/30/17


Quarter-End Returns as of 6/30/17




ANNUAL RETURNS CHART

Returns at NAV  
	
 | 
	
at MOP			



Read important investment disclosures




 AHITX
 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index 















Growth of 10K
	



High & Low Prices
		            







Read important investment disclosures
For Class A Shares, this chart tracks a hypothetical investment with dividends reinvested through 12/31/2016.


VIEW LARGER CHART



 AHITX
 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index  





For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for AHITX through 07/21/2017.
            

 AHITX




 






Yield
		







						12-month
					




						Distribution Rates
							




						30-day SEC Yield
							







Fund at NAV

5.31%					

							N/A   
					


Fund at MOP

5.11%					

3.79%					




As of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly).











Portfolio Management
	



LEARN ABOUT THE CAPITAL SYSTEMSM





 Years of Experience with Fund
 Years of Experience with Capital Group
 Years of Experience with Investment Industry



David C. Barclay

36
29
27



Tom Chow

28
2
2



David A. Daigle

23
23
13



Tara L. Torrens

14
14
2



A boldface number indicates that years of experience with Capital Group is equal to years of experience with investment industry.














Ratings & Risk




Morningstar Rating TM







Overall Morningstar RatingTM
Funds rated (590)










3-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(590 funds rated)










5-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(474 funds rated)










10-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(317 funds rated)











Overall Morningstar Risk 


			 Above Average

HIGH
 
 
 
LOW





Category 

					High Yield Bond
				




ADVANTAGES AND DISADVANTAGES OF MORNINGSTAR RATINGS


 Ratings are based on risk-adjusted returns as of
6/30/2017						(updated monthly).








Lipper Leader Scorecard
	

Read important investment disclosures







Overall
3 yr.
5 yr.
10 yr.


Consistent Return Within Category 
Funds Rated


(564)



(564)



(457)



(303)



Expense Within Category  Funds Rated


(167)



(167)



(138)



(102)



Preservation Within Category Funds Rated



							(5783)



(5783)



(4861)



(3179)



Tax Efficiency Within Category Funds Rated


(566)



(566)



(458)



(304)



Total Return Within Category Funds Rated


(566)



(566)



(458)



(304)





Category
High Yield Funds







KEY

HIGHEST







LOWEST


 As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).







Risk Measures

For the 10 Years ending 6/30/17 (updated monthly). 





Fund


Standard Deviation 


9.99                        


Sharpe Ratio 


0.53                        









                            American Funds Benchmark 
As of 6/30/17  (updated quarterly)


                            Morningstar  Benchmark 
As of 6/30/17  (updated monthly)




                            Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index
                        

                            BBgBarc US Agg Bond TR USD
                        


R-squared 

97                        

5                        


Beta 

0.93                        

0.66                        


Capture Ratio (Downside/Upside) 
103/89
99/114










Quality Summary
					 
Read important investment disclosures






U.S. Treasuries/Agencies
1.3%


A
0.0%


BBB/Baa
2.0%


BB/Ba
22.1%


B
43.4%


CCC & Below
22.4%


Unrated
1.7%


Cash & equivalents
5.3%


% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).



 

Average Life Breakdown
	   





0-4.9 Years
61.1%


5-9.9 Years
28.8%


10-19.9 Years
1.3%


20-29.9 Years
1.6%


30+ Years
0.1%


% of net assets as of 06/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
 





Holdings





Bonds Breakdown 







Bond Details





Total bond holdings








Corporate bonds & notes
+
91.1%


Industrials
9%


Information technology
7.4%


Utilities
4%


Financials
3.1%


Other corporate bonds & notes
2.4%


Consumer staples
2.2%


Energy
14.8%


Health Care
13.2%


Consumer discretionary
12.9%


Materials
11.2%


Telecommunication services
10.9%









Other bonds & notes
1.5%







Convertible securities
1.1%



% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).










Top Fixed-Income Issuers




Valeant Pharmaceuticals International

2.7%



Sprint

1.8%



Tenet Healthcare

1.8%



Altice

1.6%



First Quantum Minerals

1.6%

% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).





				QUARTERLY HOLDINGS

HOLDINGS SEARCH












Geographic Breakdown 
		



Regions
					 |
							Currency Weighting  
					|
			
							Top Countries 
				










United States
77.50%


Europe
7.50%


Asia & Pacific Basin
1.90%


Other (Including Canada & Latin America)
7.80%


Cash & equivalents
5.30%



            % of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
        






Non-U.S. Dollar Denominated

0.2%
			


Other currencies
0.2%


U.S. Dollar
99.8%


				Data as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
			










United States
77.5%


Canada
6.1%


Netherlands
2.0%


United Kingdom
1.3%


Luxembourg
1.1%

% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).












Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2017
			

















2008-2017
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS

CURRENT DAILY DIVIDENDS









2017








RecordDate
CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




Daily
01/31/17
02/01/17
$0.0455357
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.36


Daily
02/28/17
03/01/17
$0.0402637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.46


Daily
03/31/17
04/03/17
$0.0484023
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.40


Daily
04/28/17
05/01/17
$0.0470432
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.44


Daily
05/31/17
06/01/17
$0.0488094
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.47


Daily
06/30/17
07/03/17
$0.0448773
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.43






2017 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.27493161


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.27493161




				 as of 7/21/17
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00468870
07/03/2017


0.00312428
07/05/2017


0.00158506
07/06/2017


0.00158493
07/07/2017


0.00477266
07/10/2017


0.00158523
07/11/2017


0.00166222
07/12/2017


0.00167723
07/13/2017


0.00158405
07/14/2017


0.00484819
07/17/2017


0.00154268
07/18/2017


0.00160174
07/19/2017


0.00159160
07/20/2017


0.00159972
07/21/2017


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date





Daily

01/31/2017
02/01/2017








 






 











						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00468870
07/03/2017


0.00312428
07/05/2017


0.00158506
07/06/2017


0.00158493
07/07/2017


0.00477266
07/10/2017


0.00158523
07/11/2017


0.00166222
07/12/2017


0.00167723
07/13/2017


0.00158405
07/14/2017


0.00484819
07/17/2017


0.00154268
07/18/2017


0.00160174
07/19/2017


0.00159160
07/20/2017


0.00159972
07/21/2017


















Fees & Expenses





Fees
					







Annual Management Fees
0.29%


Other Expenses
0.18%


Service 12b-1
0.24%


As of each fund's most recent prospectus.







Expense Ratio



Fund
	

0.71%


Lipper 		 High Yield
 Funds Average
	


1.05%			








Resources






			Literature for AHITX
		




Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet
(PDF) 
05/17




Quarterly Attribution Report
(PDF) 
07/17





		Single Sheet
	
(PDF) 
11/16




Summary Prospectus
(PDF) 
04/17




Prospectus
(PDF) 
04/17




Statement of additional information
(PDF) 
04/17





		Semi-Annual Report
	
(PDF) 
05/17





		Annual Report
	
(PDF) 
11/16











            About Our Funds
        





Share Class Pricing and Breakpoints 





American Funds Portfolio Resources 





Advisor’s Guide 




Dividend Calendar 
(PDF) 




Stats Update 
(PDF) 




Resource Guide 
(PDF) 













Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns shown at maximum offering price (MOP) for Class A shares reflect payment of the 3.75% maximum sales charge. 
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Funds are managed, so holdings will change.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
The portfolio managers shown are as of the fund's most recent prospectus dated 04/07/2017.
Lipper ratings for Consistent Return reflect funds’ historical risk-adjusted returns at NAV, adjusted for volatility, relative to peers. Lipper ratings for Expense reflect funds’ expense minimization relative to peers with similar load structures. Lipper ratings for Preservation reflect funds’ historical loss avoidance relative to other funds within the same asset class. Preservation ratings are relative, rather than absolute, measures, and funds named Lipper Leaders for Preservation may still experience losses periodically; those losses may be larger for equity and mixed equity funds than for fixed income funds. Lipper ratings for Tax Efficiency reflect funds’ historical success in postponing taxable distributions relative to peers. Tax Efficiency offers no benefit to investors in tax-sheltered accounts such as 401(k) plans. Lipper ratings for Total Return reflect funds’ historical total return performance relative to peers. The Lipper ratings are subject to change every month and are based on an equal-weighted average of percentile ranks for the Total Return, Consistent Return, Preservation, Tax Efficiency and Expense metrics.
  The highest 20% of funds in each classification are named Lipper Leaders for Total Return, the next 20% receive a rating of 4, the middle 20% are rated 3, the next 20% are rated 2, and the lowest 20% are rated 1. Lipper ratings are not intended to predict future results, and Lipper does not guarantee the accuracy of this information. More information is available at www.lipperleaders.com. Lipper Leader © 2017, Thomson Reuters, All Rights Reserved.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The Morningstar Rating™ for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods. Past results are not guarantee of results in future periods. Morningstar Rating is for Class A only; other classes may have different performance characteristics.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
Bond ratings, which typically range from AAA/Aaa (highest) to D (lowest), are assigned by credit rating agencies such as Standard & Poor's, Moody's and/or Fitch, as an indication of an issuer's creditworthiness. If agency ratings differ, the security will be considered to have received the lowest 
  of those ratings, consistent with the fund's investment policies. Securities in the Unrated category have not been rated by a rating agency; however, the investment adviser performs its own credit analysis and assigns comparable ratings that are used for compliance with fund investment policies.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Source for Lipper expense ratio comparison: Lipper, based on front-end load funds, excluding funds of funds, for the most recent fiscal year-ends available as of 06/30/2017.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.
The SEC yield reflects the rate at which the fund is earning income on its current portfolio of securities while the distribution rate reflects the fund’s past dividends paid to shareholders. Accordingly, the fund's SEC yield and distribution rate may differ.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Except for Lipper rating information, the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High-Yield 2% Issuer Capped: Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index covers the universe of fixed-rate, non-investment-grade debt. The index limits the maximum exposure of any one issuer to 2%.
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Currency Weighting  Short Breakdown: The fund's exposure to a specific currency before taking into consideration any forward currency contracts that may increase or decrease that currency's exposure.
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Morningstar rating: In an effort to classify funds by what they own, as well as by their prospectus objectives and styles, Morningstar developed Morningstar Categories. While the prospectus objective identifies a fund's investment goals based on the wording in the fund prospectus, the Morningstar Category identifies funds based on their actual investment styles as measured by their underlying portfolio holdings (portfolio and other statistics over the past three years).  
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
	



Read important investment disclosures

This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 American High-Income Trust (AHITX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested



 
Index 
 


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index     
Lipper High Yield Funds Index     















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .











Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High-Yield 2% Issuer Capped: Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index covers the universe of fixed-rate, non-investment-grade debt. The index limits the maximum exposure of any one issuer to 2%.








Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Friday, February 19, 1988) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1988), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 American High-Income Trust (AHITX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index
Lipper High Yield Funds Index
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns shown at maximum offering price (MOP) for Class A shares reflect payment of the 3.75% maximum sales charge. 
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High-Yield 2% Issuer Capped: Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index covers the universe of fixed-rate, non-investment-grade debt. The index limits the maximum exposure of any one issuer to 2%.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income
 
Index 
 


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index
Lipper High Yield Funds Index






				Standard Deviation as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). Annualized return as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for AHITX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.














































































































































American Funds Strategic Bond Fund - ANBAX | American Funds


























HOME



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





FINANCIAL ADVISORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets













Contact Us
Preferences
Preferences


Log in / Register
Log out



American Funds Advisor ID

Log in to the Advisor Website


Register





Log out



Client Accounts (DST Vision ID)

Log in to Client Accounts



Log out





















Your Regional eWholesaler 



Schedule Meeting
Email
Call





Your Regional eWholesaler 



View LinkedIn Profile










Schedule
Schedule a phone meeting.





Call






Email
                    Receive a response within 24 hours
		    	









CLOSE X



Welcome!

						I'm , your regional contact at American Funds.  As you browse the site, you'll see that every page gives you the opportunity to email, call, or schedule a meeting with me. I look forward to answering your questions, discussing ideas, and helping you get the most out of the full range of American Funds products and services.  
					
OK, GOT IT!


















Forms & Literature


Search




















CLIENT
ACCOUNTS






										CLIENT ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








AMERICAN FUNDS ACCOUNTS





Dashboard / Client List


Recent Transactions
















Account Forms & Guidelines










PARTNER SITES









DST Vision A link to DST Vision is available on the Client Accounts page. 





PlanPremier®-Bundled PartnerLink®


PlanPremier®-TPA PartnerLink®









Recently Viewed Accounts

You must log in to access recently viewed accounts.

Log in to Client Accounts


You have no recently viewed accounts.














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Download Fund Data


Fund Literature


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs










MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Share Class Cost Comparison Calculator










OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products & Solutions





Target Date Retirement Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Insurance Series
































PRODUCTS & 
SOLUTIONS






										PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS
									
										
										See All

Close x







SOLUTIONS FOR:





Defined Contribution
Learn about retirement solutions that encourage favorable participant outcomes.



















Portfolio Construction
Find out how American Funds builds models and portfolios to meet the real-world needs of investors.






















Fixed Income
Learn about our fixed income strategies and how they pursue durable outcomes for investors.






















Retirement Income
Learn strategies that address a retiree’s withdrawal and longevity needs.













Investment Options





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Model Portfolios


Model Portfolios - ASR View



















Target Date Retirement Series


College Target Date Series


Portfolio Series


Retirement Income Portfolio Series













Retirement





401(k)/403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs


Traditional/Roth IRAs










College Savings





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts














 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















read















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















read












CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary


Defined Contribution Insights










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global


Innovation










  





International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Municipal Bonds


Portfolio Construction


Target Date


Taxable Bonds


United States














TOOLS & PRACTICE 
MANAGEMENT






										TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT
									
										
										See All

Close x







PLANNING TOOLS





Hypotheticals


Portfolio Resources


Portfolio Analyzer


Price-It Tool: Preliminary Fee Quote


Retirement Plan Cost Comparison Tool


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs






MORE PLANNING TOOLS






Capital Group Policy Spotlight






CLIENT CONVERSATIONS





Investing Basics


Investment Planning


College Savings


Individual Retirement Planning


Market Fluctuations






MORE CLIENT CONVERSATIONS






HOW-TO GUIDES









Client Servicing





Deliver More Effective Retirement Plan Reviews




 


Conduct a Portfolio Review










Business Development





Build Your IRA Business




 


Lead an Enrollment Meeting






MORE HOW-TO GUIDES










SERVICE
CENTER






										SERVICE CENTER
									
										
										See All

Close x







CURRENT












IRA BENEFICIARY REPORT See which clients haven’t designated a beneficiary or made an update in at least five years. 






LEARN MORE








SUBMIT DOCUMENTS ONLINE Any paperwork you currently fax can be submitted online. 






LEARN MORE










ACCOUNT FORMS & GUIDELINES





New Account Setup


CollegeAmerica 529


Traditional IRA


Roth IRA


SIMPLE IRA


Individual Account






More Forms & Guidelines






OTHER RESOURCES





Life Event Checklists


Tax Center


Forms & Literature










CONTACT US





Call


Mail


Submit Documents Online




























Forms & Literature











CLIENT ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS


INSIGHTS


TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT


SERVICE CENTER

































Investments


/ American Funds Strategic Bond Fund                                                SM


















BOND FUNDS


American Funds Strategic Bond Fund SM
(ANBAX)
JUMP TO A FUND 












Share Class
							


A
C
F-1
F-2
F-3
529-A
529-C
529-E
529-F-1
R-1
R-2
R-2E
R-3
R-4
R-5E
R-5
R-6





 
                                PRINT
                            
DOWNLOAD DATA

 
								ADD TO COMPARE
							

 
								ADD TO TRACKER
							












SUMMARY
RETURNS
RATINGS & RISK
HOLDINGS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
FEES & EXPENSES
RESOURCES





























Summary
		





A Multisector Fund Majoring in Rates and Minoring in Credit.						  
A flexible core fund that will rely on high-conviction ideas, which may primarily involve active management of duration, yield curve and inflation expectations with a focus on risk management and monitoring. Can invest in extended bond sectors on an opportunistic basis.					





						Price at NAV 
					

$10.32					
as of 07/21/2017 (updated daily)



						Fund Assets
						(millions)
						
					

						$435.5
					


Portfolio Managers 
						

3					


Expense Ratio 
					

1.03%


Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet  (PDF)
					

Prospectus  (PDF)



















Returns at NAV
	




									Returns at MOP
						
	







Read important investment disclosures



1.12%
1-year return

        


--
5-year return

        


3.42%
Lifetime return
				(03/18/2016)




2.36%	

		30-day SEC Yield (Fund at MOP)
		 
	




			Returns as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)
					. Yield as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly).

	



Read important investment disclosures



-2.66%
1-year return

        


--
5-year return

        


0.38%
Lifetime return
				(03/18/2016)




2.36%	

		    30-day SEC Yield (Fund at MOP)
	




			Returns as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)
					. Yield as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)

	







Asset Mix
				









U.S. Equities0.0%

Non-U.S. Equities0.0%



U.S. Bonds69.5%

Non-U.S. Bonds23.5%



Cash & Equivalents7.0%





As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).









Volatility & Return
	



Read important investment disclosures



Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.

 






Fund Statistics 
			




8.8 years
Average Life 


3.0 years
Average Duration 


2.3%
Average Yieldto Maturity 


0.8%
Average Coupon 




					% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).   
		
		







Morningstar Style BoxTM— Fixed-Income













Medium Quality


Limited Interest-Rate Sensitivity



 Morningstar data as of 6/30/17 updated quarterly.














Description





				            Objective
				        

				            The fund’s investment objective is to provide maximum total return consistent with preservation of capital.
				        



						Distinguishing Characteristics
					

A multi-sector fund that acts like a bond fund. Its relatively small concentration in high-yield bonds is designed to result in a low correlation to equities.					



						Types of Investments
					

Government debt and agency bonds, corporate bonds, mortgage- and asset-backed securities, emerging markets debt, non-U.S., municipals and high-yield.					





			            Maturity
			        

The bond maturities that the fund targets will vary depending on the current strategy being implemented.			        



			            Portfolio Restrictions
			        

The fund may invest no more than 50% of its assets in securities rated below investment grade (BB/Ba and below, or unrated, but determined by the fund’s investment adviser to be of equivalent quality) at the time of purchase, including high-yield corporate bonds or those issued by developing country governments and companies. The fund may invest up to 10% of its assets in equity securities and certain securities with a combination of debt and equity characteristics. The fund may invest up to 50% of its assets in securities denominated in currencies other than the U.S. dollar. The fund may invest up to 40% of its assets in securities of emerging market issuers.			        











Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							03/18/2016

						Fund Assets (millions) As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).

							$435.5

						Companies/Issuers
						Holdings are as of 12/31/2016 (updated as of most recent fiscal year-end).

							100+

						Shareholder Accounts
						Shareholder accounts are as of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).

							12,766

						Regular Dividends Paid
						

							Mar, Jun, Sep, Dec



 


						Minimum Initial Investment
						
					
							$250

						Capital Gains Paid
						

							Dec

						Portfolio Turnover (2016)
						
					
							539%

						Fiscal Year-End
						
					
							Dec

						Prospectus Date
						
					
							04/07/2017

						CUSIP
						
					
							02631E 10 2

						Fund Number
						
					
							30112












        Returns
        
    






Month-End Returns as of 6/30/17


Quarter-End Returns as of 6/30/17




ANNUAL RETURNS CHART

Returns at NAV  
	
 | 
	
at MOP			



Read important investment disclosures




 ANBAX
 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index 















Growth of 10K
	



High & Low Prices
		            







Read important investment disclosures
For Class A Shares, this chart tracks a hypothetical investment with dividends reinvested.


VIEW LARGER CHART



 ANBAX





For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for ANBAX through 07/21/2017.
            

 ANBAX




 






Yield
		







						12-month
					




						Distribution Rates
							




						30-day SEC Yield
							







Fund at NAV

0.72%					

							N/A   
					


Fund at MOP

0.70%					

2.36%					




As of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly).











Portfolio Management
	



LEARN ABOUT THE CAPITAL SYSTEMSM





 Years of Experience with Fund
 Years of Experience with Capital Group
 Years of Experience with Investment Industry



David A. Hoag

29
26
1



Damien J. McCann

17
17
1



Ritchie Tuazon

17
6
1



A boldface number indicates that years of experience with Capital Group is equal to years of experience with investment industry.














Ratings & Risk




Morningstar Rating TM







Overall Morningstar RatingTM
Funds rated (--)


						--
				


3-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(-- funds rated)


						--
				


5-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(-- funds rated)


						--
				


10-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(-- funds rated)


--




Overall Morningstar Risk 


--





Category 

					Multisector Bond
				




ADVANTAGES AND DISADVANTAGES OF MORNINGSTAR RATINGS


 Ratings are based on risk-adjusted returns as of
						-- 
						(updated monthly).








Lipper Leader Scorecard
	

Read important investment disclosures







Overall
3 yr.
5 yr.
10 yr.


Consistent Return Within Category 
Funds Rated














Expense Within Category  Funds Rated














Preservation Within Category Funds Rated














Tax Efficiency Within Category Funds Rated














Total Return Within Category Funds Rated
















Category
Multi-Sector Income Fds







KEY

HIGHEST







LOWEST









Risk Measures

For the 3 Years ending 6/30/17 (updated monthly). 


Fund

Standard Deviation 

                                -- 
                        


Sharpe Ratio 

                                -- 
                        










                            American Funds/Morningstar Benchmark 
As of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)





                            BBgBarc US Agg Bond TR USD
                        


R-squared 

                                -- 
                        


Beta 

                                -- 
                        


Capture Ratio (Downside/Upside) 
--/--










Quality Summary
					 
Read important investment disclosures






U.S. Treasuries/Agencies
36.6%


AAA/Aaa
0.6%


AA/Aa
6.1%


A
17.3%


BBB/Baa
21.4%


BB/Ba
6.0%


B
2.6%


CCC & Below
1.1%


Unrated
1.3%


Cash & equivalents
7.0%


% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).



 

Average Life Breakdown
	   





0-4.9 Years
14.5%


5-9.9 Years
61.2%


10-19.9 Years
4.1%


20-29.9 Years
12.0%


30+ Years
1.2%


% of net assets as of 06/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
 





Holdings





Bonds Breakdown 







Bond Details





Total bond holdings








Corporate bonds & notes
+
45.3%


Financials
8.1%


Health Care
7.3%


Energy
6.9%


Consumer discretionary
4.3%


Utilities
3.9%


Information technology
3.6%


Industrials
3.5%


Consumer staples
3.2%


Materials
2.9%


Telecommunication services
1.2%


Other corporate bonds & notes
0.4%









U.S. Treasury bonds & notes
36.6%







Non-U.S. government/agency securities
9.7%







Municipal securities
1.1%







Other bonds & notes
0.3%



% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).










Top Fixed-Income Issuers




U.S. Treasury

36.7%



Japan

5.3%



India Government

2.6%



Broadcom

1.6%



Shire

1.4%

% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).





				QUARTERLY HOLDINGS

HOLDINGS SEARCH












Geographic Breakdown 
		



Regions
					 |
							Currency Weighting  
					|
			
							Top Countries 
				










United States
69.50%


Europe
7.20%


Asia & Pacific Basin
10.30%


Other (Including Canada & Latin America)
6.00%


Cash & equivalents
7.00%



            % of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
        






Non-U.S. Dollar Denominated

10.7%
			


Japanese yen
5.4%


Euros
1.7%


Other currencies
3.6%


U.S. Dollar
89.3%


				Data as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
			










United States
69.5%


Japan
5.7%


United Kingdom
3.3%


Canada
2.8%


India
2.6%


Australia
2.0%


Brazil
1.3%


Switzerland
1.1%


Kuwait
0.8%


Portugal
0.8%

% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).












Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2017
			

















2008-2017
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS









2017








RecordDate
CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




03/17/17
03/17/17
03/20/17
$0.02
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.12


06/16/17
06/16/17
06/19/17
$0.02
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.28






2017 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.04


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.04




				 as of 7/21/17
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/19/2017


0.00000000
06/20/2017


0.00000000
06/21/2017


0.00000000
06/22/2017


0.00000000
06/23/2017


0.00000000
06/26/2017


0.00000000
06/27/2017


0.00000000
06/28/2017


0.00000000
06/29/2017


0.00000000
06/30/2017


0.00000000
07/03/2017


0.00000000
07/05/2017


0.00000000
07/06/2017


0.00000000
07/07/2017


0.00000000
07/10/2017


0.00000000
07/11/2017


0.00000000
07/12/2017


0.00000000
07/13/2017


0.00000000
07/14/2017


0.00000000
07/17/2017


0.00000000
07/18/2017


0.00000000
07/19/2017


0.00000000
07/20/2017


0.00000000
07/21/2017


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date










 













						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/19/2017


0.00000000
06/20/2017


0.00000000
06/21/2017


0.00000000
06/22/2017


0.00000000
06/23/2017


0.00000000
06/26/2017


0.00000000
06/27/2017


0.00000000
06/28/2017


0.00000000
06/29/2017


0.00000000
06/30/2017


0.00000000
07/03/2017


0.00000000
07/05/2017


0.00000000
07/06/2017


0.00000000
07/07/2017


0.00000000
07/10/2017


0.00000000
07/11/2017


0.00000000
07/12/2017


0.00000000
07/13/2017


0.00000000
07/14/2017


0.00000000
07/17/2017


0.00000000
07/18/2017


0.00000000
07/19/2017


0.00000000
07/20/2017


0.00000000
07/21/2017


















Fees & Expenses





Fees
					







Annual Management Fees
0.57%


Other Expenses
0.16%


Service 12b-1
0.30%


As of each fund's most recent prospectus.







Expense Ratio




Gross
Net


Fund
	

1.03%
1.01%


Lipper 		 Multi-Sector Income
 Funds Average
	



					1.06%
				








Resources






			Literature for ANBAX
		




Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet
(PDF) 
05/17




Quarterly Attribution Report
(PDF) 
07/17





		Single Sheet
	
(PDF) 
04/17




Summary Prospectus
(PDF) 
04/17




Prospectus
(PDF) 
04/17




Statement of additional information
(PDF) 
04/17





		Semi-Annual Report
	
(PDF) 
08/16




Annual Report
(PDF) 
02/17




Q&A
(PDF) 
06/16











            About Our Funds
        





Share Class Pricing and Breakpoints 





American Funds Portfolio Resources 





Advisor’s Guide 




Dividend Calendar 
(PDF) 




Stats Update 
(PDF) 




Resource Guide 
(PDF) 













Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns shown at maximum offering price (MOP) for Class A shares reflect payment of the 3.75% maximum sales charge. 
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The use of derivatives involves a variety of risks, which may be different from, or greater than, the risks associated with investing in traditional cash securities, such as stocks and bonds. The fund may engage in frequent and active trading of its portfolio securities, which may involve correspondingly greater transaction costs, adversely affecting the fund's results.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Funds are managed, so holdings will change.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
For American Funds Strategic Bond Fund, the investment adviser is currently reimbursing a portion of other expenses through at least January 1, 2018, without which the results would have been lower and net expense ratios higher. The adviser may elect at its discretion to extend, modify or terminate the reimbursement at that time. Please see the fund's most recent prospectus for details. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
The portfolio managers shown are as of the fund's most recent prospectus dated 04/07/2017.
Lipper ratings for Consistent Return reflect funds’ historical risk-adjusted returns at NAV, adjusted for volatility, relative to peers. Lipper ratings for Expense reflect funds’ expense minimization relative to peers with similar load structures. Lipper ratings for Preservation reflect funds’ historical loss avoidance relative to other funds within the same asset class. Preservation ratings are relative, rather than absolute, measures, and funds named Lipper Leaders for Preservation may still experience losses periodically; those losses may be larger for equity and mixed equity funds than for fixed income funds. Lipper ratings for Tax Efficiency reflect funds’ historical success in postponing taxable distributions relative to peers. Tax Efficiency offers no benefit to investors in tax-sheltered accounts such as 401(k) plans. Lipper ratings for Total Return reflect funds’ historical total return performance relative to peers. The Lipper ratings are subject to change every month and are based on an equal-weighted average of percentile ranks for the Total Return, Consistent Return, Preservation, Tax Efficiency and Expense metrics.
  The highest 20% of funds in each classification are named Lipper Leaders for Total Return, the next 20% receive a rating of 4, the middle 20% are rated 3, the next 20% are rated 2, and the lowest 20% are rated 1. Lipper ratings are not intended to predict future results, and Lipper does not guarantee the accuracy of this information. More information is available at www.lipperleaders.com. Lipper Leader © 2017, Thomson Reuters, All Rights Reserved.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The Morningstar Rating™ for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods. Past results are not guarantee of results in future periods. Morningstar Rating is for Class A only; other classes may have different performance characteristics.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
Bond ratings, which typically range from AAA/Aaa (highest) to D (lowest), are assigned by credit rating agencies such as Standard & Poor's, Moody's and/or Fitch, as an indication of an issuer's creditworthiness. If agency ratings differ, the security will be considered to have received the highest 
  of those ratings, consistent with the fund's investment policies. Securities in the Unrated category have not been rated by a rating agency; however, the investment adviser performs its own credit analysis and assigns comparable ratings that are used for compliance with fund investment policies.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Source for Lipper expense ratio comparison: Lipper, based on front-end load funds, excluding funds of funds, for the most recent fiscal year-ends available as of 06/30/2017.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.
The SEC yield reflects the rate at which the fund is earning income on its current portfolio of securities while the distribution rate reflects the fund’s past dividends paid to shareholders. Accordingly, the fund's SEC yield and distribution rate may differ.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Except for Lipper rating information, the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate: Represents the U.S. investment-grade fixed-rate bond market.
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Currency Weighting  Short Breakdown: The fund's exposure to a specific currency before taking into consideration any forward currency contracts that may increase or decrease that currency's exposure.
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Morningstar rating: In an effort to classify funds by what they own, as well as by their prospectus objectives and styles, Morningstar developed Morningstar Categories. While the prospectus objective identifies a fund's investment goals based on the wording in the fund prospectus, the Morningstar Category identifies funds based on their actual investment styles as measured by their underlying portfolio holdings (portfolio and other statistics over the past three years).  
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
	



Read important investment disclosures

This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 American Funds Strategic Bond Fund (ANBAX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested














Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The use of derivatives involves a variety of risks, which may be different from, or greater than, the risks associated with investing in traditional cash securities, such as stocks and bonds. The fund may engage in frequent and active trading of its portfolio securities, which may involve correspondingly greater transaction costs, adversely affecting the fund's results.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
For American Funds Strategic Bond Fund, the investment adviser is currently reimbursing a portion of other expenses through at least January 1, 2018, without which the results would have been lower and net expense ratios higher. The adviser may elect at its discretion to extend, modify or terminate the reimbursement at that time. Please see the fund's most recent prospectus for details. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .
















Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Friday, March 18, 2016) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (2016), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 American Funds Strategic Bond Fund (ANBAX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index
Lipper Multi-Sector Income Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns shown at maximum offering price (MOP) for Class A shares reflect payment of the 3.75% maximum sales charge. 
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The use of derivatives involves a variety of risks, which may be different from, or greater than, the risks associated with investing in traditional cash securities, such as stocks and bonds. The fund may engage in frequent and active trading of its portfolio securities, which may involve correspondingly greater transaction costs, adversely affecting the fund's results.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
For American Funds Strategic Bond Fund, the investment adviser is currently reimbursing a portion of other expenses through at least January 1, 2018, without which the results would have been lower and net expense ratios higher. The adviser may elect at its discretion to extend, modify or terminate the reimbursement at that time. Please see the fund's most recent prospectus for details. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate: Represents the U.S. investment-grade fixed-rate bond market.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for ANBAX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.














































































































































American Funds

































Fixed Income Center




















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








Log in






(0)









Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          




















 

$ {headerPrefix } 
























Navigating Global Bond Markets















Navigating Global Bond Markets

 / 























The Global Bond Markets Are Changing





The global bond market is undergoing a series of profound changes, challenging the traditional role of income and stability that bonds have played and creating new opportunities. We believe investors should understand these changes and adapt their portfolios to the new fixed-income landscape.











Interest Rates May Challenge Investors
 






Opportunities Exist Across the Globe, Across the Spectrum
 






Divergence in Global Growth
 






Lower Liquidity, May Mean Higher Volatility
 











Can Your Portfolio Keep Up?





We believe investors should consider dynamic and flexible fixed income investments that attempt to neutralize or even benefit from rising interest rates. Investors should also consider strategies that seek value across all sectors of the global fixed income market, allowing them to diversify geographically and take advantage of diverging growth patterns.  Overall investors may prefer highly liquid mutual funds for their long-term investments, not individual bonds, and money market funds for their short-term investments.









Explore Our Products





GS Strategic Income Fund

	       A Flexible Global Bond Portfolio Designed to Serve as a Core Income-Oriented Investment
	    

GSZIX 





GS Dynamic Municipal Income Fund

	       Helps Navigate a Changing Municipal Bond Market
	    

GSMTX 





GS Global Income Fund

	       A U.S. Dollar-Hedged Fund that Provides Access to Global High-Quality Bonds
	    

GSGLX 





GS High Quality Floating Rate Fund

	       A Money Market Fund Seeking a High Level of Current Income With Low Volatility of Principal
	    

GSARX 










The GSAM Global Fixed Income Team





In the past, fixed income managers only had to make three investment decisions: the direction of interest rates, the allocation to government and corporate bonds, and the selection of individual securities. Today, multiple factors may impact the global bond markets making a skilled manager essential.
The GSAM Global Fixed Income team has experience actively investing across the global spectrum. With more than 225 investment professionals located in major markets around the world, including New York, London and Tokyo, the team has the breadth and depth to cover every sector of the global fixed income market, employing industry-leading risk management capabilities with proprietary risk models comprising more than 800 unique risk factors. With more than $471 billion in assets under management, the team pursues strong, consistent performance across the fixed income market. 










Related Insights















 Markets Brace for Bear Case

 There are grounds for concern and potential drivers of volatility in 2016. However, we still see opportunities in select areas and relative value strategies. 


















												Where We See Value in High Yield Bonds
											


We believe select areas of the high-yield bond market can offer attractive compensation relative to today’s increased fundamental risk.










												Three Reasons to Consider Global Bonds Now
											


Having a purely domestic bond exposure may have served investors well in the past, but we believe a changing fixed-income landscape creates a new logic to consider international bonds.

















                        
                        
                            Market Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Market Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Asset Class Views
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Goldman Sachs Global Investment Research
		           		 
					     
						    







                        
                        
                            Products
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Mutual Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Exchange-Traded Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Closed-End Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Variable Insurance Trusts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Separately Managed Accounts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Liquidity Solutions
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Resources
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Advisor Resources
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Investment Ideas
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Portfolio Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Defined Contribution Investment Only
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Client Service
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Literature
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Literature Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Tax Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Forms and Applications
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Regulatory Documents
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Fact Cards
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Our Firm
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        About GSAM
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Citizenship
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Recognition
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               

























































 EIM: Quote and summary for EV Municipal Bond - MSN Money















msn  back to msn home

money










web search














Sign in








Change language & content:

América Latina (español)
Argentina (español)
Australia (English)
België (Nederlands)
Belgique (français)
Brasil (português)
Canada (English)
Canada (français)
Chile (español)
Colombia (español)
Danmark (Dansk)
Deutschland (Deutsch)
España (español)
France (français)
India (English)
Indonesia (Bahasa Indonesia)
Ireland (English)
Italia (italiano)
Malaysia (English)
México (español)
Nederland (Nederlands)
New Zealand (English)
Norge (norsk, bokmål)
Österreich (Deutsch)
Perú (español)
Philippines (English)
Polska (polski)
Portugal (Português)
Schweiz (Deutsch)
Singapore (English)
South Africa (English)
Suisse (français)
Suomi (suomi)
Sverige (svenska)
Türkiye (Türkçe)
United Arab Emirates (English)
United Kingdom (English)
United States (English)
United States (español)
Venezuela (español)
Việt Nam (Tiếng Việt)
Ελλάδα (ελληνικά)
Россия (Pусский)
ישראל (עברית)‏
الإمارات العربية المتحدة (العربية‏)
المملكة العربية السعودية (العربية‏)
مصر (العربية‏)
ไทย (ไทย)
한국 (한국어)
中华人民共和国 (简体中文)
台灣 (繁體中文)
日本 (日本語)
香港特别行政區 (繁體中文)



Switch to Latino (Español)



 Feedback



Help






























AdChoices














EV Municipal Bond
Amex: EIM



US Markets Closed










AdChoices








12.81


▼


-0.03
-0.23%



 : 






 July 21, 2017 4:02 PM EDT. Delayed 15 minutes. Currency In USD                
















Save














 Summary




 Analysis



















































Open
12.85


Previous Close
12.84


Vol (3-Month Avg.)
116.04k


Day's Range
12.78-12.85


52 week range
12.00-14.16


Net Assets
942.09M


Yield
4.65%


Category
Muni National Long  


Morningstar Risk
High







Profile






Name of Issuer


Eaton Vance




Expenses


1.05%







To provide current income exempt from federal income tax, including alternative minimum tax. Under normal market conditions, the Fund is required to invest at least 80% of net assets in municipal obligations rated A or better by Moodys, S&P or Fitch. The interest on which is exempt from federal income tax, including alternative minimum tax. These municipal obligations are of the highest investment grade at the time of investment or, if unrated, determined by Eaton Vance to be of comparable quality. Up to 20% of its assets may be invested in investment-grade municipal obligations (rated below Aaa/AAA, but no lower than Baa/BBB) and unrated municipal obligations considered to be of comparable quality and/or municipal obligations that are uninsured. There is no intention to invest in obligations rated below investment grade. Various kinds of financial futures contracts and related options may be purchased and sold to seek to hedge against changes in interest rates or for other risk management purposes.





eatonvance.com





Inception
8/30/2002














Recent News







Tax-Free Income From Municipal Bond CEFs

                            
                            Seeking Alpha
                        
10/14/2015






'Heads Up' Closed End Fund Muni Investors

                            
                            Seeking Alpha
                        
3/14/2012
























AdChoices

















AdChoices




















Markets











DOW

DOW



▼

21,580.07


-31.71
-0.15%













Last updated time
7/21/2017 4:35 PM EDT







Markets





NASDAQ

NASDAQ



▼

6,387.75




-2.25
-0.04%










FTSE 100

FTSE 100



▼

7,452.91




-34.96
-0.47%










NYSE Composite

NYSE Composite



▼

11,924.60




-19.90
-0.17%



















AdChoices
















                Feedback
            







Send Feedback
Provide Feedback
Report a Problem


We appreciate your input!



Select a category:

I'm having problems with Top Destinations
I'm having issues searching
I'm having problems with Featured Apps
I see an error in the content
Other



How we can improve?





Please give an overall site rating:









Submit
Close


Privacy Statement


Help


Help & Support



 











 







Municipal Bond Fund (EIM) | Eaton Vance Funds
































































Use of cookies by Eaton Vance Management (International) LimitedWe use cookies to deliver our online services. Details and instructions on how to disable those cookies are set out here. By continuing to use this website you agree to our use of our cookies unless you have disabled them.accept cookies














Go to:


Eaton Vance U.S. Home

Eaton Vance U.S. HomeU.S Institutions HomeEaton Vance U.S. FundsU.S. Charitable HomeOffshore HomeGlobal Home













InvestorAccount Access 
Investment Professional Sign In










Municipal Bond Fund  




EIM
Symbol



$13.82
$0.02


NAV as of Jul 21, 2017



$12.81
$-0.03


MKT as of Jul 21, 2017


-7.31%
Premium/Discountas of Jul 21, 2017





Relateddocuments



 Fact SheetMar 31, 2017


 CommentaryMar 31, 2017


 CEF Connect - EIM











 

 Overview

Historical Returns (%)as of  Jun 30, 2017


























Annualized



1 Mo.
3 Mos.
YTD
1 Yr.
3 Yrs.
5 Yrs.
10 Yrs.


 
Fund at NAV
-0.39
2.90
4.62
-2.40
6.17
6.28
5.65


Market Price
0.25
2.38
4.87
-5.78
6.48
4.95
4.93





Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Performance is for the stated time period only; due to market volatili ty, the Fund's current performance may be lower or higher than quoted. The Fund's performance at market price will differ from its results at NAV. Returns are historical and are calculated by determining the percentage change in net asset value or market  price (as applicable) with all distributions reinvested and includes management fees and other expenses. Until the reinvestment of Fund distributions is completed, returns are calculated using the lower of the net asset value or market price of the shar es on the distribution ex date.  Once the reinvestment is complete, returns are calculated using the average reinvestment price.  Performance less than or equal to one year is cumulative.






Distribution Rates1







as of Jul 20, 2017


 
Distribution Rate at NAV
4.53%


Taxable-Equivalent Distribution Rate at NAV
8.00%


Distribution Rate at Market Price
4.87%


Taxable-Equivalent Distribution Rate at Market Price
8.60%







Fund Factsas of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Performance Inception
08/30/2002


Investment Objective
Current income


CUSIP
27827X101







Portfolio Management




 
Cynthia J. Clemson


Managed Fund since 2014






The information included herein does not reflect securities deemed to be held by the Fund pursuant to financial accounting standard 140 (FAS 140).


The information contained herein is provided for informational purposes only and does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell Fund shares.  Common shares of the Fund are only available for purchase and sale at current market price on a s tock exchange.  There is no assurance that the Fund will achieve its investment objective. The Fund is subject to numerous risks, including investment risks. Shares of closed-end funds often trade at a discount from their net asset value.  The Fund is no t a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in the Fund. An investment in the Fund may not be appropriate for all investors.  Investors should review and consider carefully the Fund’s investment objective, risks, charges and ex penses.The premium/discount is calculated as [(market price/NAV)-1].


Links to Morningstar Fact Sheet and CEF Connect: By clicking on the link from this page to the Morningstar fact sheet or CEF Connect, you will leave the Eaton Vance website.  Eaton Vance is not responsible for the content of any such third-party website.   See “Terms and Conditions” below.



1. Distribution Rate at NAV and Market Price is calculated by dividing the last distribution paid per share (annualized) by NAV or market price, respectively. For National Municipal Funds, Taxable-Equivalent Distribution Rate at NAV and Market Price is calc ulated using a 43.4% tax rate (equals maximum individual federal tax rate adjusted for the Medicare surtax). For Single-State Municipal Funds, Taxable-Equivalent Distribution Rates also reflect maximum effective individual state income tax rates. Local i ncome taxes that may apply are not considered.
 Performance

Historical Returns (%)as of  Jun 30, 2017


























Annualized



1 Mo.
3 Mos.
YTD
1 Yr.
3 Yrs.
5 Yrs.
10 Yrs.


 
Fund at NAV
-0.39
2.90
4.62
-2.40
6.17
6.28
5.65


Market Price
0.25
2.38
4.87
-5.78
6.48
4.95
4.93





Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Performance is for the stated time period only; due to market volatili ty, the Fund's current performance may be lower or higher than quoted. The Fund's performance at market price will differ from its results at NAV. Returns are historical and are calculated by determining the percentage change in net asset value or market  price (as applicable) with all distributions reinvested and includes management fees and other expenses. Until the reinvestment of Fund distributions is completed, returns are calculated using the lower of the net asset value or market price of the shar es on the distribution ex date.  Once the reinvestment is complete, returns are calculated using the average reinvestment price.  Performance less than or equal to one year is cumulative.






Calendar Year Returns (%)







2007
2008
2009
2010
2011
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016


 
Fund at NAV
-2.44
-31.75
41.55
-0.59
22.52
17.23
-8.02
23.41
6.21
0.44


Market Price
-4.42
-32.91
50.51
-0.42
19.36
16.77
-13.98
20.77
7.45
0.73







Fund Facts




 
Performance Inception
08/30/2002







Distribution Rates1







as of Jul 20, 2017


 
Distribution Rate at NAV
4.53%


Taxable-Equivalent Distribution Rate at NAV
8.00%


Distribution Rate at Market Price
4.87%


Taxable-Equivalent Distribution Rate at Market Price
8.60%







Distribution History2






Ex-Date
Distribution
Reinvest Price


 
Jul 20, 2017
$0.05210
$12.84


Jun 21, 2017
$0.05210
$12.70


May 22, 2017
$0.05210
$12.79


Apr 19, 2017
$0.05380
$12.58


Mar 22, 2017
$0.05380
$12.51


Feb 16, 2017
$0.05380
$12.39


Jan 20, 2017
$0.05380
$12.71


Dec 21, 2016
$0.05380
$12.52


Nov 21, 2016
$0.05550
$12.23


Oct 20, 2016
$0.05550
$12.91





View All






No records in this table indicates that there has not been a distribution greater than .0001 within the past 3 years.






Tax Character of Distributions








Exempt-Interest Dividends

 

 




Non-AMT
AMT
Total

Non-Qualified Ordinary Dividends
Capital Gain Distributions
Nondividend Distributions
Total Distributions


 
Distributions ($)
as of  Dec 31, 2016


2016
$0.70
$0.00
$0.70

$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$0.70


2015
$0.77
$0.00
$0.77

$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$0.77


2014
$0.77
$0.00
$0.77

$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$0.77


2013
$0.77
$0.00
$0.77

$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$0.77


2012
$0.78
$0.00
$0.78

$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$0.78


2011
$0.91
$0.00
$0.91

$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$0.91


2010
$0.91
$0.00
$0.91

$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$0.91


2009
$0.84
$0.00
$0.84

$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$0.84


2008
$0.78
$0.00
$0.78

$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$0.78


2007
$0.77
$0.00
$0.77

$0.00
$0.19
$0.00
$0.96


2006
$0.79
$0.00
$0.79

$0.03
$0.30
$0.00
$1.12


2005
$0.91
$0.00
$0.91

$0.00
$0.07
$0.00
$0.98


 
Distributions (%)
as of  Dec 31, 2016


2016
99.87%
0.00%
99.87%

0.13%
0.00%
0.00%
100.00%


2015
100.00%
0.00%
100.00%

0.00%
0.00%
0.00%
100.00%


2014
99.94%
0.00%
99.94%

0.06%
0.00%
0.00%
100.00%


2013
99.93%
0.00%
99.93%

0.07%
0.00%
0.00%
100.00%


2012
99.85%
0.00%
99.85%

0.15%
0.00%
0.00%
100.00%


2011
99.98%
0.00%
99.98%

0.02%
0.00%
0.00%
100.00%


2010
99.84%
0.00%
99.84%

0.16%
0.00%
0.00%
100.00%


2009
99.95%
0.00%
99.95%

0.05%
0.00%
0.00%
100.00%


2008
99.98%
0.00%
99.98%

0.02%
0.00%
0.00%
100.00%


2007
80.51%
0.00%
80.51%

0.00%
19.49%
0.00%
100.00%


2006
70.23%
0.00%
70.23%

2.83%
26.94%
0.00%
100.00%


2005
92.97%
0.00%
92.97%

0.01%
7.02%
0.00%
100.00%





This data reflects distributions paid on Fund shares held for the full calendar year and is not predictive of the tax character of current or future distributions.  Fund shareholders should refer to the individual IRS Form 1099-DIVs provided to them shor tly after each year-end to determine the appropriate federal income tax treatment of the distributions they receive.  Eaton Vance is not responsible for any errors in tax reporting that may result from using the above data. Exempt-interest dividends are  not subject to regular federal income tax. Exempt-interest dividends derived from specified private activity bonds are subject to the alternative minimum tax (AMT). Non-qualified ordinary dividends are subject to federal income tax at ordinary rates. Cap ital gains distributions are taxable at long-term capital gain rates. Nondividend distributions, also known as return of capital distributions, are not subject to current federal income tax. Instead, the tax cost basis of each shareholder receiving a ret urn of capital distribution is reduced by the amount of the distribution.





The information contained herein is provided for informational purposes only and does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell Fund shares.  Common shares of the Fund are only available for purchase and sale at current market price on a s tock exchange.  There is no assurance that the Fund will achieve its investment objective. The Fund is subject to numerous risks, including investment risks. Shares of closed-end funds often trade at a discount from their net asset value.  The Fund is no t a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in the Fund. An investment in the Fund may not be appropriate for all investors.  Investors should review and consider carefully the Fund’s investment objective, risks, charges and ex penses.The premium/discount is calculated as [(market price/NAV)-1].


Links to Morningstar Fact Sheet and CEF Connect: By clicking on the link from this page to the Morningstar fact sheet or CEF Connect, you will leave the Eaton Vance website.  Eaton Vance is not responsible for the content of any such third-party website.   See “Terms and Conditions” below.



1. Distribution Rate at NAV and Market Price is calculated by dividing the last distribution paid per share (annualized) by NAV or market price, respectively. For National Municipal Funds, Taxable-Equivalent Distribution Rate at NAV and Market Price is calc ulated using a 43.4% tax rate (equals maximum individual federal tax rate adjusted for the Medicare surtax). For Single-State Municipal Funds, Taxable-Equivalent Distribution Rates also reflect maximum effective individual state income tax rates. Local i ncome taxes that may apply are not considered.
2. The Fund's distributions may be comprised of tax-exempt income, ordinary income, net realized capital gains and nondividend distributions, also known as return of capital. The federal income tax character of distributions paid to a shareholder is reporte d on the IRS Form 1099-DIV provided to the shareholder shortly after each year-end. Please consult your tax advisor for further information.
 Portfolio

Fund Holdings3,4as of  May 31, 2017







Holding
Coupon Rate
Maturity Date
% of Net Assets


 
College of the Holy Cross
5.25%
09/01/2032
2.20%


San Joaquin Hills Transportation Corridor Agency
0.00%
01/15/2025
2.14%


County of Miami-Dade FL
0.00%
10/01/2039
1.91%


City of Dallas TX Waterworks & Sewer System Revenue
5.00%
10/01/2041
1.88%


Alabama Public School & College Authority
2.50%
12/01/2027
1.72%


Ascension Health Credit Group
4.50%
11/15/2039
1.72%


Kane Cook & DuPage Counties School District No U-46 Elgin
0.00%
01/01/2022
1.60%


City of Houston TX
0.00%
09/01/2024
1.58%


Virtua Health Obligated Group
5.50%
07/01/2038
1.53%


New York State Dormitory Authority
5.00%
03/15/2035
1.48%





View All







The information included herein does not reflect securities deemed to be held by the Fund pursuant to financial accounting standard 140 (FAS 140).


The information contained herein is provided for informational purposes only and does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell Fund shares.  Common shares of the Fund are only available for purchase and sale at current market price on a s tock exchange.  There is no assurance that the Fund will achieve its investment objective. The Fund is subject to numerous risks, including investment risks. Shares of closed-end funds often trade at a discount from their net asset value.  The Fund is no t a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in the Fund. An investment in the Fund may not be appropriate for all investors.  Investors should review and consider carefully the Fund’s investment objective, risks, charges and ex penses.The premium/discount is calculated as [(market price/NAV)-1].


Links to Morningstar Fact Sheet and CEF Connect: By clicking on the link from this page to the Morningstar fact sheet or CEF Connect, you will leave the Eaton Vance website.  Eaton Vance is not responsible for the content of any such third-party website.   See “Terms and Conditions” below.



3. The following list reflects unaudited securities holdings (excluding derivatives positions).  Holdings information may differ if presented as of trade date.  Due to rounding, holdings of less than 0.005% may show as 0.00%. Portfolio information subject t o change due to active management.
4. Percent of total net assets.
 Insights & Analysis  Commentary
A Word On The Markets as of  Mar 31, 2017
The U.S. municipal bond market posted positive returns for the first quarter of 2017, with the Bloomberg Barclays Municipal Bond Index (the Index)5 returning 1.6% for the three-month period. After experiencing a significant amount of volatility foll owing Donald Trump's presidential election victory during the fourth quarter of 2016, the municipal market stabilized during the first quarter. During the period, short-term municipal yields declined 20-25 basis points, while intermediate- and longer-ter m yields were flat to slightly higher.
After experiencing significantly negative outflows during the last six weeks of 2016, mutual fund flows stabilized and turned positive in January, as some investors sought to take advantage of both higher municipal yields and attractive relative valuatio ns. Despite this expression of confidence at the beginning of the year, mutual fund flows for the entire quarter were fairly tepid with overall inflows totaling just under $5 billion. Issuance during the quarter declined to $88 billion compared to $100 b illion during the fourth quarter of 2016. The slowdown in issuance was largely related to the a decline in refunding activity due to higher interest rates and the uncertainty surrounding President Trump's agenda for health care, tax reform and infrastruc ture spending.
Compared to the sharp sell-off during the fourth quarter, the municipal market was relatively quiet during the first quarter. Treasury yields traded in a fairly tight range and the curve was more or less unchanged. Meanwhile, the municipal yield curve st eepened significantly as two- and five-year yields declined 19 and 24 basis points, respectively, while 30-year yields increased 1bp. As a result, short term municipals outperformed longer-term municipals with the five-and seven-year part of the curve le ading the way.
In terms of credit quality, lower quality municipals outperformed higher quality as BBB's within the Index returned 2.2% compared to AAAs up 1.4%. Similarly, after underperforming significantly during the fourth quarter, the Bloomberg Barclays High Yield  Municipal Bond Index6 returned 4.1%, significantly outperforming investment grade. This outperformance was primarily due to higher carry, spread tightening and renewed strength in the tobacco sector, which returned 13.1%. Finally, Puerto Rico cred its underperformed significantly following the release of its Certified Financial Plan in mid-March, which proved to be more negative for all bondholders than previously anticipated.


Performance Summary 
Eaton Vance Municipal Bond Fund (the Fund) (EIM) underperformed the Index7 at net asset value for the quarter. Aiding the Fund's performance was its security selection in the Electric/Power sector and its use of leverage employed through TOBs. These s ecurities act as a financing mechanism allowing investors to borrow at short-term rates and invest in higher-yielding bonds. An overweight exposure to Pre-refunded bonds detracted from relative performance and the Fund's security selection among zero cou pon bonds also diminished performance relative to the Index.



Historical Returns (%)as of  Mar 31, 2017









Annualized



1 Mo.
3 Mos.
YTD
1 Yr.
3 Yrs.
5 Yrs.
10 Yrs.


 
Fund at NAV
0.35
1.67
1.67
-0.36
7.33
6.43
5.10


Market Price
0.51
2.43
2.43
-0.69
7.81
5.26
4.15





Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Performance is for the stated time period only; due to market volatili ty, the Fund's current performance may be lower or higher than quoted. The Fund's performance at market price will differ from its results at NAV. Returns are historical and are calculated by determining the percentage change in net asset value or market  price (as applicable) with all distributions reinvested and includes management fees and other expenses. Until the reinvestment of Fund distributions is completed, returns are calculated using the lower of the net asset value or market price of the shar es on the distribution ex date.  Once the reinvestment is complete, returns are calculated using the average reinvestment price.  Performance less than or equal to one year is cumulative.






Fund Factsas of  Mar 31, 2017





 
Performance Inception
08/30/2002






Investment Outlook And Fund Positioning 
We believe munis continue to be attractive on both an absolute and relative level. Intermediate- and longer-term municipals stabilized during the quarter, and the 10- and 30-year municipal-to-Treasury ratios ended the quarter at 94% and 101%, respectivel y.
Lackluster mutual fund flows and the ongoing expectation of lower taxes under the Trump administration have combined to keep municipal valuations attractive, in our view. In addition, we continue to lack specific details related to the specifics of Trump 's policies, what will get through Congress, and when. As a result, there are a wide range of potential outcomes.
In our view, the historic move higher in yields during the fourth quarter of 2016 created an emerging opportunity to lock in higher yields and potentially generate higher future returns. After the first three months of 2017, we believe this opportunity r emains in place. In recent history, the municipal market has proven to be resilient and sharp increases in municipal yields have resulted in buying opportunities and rewarded investors with strong returns in subsequent months. Therefore, we continue to b elieve that municipal yields could move back down a bit in 2017. There are other factors that could cause rates to retrace a bit, especially on the longer end of the Treasury curve. First, U.S. Treasury yields are still historically low, but very attract ive when compared with other developed markets such as Europe and Japan. Second, following the failure to reform the Affordable Care Act, uncertainty surrounding President Trump's ability to deliver on the policy front has increased. And finally, after i ncreasing the fed Funds rate by 25 basis points during the first quarter, the Federal Reserve is forecasting two more rate hikes in 2017, demonstrating a willingness to squeeze off inflationary pressures, if necessary.
Given this outlook, we believe tax-sensitive investors continue to be offered the opportunity to scale into munis at attractive yields and valuations. In addition, we believe municipals will continue to act as an anchor to provide diversification in the  context of an overall portfolio.8


The views expressed in this report are those of portfolio manager(s) and are current only through the date stated at the top of this page. These views are subject to change at any time based upon market or other conditions, and Eaton Vance disclaims any  responsibility to update such views. These views may not be relied upon as investment advice and, because investment decisions are based on many factors, may not be relied upon as an indication of trading intent on behalf of any Eaton Vance fund. This co mmentary may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as "forward looking statements". The Fund's actual future results may differ significantly from those stated in any forward-looking statement, depending on factors such  as changes in securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of investment advisory, administrative and service contracts, and other risks discussed from time to time in  the Fund's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.


The information included herein does not reflect securities deemed to be held by the Fund pursuant to financial accounting standard 140 (FAS 140).


The information contained herein is provided for informational purposes only and does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell Fund shares.  Common shares of the Fund are only available for purchase and sale at current market price on a s tock exchange.  There is no assurance that the Fund will achieve its investment objective. The Fund is subject to numerous risks, including investment risks. Shares of closed-end funds often trade at a discount from their net asset value.  The Fund is no t a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in the Fund. An investment in the Fund may not be appropriate for all investors.  Investors should review and consider carefully the Fund’s investment objective, risks, charges and ex penses.The premium/discount is calculated as [(market price/NAV)-1].


Links to Morningstar Fact Sheet and CEF Connect: By clicking on the link from this page to the Morningstar fact sheet or CEF Connect, you will leave the Eaton Vance website.  Eaton Vance is not responsible for the content of any such third-party website.   See “Terms and Conditions” below.

  Attribution
No attribution information is currently available.



5. Bloomberg Barclays Municipal Bond Index is an unmanaged index of municipal bonds traded in the U.S. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverage, as applicable.  It is not possible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund.
6. Bloomberg Barclays High Yield Municipal Bond Index is an unmanaged index of non-Investment Grade Municipal bonds traded in the U.S. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, t axes or leverage, as applicable. It is not possible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund.
7. Bloomberg Barclays Capital Long (22+) Municipal Bond Index is an unmanaged index of municipal bonds traded in the U.S. with maturities of 22 years or more. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges,  commissions, expenses, taxes or leverage, as applicable. It is not possible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund.
8. The Investment Outlook includes comparisons of different asset classes, each of which has distinct risk and return characteristics. Every investment carries risk, and principal values and performance will fluctuate with all asset classes shown, sometimes  substantially.  All asset classes shown are subject to risks, including possible loss of principal invested. The principal risks involved with investing in the asset classes shown are interest-rate risk, credit risk and liquidity risk, with each asset c lass shown offering a distinct combination of these risks. Generally, considered along a spectrum of risks and return potential, U.S. Treasury securities (which are guaranteed as to the payment of principal and interest by the U.S. government) offer lowe r credit risk, higher levels of liquidity, higher interest-rate risk and lower return potential, whereas asset classes such as high-yield corporate bonds offer higher credit risk, lower levels of liquidity, lower interest-rate risk and higher return pote ntial. Costs and expenses associated with investing in asset classes shown will vary, sometimes substantially, depending upon specific investment vehicles chosen.  Interest income earned on asset classes shown is subject to ordinary federal, state and lo cal income taxes, except U.S. Treasury securities (exempt from state and local income taxes) and municipal securities (exempt from federal income taxes, with certain securities exempt from federal, state and local income taxes). In addition, federal and/ or state capital gains taxes may apply to investments that are sold at a profit. Eaton Vance does not provide tax or legal advice. Prospective investors should consult with a tax or legal advisor before making any investment decision.
 Management
Biography


Cynthia J. Clemson
Vice President, Co-Director of Municipal Investments, Eaton Vance Management
Joined Eaton Vance 1985


Cynthia Clemson is a vice president of Eaton Vance Management, co-director of municipal investments and portfolio manager on Eaton Vance’s municipal bond team. She is responsible for buy and sell decisions, portfolio construction and risk managemen t for the firm’s municipal bond strategies. Cindy began her career in the investment management industry with Eaton Vance in 1985.
Cindy earned a B.A. from Mount Holyoke College and an MBA from Boston University. She is a member of the Boston Municipal Analysts Forum, the Boston Security Analysts Society, the Municipal Bond Buyer Conference and the National Federation of Municipal A nalysts.


Education

B.A. Mount Holyoke College
M.B.A. Graduate School of Management, Boston University


Experience

Managed Fund since 2014




Other funds managed

Michigan Municipal Bond Fund
Michigan Municipal Income Trust
Municipal Bond Fund II
Municipal Income Trust
National Municipal Opportunities Trust
Ohio Municipal Bond Fund
Ohio Municipal Income Trust


 




 
Literature
Literature

Fact Sheet
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 31, 2017



Commentary
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 31, 2017



Annual Report
Download
 - Last updated: Sep 30, 2016



Holdings-1st or 3rd fiscal quarters-www.sec.gov
Download




Eaton Vance municipal funds' holdings in Puerto Rico debt
Download
 - Last updated: May 5, 2017



Auction Preferred Shares Market Update
Download
 - Last updated: Sep 23, 2016



Morningstar EIM Fact Sheet
Download




Eaton Vance Closed-End Municipal Bond Funds Fund Data Now Available
Download
 - Last updated: Apr 24, 2014



Eaton Vance Closed-End Municipal Bond Funds Fund Data Now Available
Download
 - Last updated: Jan 21, 2014



Eaton Vance Closed-End Municipal Bond Funds Fund Data Now Available
Download
 - Last updated: Nov 20, 2013



Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds Adopt Share Repurchase Programs
Download
 - Last updated: Nov 15, 2013



Eaton Vance Closed-End Municipal Bond Funds Fund Data Now Available
Download
 - Last updated: Jul 16, 2013



Eaton Vance Closed-End Municipal Bond Funds Fund Data Now Available
Download
 - Last updated: Feb 4, 2013



Eaton Vance Closed-End Municipal Bond Funds Fund Data Now Available
Download
 - Last updated: Jan 24, 2011



Eaton Vance Closed-End Municipal Bond Funds Fund Data Now Available
Download
 - Last updated: Nov 9, 2010



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Jul 3, 2017



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Jun 1, 2017



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: May 1, 2017



Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income Information
Download
 - Last updated: Apr 30, 2017



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Apr 3, 2017



Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income Information
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 31, 2017



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 1, 2017



Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income Information
Download
 - Last updated: Feb 28, 2017



Distributions Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Feb 1, 2017



Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income Information
Download
 - Last updated: Jan 31, 2017



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Jan 3, 2017



Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income Information
Download
 - Last updated: Dec 31, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Dec 1, 2016



Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income Information
Download
 - Last updated: Nov 30, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Nov 1, 2016



Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income Information
Download
 - Last updated: Oct 31, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Oct 3, 2016



Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income Information
Download
 - Last updated: Sep 30, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Sep 1, 2016



Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income Information
Download
 - Last updated: Aug 31, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Aug 1, 2016



Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income Information
Download
 - Last updated: Jul 31, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Jul 1, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Jun 1, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: May 2, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Apr 1, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 1, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Feb 1, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Jan 4, 2016



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Dec 1, 2015



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Nov 2, 2015



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Oct 1, 2015



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Sep 1, 2015



Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Download
 - Last updated: Aug 3, 2015



Eaton Vance Closed-End Municipal Bond Funds Fund Data Now Available
Download
 - Last updated: Jan 16, 2015



Eaton Vance Closed-End Municipal Bond Funds Fund Data Now Available
Download
 - Last updated: Oct 20, 2014



Eaton Vance Closed-End Municipal Bond Funds Fund Data Now Available
Download
 - Last updated: Jul 30, 2014



Eaton Vance Closed-End Municipal Bond Funds Fund Data Now Available
Download
 - Last updated: May 1, 2013



Section 16 Filings - www.sec.gov
Download
 - Last updated: Jun 30, 2011



Semi-Annual Report
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 31, 2017












 

Access Advisor Resources
Get exclusive access to timely materials:

Eaton Vance Thought Leadership
Insights and Conference Calls
Notifications of Document Updates

Sign In
    or Register 




 
Related Content
Eaton Vance municipal funds' holdings in Puerto Rico debtMay 5, 2017Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income InformationApr 30, 2017Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income InformationMar 31, 2017Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income InformationFeb 28, 2017Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income InformationJan 31, 2017Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income InformationDec 31, 2016Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income InformationNov 30, 2016Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income InformationOct 31, 2016Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income InformationSep 30, 2016Auction Preferred Shares Market UpdateSep 23, 2016Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income InformationAug 31, 2016Closed-End Fund Earnings Undistributed Net Income InformationJul 31, 2016Morningstar EIM Fact SheetAug 5, 2011Section 16 Filings - www.sec.govJun 30, 2011 
Find Other Products

Spotlight Products
Global Macro Absolute Return Advantage Fund
Municipal Opportunities Fund
Atlanta Capital Select Equity Fund
Floating-Rate Municipal Income Fund
High Yield Municipal Income Fund
National Municipal Income Fund
Short Duration Strategic Income Fund
Global Macro Absolute Return Fund
Balanced Fund
TABS Short-Term Municipal Bond Fund
TABS Intermediate-Term Municipal Bond Fund
Multisector Income Fund
Parametric Emerging Markets Fund
High Income Opportunities Fund
Income Fund of Boston
Parametric International Equity Fund
Floating-Rate & High Income Fund
Floating-Rate Advantage Fund
Floating-Rate Fund
Tax-Managed Growth Fund 1.2
TABS 5-to-15 Year Laddered Municipal Bond Fund
Richard Bernstein All Asset Strategy Fund
Richard Bernstein Equity Strategy Fund


Products listed in the Find Other Products section may have different investment objective(s), risks, and charges and expenses.

 








Twitter @EatonVance
Eaton Vance on LinkedIn
Eaton Vanceon Facebook
Subscriptions
EmailPrint
Site Survey






Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.



Remember Me



I Do Not Accept
Ok




Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.


I Do Not Accept
Ok





 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-800-836-2414. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this Eaton Vance website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-800-836-2414.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. Your subscriptions can be managed on your profile page. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all Eaton Vance email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Simply enter your e-mail address to register.


Company Email:


Cancel
Already have an account? Sign In.

If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Register for more access and control.

Elevate your business practice with materials from the Advisor Institute.
Learn more with exclusive videos, conference calls, and the latest insights.
Follow products, get product notifications, and manage your Eaton Vance communications.












Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from Eaton Vance.
Here's the link:Municipal Bond Fund (EIM)
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://funds.eatonvance.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 






Site Disclaimer


You are about to enter the   website for .


This is your selected location and role:





This is your selected location:



Please select your role:







I Do Not Accept
I Accept






Disclaimer


The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
By clicking the box below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the Fund (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes).

GENERAL DISCLAIMER
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.
This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.
Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, administrative and service contracts, and other risks.
QIAIF DISCLAIMER
The Fund is an umbrella fund of the Eaton Vance Institutional Funds plc (the "Company"), a public limited company with variable capital with segregated liability between sub-funds incorporated in Ireland pursuant to the Companies Acts. The Company is authorised and regulated by the Central Bank of Ireland as a Qualified Investors Alternative Investment Fund (QIAIF) and solely intended for Qualified Investors (as defined in the Fund prospectus).
The Fund is currently authorised in Ireland only and as a QIAIF the Company may apply for recognition by other EU Member States. The QIAIF mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some countries.
This website is not intended to distribute or offer or solicit the sale of shares or units in the Fund and any jurisdiction in which such distribution, or offer or solicitation would be considered contrary to local law or regulation.
            


I Do Not Accept
I Accept




























Products | Eaton Vance Funds


























































Use of cookies by Eaton Vance Management (International) LimitedWe use cookies to deliver our online services. Details and instructions on how to disable those cookies are set out here. By continuing to use this website you agree to our use of our cookies unless you have disabled them.accept cookies














Go to:


Eaton Vance U.S. Home

Eaton Vance U.S. HomeU.S Institutions HomeEaton Vance U.S. FundsU.S. Charitable HomeOffshore HomeGlobal Home













InvestorAccount Access 
Investment Professional Sign In







 
 Products













Twitter @EatonVance
Eaton Vance on LinkedIn
Eaton Vanceon Facebook
FAs: Register
Subscriptions
EmailPrint






Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.



Remember Me



I Do Not Accept
Ok




Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.


I Do Not Accept
Ok





 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-800-836-2414. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this Eaton Vance website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-800-836-2414.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. Your subscriptions can be managed on your profile page. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all Eaton Vance email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Simply enter your e-mail address to register.


Company Email:


Cancel
Already have an account? Sign In.

If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Register for more access and control.

Elevate your business practice with materials from the Advisor Institute.
Learn more with exclusive videos, conference calls, and the latest insights.
Follow products, get product notifications, and manage your Eaton Vance communications.












Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from Eaton Vance.
Here's the link:Products
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://funds.eatonvance.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 






Site Disclaimer


You are about to enter the   website for .


This is your selected location and role:





This is your selected location:



Please select your role:







I Do Not Accept
I Accept






Disclaimer


The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
By clicking the box below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the Fund (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes).

GENERAL DISCLAIMER
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.
This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.
Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, administrative and service contracts, and other risks.
QIAIF DISCLAIMER
The Fund is an umbrella fund of the Eaton Vance Institutional Funds plc (the "Company"), a public limited company with variable capital with segregated liability between sub-funds incorporated in Ireland pursuant to the Companies Acts. The Company is authorised and regulated by the Central Bank of Ireland as a Qualified Investors Alternative Investment Fund (QIAIF) and solely intended for Qualified Investors (as defined in the Fund prospectus).
The Fund is currently authorised in Ireland only and as a QIAIF the Company may apply for recognition by other EU Member States. The QIAIF mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some countries.
This website is not intended to distribute or offer or solicit the sale of shares or units in the Fund and any jurisdiction in which such distribution, or offer or solicitation would be considered contrary to local law or regulation.
            


I Do Not Accept
I Accept


























Looking at Eaton Vance Pennsylvania Municipal Bond Fund (EIP)'s Levels

































  Titres
                

Kashyap, Prannoy enter semifinals 
Bank Of New York Mellon Corporation 
Trump appears to demand for Clinton, Comey probes 
Massive US bomb death toll rises to 94 
Fire engulfs Bellagio roof, Las Vegas Strip temporarily shut down 
Kate Middleton and Prince William in love at the Stade de France 
Thailand seizes rhino horns in random luggage check 


























Nouvelles
Financer Culture Science Sport Monde Santé Nationale 




Financer
Culture
Science
Sport
Monde
Santé
Nationale


 


Looking at Eaton Vance Pennsylvania Municipal Bond Fund (EIP)'s Levels
Evrard Martin
Juillet 21, 2017



Part












Looking at shares from some additional technical standpoints, Eaton Vance New Jersey Municipal Income Trust (EVJ) presently has a 14-day Commodity Channel Index (CCI) of 145.95. One analyst has rated the stock with a sell rating, four have assigned a hold rating and two have assigned a buy rating to the stock. On the other end of the spectrum, a younger investor with a longer time horizon might be able to search for stocks with a higher potential for growth that may involve much more risk.
EV has been the topic of a number of recent analyst reports. Zacks Investment Research upgraded Eaton Vance Corporation from a "hold" rating to a "buy" rating and set a $54.00 target price on the stock in a research report on Thursday, June 8th. Moreover, Fifth Third Natl Bank has 0% invested in Eaton V.Tax-Advantaged Dividend Inc Fund (NYSE:EVT). Vident Investment Advisory Llc, a Georgia-based fund reported 546,504 shares.#img1#.COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: This piece was originally reported by BBNS and is the property of of BBNS. If you are reading this piece of content on another website, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of USA and worldwide copyright & trademark laws. The legal version of this article can be accessed at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/20/eaton-vance-corporation-nyseev-given-average-rating-of-hold-by-brokerages-updated-updated.html.Eaton Vance Corporation (EV) opened at 48.21 on Monday.We can also take a look at the Average Directional Index or ADX of Eaton Vance Tax-Managed Buy-Write Income Fund (ETB). The company has market cap of $633.01 million.Company chares are trading at $20.48 barely below $20.52, the stock's 50 day moving average and just above the 200 day moving average of $19.92. CENTRAL TRUST Co boosted its stake in Eaton Vance Corporation by 6,356.9% in the first quarter. The company had revenue of $374.60 million during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $373.28 million. Eaton Vance Corporation had a return on equity of 36.63% and a net margin of 18.39%. During the same quarter previous year, the business posted $0.48 EPS. Shares saw a steep decrease in trading volume of 75.31% under the normal average daily volume. The stock now has Monthly Volatility of 4.29% and Weekly Volatility of 2.83%.The firm also recently declared a monthly dividend, which will be paid on Thursday, July 20th. Shareholders of record on Monday, July 31st will be issued a dividend of $0.28 per share. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Thursday, July 27th. The dividend yield will be $4.11. Eaton Vance Corporation's payout ratio is 49.34%. A reading from -80 to -100 would indicate an oversold situation. The transaction was disclosed in a document filed with the SEC, which is available at this link. Inside the closing six months period the stock's performance raised 2.19% while overall yearly performance lost -9.46%. The disclosure for this sale can be found here.Want to see what other hedge funds are holding EV? Invesco Limited has invested 0% in Eaton Vance Tax-Managed Buy-Write Income (NYSE:ETB). United Asset Strategies Inc., a New York-based fund reported 130,017 shares. Following the completion of the transaction, the director now owns 14,473 shares of the company's stock, valued at approximately $701,361.58. Teachers Advisors LLC increased its position in shares of Eaton Vance Corporation by 1.9% in the fourth quarter. Norges Bank acquired a new position in shares of Eaton Vance Corporation during the fourth quarter valued at about $43,128,000. TrimTabs Asset Management LLC now owns 2,705 shares of the asset manager's stock worth $122,000 after buying an additional 1,272 shares in the last quarter. CENTRAL TRUST Co now owns 3,293 shares of the asset manager's stock valued at $148,000 after buying an additional 3,242 shares during the period.Shares of Eaton Vance California Municipal Bond Fund II (EIA) have a 200-day moving average of 11.87. In the PRB, the Company owns and operates three surface coal mines: the Antelope Mine, the Cordero Rojo Mine and the Spring Creek Mine. This may not come as easily for some as it does for others.

 




D'autres rapports CampDesrEcrues 









21 Juillet 2017




Government Properties Income Tr (NASDAQ:GOV) Experiences Heavy Trading Volume









21 Juillet 2017




No need for new law against cow vigilantism







Which Analysts Are Watching American Eagle Outfitters, Inc. (NYSE:AEO)?











21 Juillet 2017




Corning Incorporated (GLW) Lifted to "Strong-Buy" at Vetr Inc









21 Juillet 2017




Meizu teases Meizu Pro 7; shows dual display and camera









21 Juillet 2017




Udonis Haslem re-signs with Heat on 1-year deal









United Microelectronics Corporation (NYSE:UMC) Quarterly Sales Review









21 Juillet 2017




" La guerre contre la corruption est réelle, et non sélective " — Youssef Chahed







Altria Group (NYSE:MO) Set to Announce Quarterly Earnings on Thursday











21 Juillet 2017




Love Island 2017: Gabby Allen cuts ties with Montana Brown









21 Juillet 2017




Jordan Spieth and Brooks Koepka share opening-round lead at The Open









21 Juillet 2017




Four More Fighters Confirmed for Marvel VS Capcom: Infinite









Articles récents Nouvelles


 
19-year-old firefighter killed by falling tree in Montana




 
ECB's Draghi Sees No Sign Of Inflation Picking-Up In Europe




 
Murkowski: Can't repeal ACA without acceptable replacement




Discuter de cet article








 LES PLUS LUS CampDesrEcrues



Duke Realty Corporation (DRE) Upgraded at BidaskClub



One man arrested, weapons seized following threats made to kill BC firefighters



CAUGHT ON CAMERA: Bakersfield city firefighters rescue dog from house fire



Teens filmed, mocked and laughed while man slowly drowned



Corey Knebel's MLB-record streak ends as he blows save against Pirates



YouTube will redirect you away from extremist videos



Edinburgh City Deal to bring £65m of housing investment to the region



CH Robinson Worldwide, Inc. (NASDAQ:CHRW) Experiences Heavier than Average Trading Volume


Senate makes U-turn, screens 12 REC nominees


Tetra Tech, Inc. (TTEK) Receives $47.50 Average Price Target from Analysts







SUIVRE NOTRE JOURNAL











DERNIERES NOUVELLES CampDesrEcrues



 
Kashyap, Prannoy enter semifinals


Bank Of New York Mellon Corporation


Trump appears to demand for Clinton, Comey probes


Cedar Fair, LP (FUN) Given Average Rating of "Buy" by Analysts


Deutsche Post AG (DPSGY) Receives $41.00 Consensus Target Price from Analysts


(Neb)-Smoke From Montana Fires Reaches The Panhandle


Helicopter carrying 4 makes emergency landing in Sherman Oaks neighborhood


Citigroup Reports Southern (EOG) Downgrade from Buy; Cafepress (PRSS) Sentiment Is 1.43


Company Recalls Coffee With Viagra-Like Substance


10-year-old allegedly steals vehicle for the 4th time







AUTRES NOUVELLES


Science
Culture
Financer








Koninklijke Philips N.V. had 13 analyst reports since July 28, 2015 ac...








In related news, Director John C. Malone acquired 242,778 shares of  L...









There's a change behind the scenes at  Netflix's   Marvel  drama  Iron...








More notable recent  Synchrony Financial  (NYSE:SYF) news were publish...








Metzner was previously an exec producer for Fox's " Sleepy Hollow " an...












Flockhart was one of the main cast members when the show was on CBS, b...









Qu'il se rassure,  George ,  troisième dans l'ordre de succession au t...









Rivlin expressed his appreciation for Israel's security forces, saying...









Bennington and the  Soundgarden  singer were practically family, so  i...









A true genius, he's devised an intricate plan to fix all that he deems...












He said: "The dark net is not a place to hide".    Dimitris Avramopoul...









Stuart appeared to take particular exception to an incident in which S...









When officers arrived, they found a 27-year-old male cyclist in the st...








BlackRock Inc. now owns 10,553,819 shares of the business services pro...








BidaskClub upgraded shares of Syntel from a "strong sell" rating to a ...
























© 2017 campdesrecrues.com, CampDesrEcrues




Sport
Science
Culture
Financer


Nationale
Santé
Monde





Edition

Nos Contacts











Eaton Vance Municipal Bond Fund Declares Monthly Dividend of $0.05 (EIM)



























 
							Dimanche, 23 Juillet 2017							
							

Informations de contact 








 

 




Latest news

Bicyclist fatally struck by garbage truck that left scene in Brooklyn
Vantiv, Inc. (VNTV) Shares Bought by UBS Group AG
Electronic Arts Inc. (NASDAQ:EA) Position Decreased by Manning & Napier Advisors LLC
Blue Apron Holdings Inc




Main » Eaton Vance Municipal Bond Fund Declares Monthly Dividend of $0.05 (EIM)


Eaton Vance Municipal Bond Fund Declares Monthly Dividend of $0.05 (EIM)
18 Juillet 2017



Naples Glob owns 28,455 shares. Active investors may choose to use this technical indicator as a stock evaluation tool. Eaton Vance Tax-Advantaged Global Divide (ETO) has risen 15.98% since July 17, 2016 and is uptrending. Arizona State Retirement owns 55,731 shares for 0.03% of their portfolio. Wells Fargo & Company MN boosted its stake in shares of Eaton Vance Corporation by 1.8% in the first quarter. Citigroup upgraded the stock to "Buy" rating in Monday, June 5 report. Retail Bank Of America Corp De holds 1.41M shares. Eaton Vance Mgmt invested in 46,153 shares.05/22/2014 - Eaton Vance Floating Rate Income Trust had its " rating reiterated by analysts at RBC Capital. The 14-day RSI is presently standing at 67.96, the 7-day is 76.15, and the 3-day is resting at 91.78. The Fund's portfolio includes its investments in various sectors, such as aerospace and defense, banks, beverages, biotechnology, chemicals, commercial services and supplies, containers and packaging, diversified telecommunication services, electric utilities, electrical equipment, energy equipment and services, equity real estate investment trusts, food products, healthcare equipment and supplies, household durables, household products, industrial conglomerates, insurance, Internet and direct marketing retail, Internet software and services, machinery, metals and mining, personal products, pharmaceuticals, professional services, and road and rail.About 53,201 shares traded. Eaton Vance Corp.is now trading 1.07% above its 20-day and 11.74% versus the 200-day simple moving averages while 3.10% compared with its 50-day simple moving average. Eaton Vance Tax Managed Buy Write Opport has a 12 month low of $14.10 and a 12 month high of $15.69. It has a 19.4 P/E ratio. Seaward Mngmt Lp reported 18,194 shares. After having $0.28 EPS previously, SP Plus Corp's analysts see 50.00% EPS growth. The firm's revenue for the quarter was up 15.9% on a year-over-year basis. Now Eaton Vance Corp.'s current price is $6.29 shy of the official highest sell-side analyst price target on Wall Street.The company also recently declared a monthly dividend, which will be paid on Monday, July 31st. This represents a $0.54 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 3.95%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Thursday, July 20th. Eaton Vance Corporation's dividend payout ratio is now 49.34%. Eaton Vance Municipal Income Trust (EVN) has declined 9.43% since July 17, 2016 and is downtrending. If you are accessing this article on another domain, it was copied illegally and reposted in violation of US & global trademark & copyright laws. Cambridge Research Advsrs reported 0.02% of its portfolio in Eaton Vance Short Duration Diversified I (NYSE:EVG).
Technicals on Watch For iShares 1-3 Year Credit Bond ETF (CSJ)
The Average Directional Index or ADX is technical analysis indicator used to discern if a market is trending or not trending. The Williams Percent Range or Williams %R is another technical indicator that may be useful for traders and investors.
Among 2 analysts covering SP Plus (NASDAQ:SP), 2 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 0 Hold.About 41,239 shares traded or 0.63% up from the average. Morgan Stanley now owns 957 shares valued at $22,000. The transaction was disclosed in a document filed with the SEC, which can be accessed through this hyperlink.We can also do some further technical analysis on the stock. It increased, as 8 investors sold Northfield Bancorp, Inc. shares while 30 reduced holdings. Creative Planning claims 16,964 shares valued at $193,000. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. The Trust invests in debt securities issued by OH municipalities.




Related articles




Trump apre uno spiraglio sul clima dimensione font +


With Shares Trading down at $13.89 (GPK) Graphic Packaging Completes Acquisition…




Uber Shirks Its Duty to Drivers


BidaskClub Lowers SK Telecom Co., Ltd. (NYSE:SKM) to Hold




Australia to get new 'Home Office' style national security department


Bright Horizons Family Solutions Inc


Expeditors International of Washington Inc


Altice USA Inc (ATUS) Earns Buy Rating from Analysts at Guggenheim




Turkey marks first anniversary of failed coup


Morgan Stanley Upgrades Comp En De Mn Cemig ADS (CIG) to "Overweight"




Share !


 



Previous: Calabar: Over 10 Persons Confirmed Dead In NNPC Tank Farm Explosion
Next: Atlanta Braves activate Sean Rodriguez, Danny Santana from DL







 Advertising
 


 


More news	






Flash flood warning July 17 for Williams





Van Dijk Star Ready to Sign for Liverpool by Doing This





Turkey Extends State of Emergency





Hungary: Removing anti-Soros campaign ahead of Netanyahu visit 'not our business'


Sunoco (SUN) Getting Somewhat Positive Media Coverage, Analysis Finds





Trump's lawyer falsely implicates Secret Service in latest Trump Jr. meeting spin


FDA Approves Nerlynx for HER2-Positive Breast Cancer Treatment





Calabar: Over 10 Persons Confirmed Dead In NNPC Tank Farm Explosion





Trump lawyer says nothing illegal in son's Russia meeting


Atlanta Braves activate Sean Rodriguez, Danny Santana from DL





Crotty signs New Zealand extension


Sandvine accepts $562 mln offer from Francisco, Procera





Minister warns of Israel's persistence in violating Al-Aqsa Mosque's sanctity





Former BYU, Olympic sprinter Frank Fredericks suspended for potential ethics violation





Manhunt for murder suspect extends into popular Wyoming wilderness areas



 






 






	
    Copyright © 2017 Cote-Ivoire |     All rights reserved.

	
		
















Eaton Vance Tax-Advantaged Glob (ETG) Saw a 52-Week High































Home » 
Markets




Eaton Vance Tax-Advantaged Glob (ETG) Saw a 52-Week High




				 18 July, 2017,  05:16 | Author: Terri Saunders			













Eaton Vance Tax-Advantage Globa shares had a trading volume of 38K in the last trading session. Us Commercial Bank De owns 28 shares for 0% of their portfolio. Commonwealth Equity owns 72,894 shares or 0.01% of their U.S. portfolio. As of quarter end Next Financial Group, Inc had bought 1,000 shares growing its position 34.5%. Citigroup upgraded the stock to "Buy" rating in Monday, June 5 report.Currently, the 14-day ADX for Eaton Vance Ohio Municipal Bond Fund (EIO) is sitting at 50.75. Additionally, Eaton Vance Corp.05/22/2014 - Eaton Vance Floating Rate Income Trust had its " rating reiterated by analysts at RBC Capital. The Fund's portfolio includes its investments in various sectors, such as aerospace and defense, banks, beverages, biotechnology, chemicals, commercial services and supplies, containers and packaging, diversified telecommunication services, electric utilities, electrical equipment, energy equipment and services, equity real estate investment trusts, food products, healthcare equipment and supplies, household durables, household products, industrial conglomerates, insurance, Internet and direct marketing retail, Internet software and services, machinery, metals and mining, personal products, pharmaceuticals, professional services, and road and rail.Deep diving into the technical levels for Eaton Vance Michigan Municipal Income Trust (EMI), we note that the equity now has a 14-day Commodity Channel Index (CCI) of 33.44. The company has a 50-day moving average of $15.15 and a 200-day moving average of $15.11. The asset manager reported $0.62 earnings per share for the quarter, beating the consensus estimate of $0.60 by $0.02. Now Eaton Vance Corp.'s current price is $6.29 shy of the official highest sell-side analyst price target on Wall Street. It has a 24.22 P/E ratio. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Thursday, July 20th.TRADEMARK VIOLATION WARNING: "Eaton Vance Ohio Municipal Income Trust to Issue Monthly Dividend of $0.05 (EVO)" was published by Stock Observer and is the property of of Stock Observer. This represents a $0.83 annualized dividend and a yield of 5.43%. If you are accessing this piece on another publication, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of US & worldwide trademark & copyright legislation. The value of the company's investment in Eaton Vance Tax-Advantaged Glob increased from $148,000 to $224,000 increasing 51.4% for the reporting period.
Archer-Daniels-Midland Company (NYSE:ADM) Stock Sees The Needle Move 0.58%
					Telemus Capital Llc decreased Government Pptys Income Tr (NYSE:GOV) stake by 25,000 shares to 66,200 valued at $1.26M in 2016Q4.  With 1.48M avg volume, 1 days are for Keysight Tech Incorporated (NYSE:KEYS)'s short sellers to cover KEYS's short positions.
					Among 2 analysts covering SP Plus (NASDAQ:SP), 2 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 0 Hold. Earnest Ltd Liability Corp holds 3,800 shares or 0% of its portfolio. Going from the most negative analyst price target to above consensus is one thing.In other Eaton Vance Corporation news, Director Dorothy E. Puhy sold 2,563 shares of the company's stock in a transaction that occurred on Tuesday, June 6th. A certain stock may be considered to be on an uptrend if trading above a moving average and the average is sloping upward. Following the completion of the transaction, the director now owns 14,473 shares in the company, valued at approximately $701,361.58. About 16,748 shares traded.Currently, the 14-day ADX for Eaton Vance Michigan Municipal Income Trust (EMI) is sitting at 42.88. The Company operates as an investment advisor to funds and separate accounts.Eaton Vance Senior Income Trust is a diversified closed-end management investment company.

 

Recommended:









18 July 2017




Punjab law minister honours 1st anniversary of coup in Turkey
				The attempt was carried out by a faction within the Turkish Armed Forces that organised themselves as the Peace at Home Council. Erdogan accuses Gülen of being behind the coup-a claim that Gülen denies-and accused the United States of harbouring him.			






Navios Maritime Holdings (NM) Earning Negative Press Coverage, Analysis Finds
				Movements above 70 are interpreted as indicating overbought conditions; conversely moves underneath 30 notify oversold conditions. To measure price-variation, we found NM's volatility during a week at 7.62% and during a month it has been found around 8.19%.			








18 July 2017




North Koreans hit hard by sanctions, report says
				The reason for this - mutually assured destruction (MAD) - still applies, especially to vulnerable North Korea. Once again, she highlighted that her return to North Korea was based on her own will and choice.			










18 July 2017




Casino Ship Hits Sandbar In Goa, 4 Crew Members Rescued
				The Indian Coast Guard carried out medical evacuation of four patients from a vessel off Panjim coast in Goa on Sunday morning. The Indian coast guard had to rescue 4 of the 19 crew members that were on board the vessel, one of whom was injured.			








18 July 2017




Israel's closure of Al-Aqsa Mosque a serious precedent: OIC
				Temple Mount was temporarily closed off after two officers were killed in an attack by three Arab-Israeli gunmen there. Israeli authorities announced the complete closure of the compound and banned Muslims and Arabs from entering it.			








18 July 2017




Uber drivers can now receive tips
				Uber is celebrating the national launch by matching all tips on rides taken Tuesday, July 18. They will now have the option to tip directly in the app up to 30 days after each trip.			










18 July 2017




Francia: 241 cavalli sfilano per Macron e Trump © Ansa
				I nostri disaccordi riguardo l'accordo di Parigi sul clima sono legati anche ad impegni di campagna elettorale presi da Trump ".			








18 July 2017




Virgil van Dijk Bid Reportedly Considered by Arsenal Amid Liverpool Rumours
				It remains to be seen whether Van Dijk's apparent desire to move to Anfield will secure him a move to Merseyside this summer. Wenger is also looking to boost his defence and is considering making a £45m bid for Southampton's Holland global van Dijk.			






Here is What Institutional Investors Think About Cintas Corp (NASDAQ:CTAS)
				The stock of Cintas Corporation (NASDAQ:CTAS) earned "Sector Perform" rating by RBC Capital Markets on Tuesday, December 22. Pittenger And Anderson reported 0.19% stake. 16,041 are owned by Cohen Klingenstein Limited Liability Company.			








Janus Capital Management LLC Purchases 895591 Shares of NVIDIA Corporation (NASDAQ:NVDA)
				Nvidia Corporation focuses on personal computer graphics, graphics processing unit (GPU) and also on artificial intelligence (AI).  Floating stock is calculated by subtracting closely-held shares and restricted stock from a firm's total outstanding shares.			








18 July 2017




7.7 ocean quake triggers tsunami warnings for Russian Federation 
				Hazardous tsunamis were possible for coasts located within 300km of the natural disaster epicentre, it warned. Download the News Nation Mobile App and stay connected with top stories from India and around the world.			








18 July 2017




Turkey wants to extend state of emergency
				The proposal was submitted to parliament shortly after starting a session of the national security council chaired by President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.			





















Popular





(GPK) Shares now down at $13.89 Graphic Packaging Announces Release Date…

		Fortaleza Asset Management Inc decreased Graphic Packaging Holding Company ( GPK ) stake by 65.41% reported in 2016Q4 SEC filing. It increased, as 23 investors sold GPK shares while 88 reduced holdings. 38 funds opened positions while 57 raised stakes.  
		

Vehicle  belonging to triple homicide 'person of interest' found in Wyoming

		Police say Bullinger is about 6 feet 1 inch tall, weighs about 240 pounds and has gray hair and brown eyes. It's not clear whether Bullinger's wife and girlfriend knew about each other.  
		

'It' Director Andy Muschietti Set To Helm 'Robotech' For Sony

		Muschietti's producing partner (and sister) Barbara Muschietti will produce the film alongside Gianni Nunnari and Mark Canton. The studio previously courted James Wan to direct the potential franchise before the filmmaker committed to Aquaman .  
		

Turkey Extends State-of-Emergency Rule for Another 3 Months

		According to the Turkish constitution, a state of emergency can be declared for a maximum period of six months. The ruling Justice and Development Party (AKP), however, had a comfortable majority to pass the bill.  
		

Siete millones de venezolanos votaron contra Maduro

		La jornada en la ciudad estuvo acompañada por 40 personas en la logística y siete observadores internacionales . La más fuerte presencia de la colonia venezolana se registró en el Cercado de Lima y en Miraflores.  
		

USTR to seek "appropriate mechanism" in NAFTA on currency manipulation

		The Trump administration said it was seeking to reduce the U.S. trade deficit by renegotiating the terms of NAFTA . Both countries, in addition to the US , are signors to the 1994 NAFTA trade deal.  
		

OCS rate complètement la diffusion en france — Game of Thrones

		Un rendez-vous très attendu, qui a rassemblé à nouveau, des millions de téléspectateurs sur la chaîne américaine HBO . Voici tout ce que vous devez savoir sur " Dragonstone ", comprenant les endroits où et quand et comment le regarder.  
		

No Respite for Tripura From Rail-Road Blockade, IPFT To Continue Agitation

		The IPFT is of the opinion that the state should communicate with the Centre regarding their demand and fulfill it accordingly. The agitation which entered its seventh day on Sunday has affected the supply of essentials, including food grain and fuel.  
		

Extra cash in school budgets in funding shake-up

		The Liberal Democrat education spokeswoman Layla Moran said: "This is a desperate attempt to pull the wool over people's eyes".  
		

Federer, Muguruza attend Wimbledon Champions Ball

		After that game, Cilic walked back to his changeover chair and broke down, tearing up as he covered his head with his white towel. Cilic dropped the set 6-1 and called a medical timeout to have his left foot bandaged and take a painkiller.  
		







 


Latest






Dems want scrutiny of Ivanka Trump over Kushner's Russian contacts




Air quality in Calgary poses high risk as wildfire smoke settles




Trump Tweets 'That's Politics!' About Son's Meeting With Russian Lawyer




Atari working on a retro video game console of its own




Man Accused Of Throwing Toddler Into Traffic Set To Appear In Court




Traders Purchase High Volume of Put Options on Freeport-McMoran (NYSE:FCX)




Independent Bank Group, Inc (IBTX) Shares Sold by Ameriprise Financial Inc




Van Strum & Towne Inc. Cuts Position in Dow Chemical Company (The) (DOW)




Domino's Pizza Inc (NYSE:DPZ) Position Reduced by Nuveen Asset Management LLC




Venkaiah Naidu declared as NDA's candidate for Vice President's post







Tendencies






Vantiv, Inc. Shares See a Change of -1.43% This Week




LASIEC: Why Lagos LG election was delayed




McIlroy 'ecstatic' as Open revival continues




German automakers may have colluded over diesel emissions treatment systems: Spiegel




Gilead Sciences' (GILD) "Market Perform" Rating Reiterated at Leerink Swann








 







 



Eaton Vance Management | Eaton Vance














































Use of cookies by Eaton Vance Management (International) LimitedWe use cookies to deliver our online services. Details and instructions on how to disable those cookies are set out here. By continuing to use this website you agree to our use of our cookies unless you have disabled them.accept cookies













Investment Professional Sign In

Select Site
Select


 
Select your region / country and role.





GO
















EATON VANCE CORP.

INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS

FINANCIAL ADVISORS

INSTITUTIONAL INVESTORS



























Anticipating the challenges of today's markets and delivering investment solutions since 1924 
Fast-changing markets require dynamic thinking and forward-looking solutions. Eaton Vance has a longstanding reputation as a leading developer of innovative strategies with strong investment merit.

Learn More About Eaton Vance




US Global Home Page Solutions Teaser
View solutions for:






Pursue success.
Eaton Vance sponsors a broad lineupof mutual funds, closed-end fundsand separately managed accountsthat serve the unique needsof individual investors.

Learn More




US Global Home Page Solutions Teaser
View solutions for:






Pursuing clients' goals.
Eaton Vance is committed to providing financial advisors with the investment solutions and market intelligence they need to help pursue clients' changing goals.

Learn More




US Global Home Page Solutions Teaser
View solutions for:






Work with a trusted partner.
Eaton Vance has a long historyin serving institutional clientsand consultants across a broadarray of investment capabilities.

Learn More




US Global Home Page Solutions Teaser
View solutions for:

























 



Individual Investors/Advisors

Mutual Funds — Prices and Performance
Separately Managed Accounts
NextShares™ Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Investment Trusts (UITs)
Advisory Blog
Advisor Top-of-Mind Index (ATOMIX)
Impact



Institutional Investors 

Insights and Thought Leadership 
Investment Strategies 
Fixed-Income Investing 
Global Equity Solutions 
Floating-Rate Loans 
Multisector Bond 
Monthly Market Monitor

In the News

Video: The benefits of a bond ladderJuly 20, 2017Michael J. Sullivan, CFAInstitutional Portfolio ManagerEaton VanceAndrew  GoodaleInstitutional Portfolio ManagerEaton Vance











Our Investment Affiliates 
 






Visit EVM













Visit Parametric













Visit Atlanta Capital













Visit Hexavest













Visit Calvert Research and Management















Twitter @EatonVance
Eaton Vance on LinkedIn
FAs: Register
EmailPrint







Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.



Remember Me



I Do Not Accept
Ok




Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.


I Do Not Accept
Ok





 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-800-836-2414. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this Eaton Vance website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-800-836-2414.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. Your subscriptions can be managed on your profile page. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all Eaton Vance email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.










Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from Eaton Vance.
Here's the link:Home United States
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://global.eatonvance.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 






Site Disclaimer


You are about to enter the   website for .


This is your selected location and role:





This is your selected location:



Please select your role:







I Do Not Accept
I Accept






Disclaimer


The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
By clicking the box below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the Fund (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes).

GENERAL DISCLAIMER
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.
This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.
Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, administrative and service contracts, and other risks.
QIAIF DISCLAIMER
The Fund is an umbrella fund of the Eaton Vance Institutional Funds plc (the "Company"), a public limited company with variable capital with segregated liability between sub-funds incorporated in Ireland pursuant to the Companies Acts. The Company is authorised and regulated by the Central Bank of Ireland as a Qualified Investors Alternative Investment Fund (QIAIF) and solely intended for Qualified Investors (as defined in the Fund prospectus).
The Fund is currently authorised in Ireland only and as a QIAIF the Company may apply for recognition by other EU Member States. The QIAIF mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some countries.
This website is not intended to distribute or offer or solicit the sale of shares or units in the Fund and any jurisdiction in which such distribution, or offer or solicitation would be considered contrary to local law or regulation.
            


I Do Not Accept
I Accept














EIM Stock Price - Eaton Vance Municipal Bond Fund Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE MKT) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,580.07


-31.71


-0.15%











S&P 500

2,472.54


-0.91


-0.04%











Nasdaq

6,387.75


-2.25


-0.04%











GlobalDow

2,833.20


-8.47


-0.30%











Gold

1,261.10


9.00


0.72%











Oil

45.60


-1.32


-2.81%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



CTAS 
9.2




COF 
8.6




ETFC 
5.1




SYF 
4.5






HP
-5.5




ISRG
-4.6




HBAN
-4.4




CHK
-3.1














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








07/22

Updated
Trump says he has ‘complete power to pardon’



07/22

Lawmakers reach deal on Russia sanctions bill: reports



07/22

Alphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors



07/22

Updated
You can date someone who looks just like Donald Trump with this new online service 



07/22

Updated
Want to buy happiness? Splurge on these 5 things



07/22

This is what people really buy when they emotionally overspend (hint: it’s not designer clothes)



07/22

Updated
John McCain is a war hero — but think twice before saying he’s ‘battling’ cancer 



07/22

Updated
The dark side of cruises



07/22

Updated
I want to buy my brothers out of our family home — but they want me to pay (future) sales fees



07/22

Updated
O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


EIM


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
Amex

 



EIM
U.S.: NYSE MKT


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Eaton Vance Municipal Bond Fund

Watchlist 
CreateEIMAlert



  


Closed

Last Updated: Jul 21, 2017 4:02 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
12.81



-0.03
-0.23%






Previous Close




$12.84





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




87.94% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    101.6K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 115.6K
            





Open: 12.85
Close: 12.81



12.78
Day Low/High
12.85





Day Range



12.00
52 Week Low/High
14.16


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$12.85



Day Range
12.78 - 12.85



52 Week Range
12.00 - 14.16



Market Cap
n/a



Shares Outstanding
68.17M



Public Float
n/a



Beta
0.04



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
n/a



Yield
4.88%



Dividend
$0.05



Ex-Dividend Date
Jul 20, 2017



Short Interest
12.35K
06/30/17


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
115.55K




 


Performance




5 Day


0.16%







1 Month


0.23%







3 Month


1.18%







YTD


3.22%







1 Year


-8.04%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones




No Headlines Available










Closed-End Bond Funds: A Haven Amid Global Risk


Apr. 9, 2016 at 12:06 a.m. ET
on Barron's









Bond Funds Seek a Haven


Jun. 29, 2013 at 4:57 a.m. ET
on Barron's









Eaton Vance Lower Bar for Funds


Mar. 13, 2008 at 9:22 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Funds Use Leverage to Boost Returns


Nov. 1, 2002 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Nuveen Quality Muni Inc. Fund: Quality Still Shines?
Nuveen Quality Muni Inc. Fund: Quality Still Shines?

Jul. 21, 2017 at 3:36 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





MUI: Investment Opportunity For Investors On The Sidelines?
MUI: Investment Opportunity For Investors On The Sidelines?

Jul. 20, 2017 at 9:51 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hartford hires bankruptcy lawyers
Hartford hires bankruptcy lawyers

Jul. 6, 2017 at 2:18 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Moody's puts Illinois on review for downgrade to junk
Moody's puts Illinois on review for downgrade to junk

Jul. 5, 2017 at 4:39 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on municipal and taxable bond funds
Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on municipal and taxable bond funds

Jul. 5, 2017 at 12:44 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Municipal Bond Market Weekly - June 27, 2017
Municipal Bond Market Weekly - June 27, 2017

Jul. 3, 2017 at 3:45 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Q2 2017 Municipal Credit
Q2 2017 Municipal Credit

Jul. 1, 2017 at 7:19 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Illinois Senate minority leader to resign on July 1
Illinois Senate minority leader to resign on July 1

Jun. 29, 2017 at 3:36 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Illinois: 1st state with 'junk' credit?
Illinois: 1st state with 'junk' credit?

Jun. 25, 2017 at 8:36 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Illinois budget struggles ratchet higher
Illinois budget struggles ratchet higher

Jun. 21, 2017 at 12:15 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hope For The Best But Prepare For The Worst (With Gold And Munis)
Hope For The Best But Prepare For The Worst (With Gold And Munis)

Jun. 12, 2017 at 6:20 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





As Defaults Mount And Loom, It May Be Time To Dust Off Meredith Whitney's Analysis
As Defaults Mount And Loom, It May Be Time To Dust Off Meredith Whitney's Analysis

Jun. 12, 2017 at 9:37 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Muni Downgrades: Lessons From Illinois And Connecticut
Muni Downgrades: Lessons From Illinois And Connecticut

Jun. 5, 2017 at 6:54 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on municipal and taxable bond funds
Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on municipal and taxable bond funds

Jun. 2, 2017 at 4:34 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Muni Market Set For Wave Of Cash
Muni Market Set For Wave Of Cash

Jun. 1, 2017 at 10:32 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Sometimes It's Where You Don't Go
Sometimes It's Where You Don't Go

Jun. 1, 2017 at 8:58 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Kotok: 4% muni yields 'a gift' to high earners
Kotok: 4% muni yields 'a gift' to high earners

May. 19, 2017 at 12:11 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Fixed Income Market Views
Fixed Income Market Views

May. 18, 2017 at 6:43 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Connecticut credit rating downgraded at Fitch
Connecticut credit rating downgraded at Fitch

May. 12, 2017 at 2:21 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on muncipal and taxable bond funds
Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on muncipal and taxable bond funds

May. 5, 2017 at 1:48 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha









Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds

Jun. 1, 2017 at 4:56 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Mar. 1, 2017 at 5:46 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Feb. 1, 2017 at 3:51 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Jan. 3, 2017 at 3:50 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Dec. 1, 2016 at 4:22 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Nov. 1, 2016 at 4:25 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Oct. 3, 2016 at 4:04 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Sep. 1, 2016 at 4:54 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Sep. 1, 2016 at 4:54 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Aug. 1, 2016 at 4:56 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF








  



 
   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





MCD

-0.19%








GILD

0.46%








CMP

1.78%








BIDU

0.97%








LE

-1.12%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.













Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert



















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




4:04 AM EDT
July 23, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
5:12pTrump says he has ‘complete power to pardon’
5:08pLawmakers reach deal on Russia sanctions bill: reports
5:00pAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
3:30pYou can date someone who looks just like Donald Trump with this new online service 
3:29pWant to buy happiness? Splurge on these 5 things
3:28pThis is what people really buy when they emotionally overspend (hint: it’s not designer clothes)
2:40pJohn McCain is a war hero — but think twice before saying he’s ‘battling’ cancer 
2:38pThe dark side of cruises
2:37pI want to buy my brothers out of our family home — but they want me to pay (future) sales fees
2:35pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
2:34pNot even free money can make some people go to the gym 
2:34pHow real-estate TV shows determine what buyers look for in a house
2:34pWhat Eleanor Roosevelt and Helen Gurley Brown ate — and what we can learn from it 
2:33pNote to parents: This social network was rated the worst for teenage cyberbullying
2:33pIf, like Sean Spicer, you suddenly quit your job — what should you do next?
2:32pThis is the deadliest time of your life to put on weight
2:32p5 unfortunate reasons why millennials can’t have nice things (or save any money)
2:26pU.S. giving takeover bids by Chinese firms much tougher look
1:13pJared Kushner discloses dozens of additional assets in revised filing
12:51pBitcoin surges as miners avert split for now
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert



















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




4:04 AM EDT
July 23, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
5:12pTrump says he has ‘complete power to pardon’
5:08pLawmakers reach deal on Russia sanctions bill: reports
5:00pAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
3:30pYou can date someone who looks just like Donald Trump with this new online service 
3:29pWant to buy happiness? Splurge on these 5 things
3:28pThis is what people really buy when they emotionally overspend (hint: it’s not designer clothes)
2:40pJohn McCain is a war hero — but think twice before saying he’s ‘battling’ cancer 
2:38pThe dark side of cruises
2:37pI want to buy my brothers out of our family home — but they want me to pay (future) sales fees
2:35pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
2:34pNot even free money can make some people go to the gym 
2:34pHow real-estate TV shows determine what buyers look for in a house
2:34pWhat Eleanor Roosevelt and Helen Gurley Brown ate — and what we can learn from it 
2:33pNote to parents: This social network was rated the worst for teenage cyberbullying
2:33pIf, like Sean Spicer, you suddenly quit your job — what should you do next?
2:32pThis is the deadliest time of your life to put on weight
2:32p5 unfortunate reasons why millennials can’t have nice things (or save any money)
2:26pU.S. giving takeover bids by Chinese firms much tougher look
1:13pJared Kushner discloses dozens of additional assets in revised filing
12:51pBitcoin surges as miners avert split for now
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks/Country/United States Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert



















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Location: United States



Name
Exchange
Sector




01 Communique Laboratory Inc. (OCQLF)
OOTC
Software


1347 Property Insurance Holdings Inc. (PIH)
XNAS
Non-Life Insurance


1-800-FLOWERS.COM Inc. Cl A (FLWS)
XNAS
Specialty Retail


1pm Industries Inc. (OPMZ)
OOTC
Food Products


1st Capital Bank (CA) (FISB)
OOTC
Banking


1st Constitution Bancorp (FCCY)
XNAS
Banking


1st NRG Corp. (FNRC)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


1st Source Corp. (SRCE)
XNAS
Banking


2050 Motors Inc. (ETFM)
OOTC
Automobiles


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl A (FOXA)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl B (FOX)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21Vianet Group Inc. ADR (VNET)
XNAS
Internet/Online


22nd Century Group Inc. (XXII)
XASE
Biotechnology


24/7 Kid Doc Inc. (TVMD)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


2U Inc. (TWOU)
XNAS
Software


2xLeveraged Long E-TRACS Linked to Wells Fargo Business Development Co. Index 052441 (BDCL)
ARCX
Major International Banks


2xLeveraged Long ETRACS Wells Fargo Business Development (LBDC)
ARCX
Major International Banks


3D Eye Solutions Inc. (TDEY)
OOTC
Motion Picture/Sound Recording


3D Pioneer Systems Inc. (DPSM)
OOTC
Software


3D Systems Corp. (DDD)
XNYS
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3DIcon Corp. (TDCP)
OOTC
Software


3Dshopping.com (THDS)
OOTC
Mixed Retailing


3DX Industries Inc. (DDDX)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3i Group PLC ADR (TGOPY)
OOTC
Finance Companies


3M Co. (MMM)
XNYS
Diversified Holding Companies


3Pea International Inc. (TPNL)
XOTC
Accounting


3Power Energy Group Inc. (PSPW)
OOTC
Renewable Energy Generation


3TL Technologies Corp. (TTMZF)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


420 Property Management Inc. (FTPM)
OOTC
Real Estate Agents/Brokers


4Cable TV International Inc. (CATV)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


4Licensing Corp. (FOURQ)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


500.com Ltd. ADR (WBAI)
XNYS
Gambling Industries


51job Inc. ADR (JOBS)
XNAS
Employment/Training Services


58.com Inc. ADR (WUBA)
XNYS
Consumer Services


5Barz International Inc. (BARZ)
OOTC
Networking


5N Plus Inc. (FPLSF)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


6D Global Technologies Inc. (SIXD)
OOTC
Computer Services


808 Renewable Energy Corp. (RNWR)
OOTC
Multiutilities


88 Energy Ltd. ADR (TNGRY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


888 Holdings PLC (EIHDF)
OOTC
Gambling Industries


8Point3 Energy Partners LP (CAFD)
XNAS
Renewable Energy Generation


8X8 Inc. (EGHT)
XNAS
Wired Telecommunications Services


A Clean Slate Inc. (DRWN)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


A&W Revenue Royalties Income Fund (AWRRF)
OOTC
Restaurants


A. H. Belo Corp. Series A (AHC)
XNYS
Publishing


A. Schulman Inc. (SHLM)
XNAS
Commodity Chemicals


A. Schulman Inc. 6% Pfd. (SLMNP)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


A.D. Makepeace Co. (MAKE)
OOTC
Farming


A.M. Castle & Co. (CAS)
XNYS
Wholesalers


A.O. Smith Corp. (AOS)
XNYS
Building Materials/Products


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S ADR (AMKBY)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series A (AMKAF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series B (AMKBF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.S. Roma S.p.A. (ASRAF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


A-1 Group Inc. (AWON)
OOTC
Tobacco


A10 Networks Inc. (ATEN)
XNYS
Computer Services


a2 Milk Co. Ltd. (ACOPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


AAC Holdings Inc. (AAC)
XNYS
Healthcare Provision


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. (AACAF)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. ADR (AACAY)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAON Inc. (AAON)
XNAS
Building Materials/Products


AAP Inc. (AAPJ)
OOTC
Food Products


AAR Corp. (AIR)
XNYS
Aerospace Products/Parts


Aaron's Inc. (AAN)
XNYS
Consumer Services


AB Science S.A. (ABSCF)
OOTC
Pharmaceuticals


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Biofuels Index Total Return (FUE)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Grain Index Total Return (GRU)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB&T Financial Corp. (ABTO)
OOTC
Banking


Abacus Mining & Exploration Corp. (ABCFF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abakan Inc. (ABKI)
OOTC
Industrial Products


Abattis Bioceuticals Corp. (ATTBF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abaxis Inc. (ABAX)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


ABB Ltd. (ABLZF)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABB Ltd. ADR (ABB)
XNYS
Industrial Machinery


Abbott Laboratories (ABT)
XNYS
Pharmaceuticals


AbbVie Inc. (ABBV)
XNYS
Biotechnology


Abby Inc. (ABBY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


Abcam PLC (ABCZF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abcam PLC ADR (ABCZY)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABCO Energy Inc. (ABCE)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


Abcourt Mines Inc. (ABMBF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aben Resources Ltd. (ABNAF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abengoa S.A. B (AGOAF)
OOTC
Construction


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. (ABEO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. Wt (ABEOW)
XNAS



Abercrombie & Fitch Co. (ANF)
XNYS
Clothing Retail


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Fund Inc. (FAX)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Investment Co. Ltd. (ABAKF)
OOTC
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC (ABDNF)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC ADR (ABDNY)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Australia Equity Fund Inc. (IAF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Chile Fund Inc. (CH)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Emerging Markets Smaller Company Opportunities Fund Inc. (ABE)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Global Income Fund Inc. (FCO)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Greater China Fund Inc. (GCH)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Indonesia Fund Inc. (IF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen International Inc. (AABVF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aberdeen Israel Fund Inc. (ISL)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. (JEQ)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Latin America Equity Fund Inc. (LAQ)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Singapore Fund Inc. (SGF)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Abertis Infraestructuras S.A. ADR (ABRTY)
OOTC
Transportation Services


Ability Inc. (ABIL)
XNAS
Precision Products


Ability Inc. Wt (ABIWF)
OOTC



Abiomed Inc. (ABMD)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Abitibi Royalties Inc. (ATBYF)
OOTC
General Mining


Able Energy Inc. (ABLE)
OOTC
Gas Utilities


Ablynx N.V. (ABLYF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABM Industries Inc. (ABM)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Abraxas Petroleum Corp. (AXAS)
XNAS
Oil Extraction


Absecon Bancorp (ASCN)
OOTC
Banking


Absolute Health & Fitness Inc. (AHFI)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Absolute Software Corp. (ALSWF)
OOTC
Software


ABT Holdings Inc. (ABOT)
OOTC
Precious Metals


Abtech Holdings Inc. (ABHD)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABV Consulting Inc. (ABVN)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


AC Immune S.A. (ACIU)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acacia Communications Inc. (ACIA)
XNAS
Networking


Acacia Diversified Holdings Inc. (ACCA)
OOTC
Specialty Retail


Acacia Mining PLC (ABGLF)
OOTC
Gold


Acacia Research Corp. - Acacia Technologies (ACTG)
XNAS
Diversified Business Services


Acadia Healthcare Co. Inc. (ACHC)
XNAS
Healthcare Provision


ACADIA Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACAD)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acadia Realty Trust (AKR)
XNYS



Acadian Timber Corp. (ACAZF)
OOTC
Forestry & Wood Products


Acasti Pharma Inc. (ACST)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Accelera Innovations Inc. (ACNV)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accelerate Diagnostics Inc. (AXDX)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accelerize Inc. (ACLZ)
XOTC
Life Insurance


Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accenture PLC Cl A (ACN)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Access National Corp. (ANCX)
XNAS
Banking


Access Power Inc. (ACCR)
OOTC
Wired Telecommunications Services


Access Worldwide Communications Inc. (AWWC)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


Acciona S.A. (ACXIF)
OOTC
Construction


ACCO Brands Corp. (ACCO)
XNYS
Nondurable Household Products


Accor S.A. (ACRFF)
OOTC
Hotels


Accor S.A. ADR (ACCYY)
OOTC
Hotels


Accordia Golf Co. Ltd. (ACGFF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Accredited Mortgage Loan REIT Trust 9.75% Perp. Cum. Pfd. Series A (AHHAP)
OOTC
Mortgages


Accretive Health Inc. (ACHI)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accuray Inc. (ARAY)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Accuride Corp. (ACW)
XNYS
Auto & Commercial Vehicle Parts


AcelRx Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACRX)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Acer Inc. GDR Reg S (ACEYY)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


Acerus Pharmaceuticals Corp. (TRLPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Aceto Corp. (ACET)
XNAS
Specialty Chemicals


Achaogen Inc. (AKAO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Achillion Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACHN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


ACI Worldwide Inc. (ACIW)
XNAS
Software



«1234567891011-2021-3031-4041-5051-6061-7071-8081-9091-94»










Log In




4:04 AM EDT
July 23, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
5:12pTrump says he has ‘complete power to pardon’
5:08pLawmakers reach deal on Russia sanctions bill: reports
5:00pAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
3:30pYou can date someone who looks just like Donald Trump with this new online service 
3:29pWant to buy happiness? Splurge on these 5 things
3:28pThis is what people really buy when they emotionally overspend (hint: it’s not designer clothes)
2:40pJohn McCain is a war hero — but think twice before saying he’s ‘battling’ cancer 
2:38pThe dark side of cruises
2:37pI want to buy my brothers out of our family home — but they want me to pay (future) sales fees
2:35pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
2:34pNot even free money can make some people go to the gym 
2:34pHow real-estate TV shows determine what buyers look for in a house
2:34pWhat Eleanor Roosevelt and Helen Gurley Brown ate — and what we can learn from it 
2:33pNote to parents: This social network was rated the worst for teenage cyberbullying
2:33pIf, like Sean Spicer, you suddenly quit your job — what should you do next?
2:32pThis is the deadliest time of your life to put on weight
2:32p5 unfortunate reasons why millennials can’t have nice things (or save any money)
2:26pU.S. giving takeover bids by Chinese firms much tougher look
1:13pJared Kushner discloses dozens of additional assets in revised filing
12:51pBitcoin surges as miners avert split for now
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































EIM Stock Price - Eaton Vance Municipal Bond Fund Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE MKT) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,580.07


-31.71


-0.15%











S&P 500

2,472.54


-0.91


-0.04%











Nasdaq

6,387.75


-2.25


-0.04%











GlobalDow

2,833.20


-8.47


-0.30%











Gold

1,261.10


9.00


0.72%











Oil

45.60


-1.32


-2.81%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



CTAS 
9.2




COF 
8.6




ETFC 
5.1




SYF 
4.5






HP
-5.5




ISRG
-4.6




HBAN
-4.4




CHK
-3.1














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








07/22

Updated
Trump says he has ‘complete power to pardon’



07/22

Lawmakers reach deal on Russia sanctions bill: reports



07/22

Alphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors



07/22

Updated
You can date someone who looks just like Donald Trump with this new online service 



07/22

Updated
Want to buy happiness? Splurge on these 5 things



07/22

This is what people really buy when they emotionally overspend (hint: it’s not designer clothes)



07/22

Updated
John McCain is a war hero — but think twice before saying he’s ‘battling’ cancer 



07/22

Updated
The dark side of cruises



07/22

Updated
I want to buy my brothers out of our family home — but they want me to pay (future) sales fees



07/22

Updated
O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


EIM


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
Amex

 



EIM
U.S.: NYSE MKT


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Eaton Vance Municipal Bond Fund

Watchlist 
CreateEIMAlert



  


Closed

Last Updated: Jul 21, 2017 4:02 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
12.81



-0.03
-0.23%






Previous Close




$12.84





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




87.94% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    101.6K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 115.6K
            





Open: 12.85
Close: 12.81



12.78
Day Low/High
12.85





Day Range



12.00
52 Week Low/High
14.16


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$12.85



Day Range
12.78 - 12.85



52 Week Range
12.00 - 14.16



Market Cap
n/a



Shares Outstanding
68.17M



Public Float
n/a



Beta
0.04



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
n/a



Yield
4.88%



Dividend
$0.05



Ex-Dividend Date
Jul 20, 2017



Short Interest
12.35K
06/30/17


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
115.55K




 


Performance




5 Day


0.16%







1 Month


0.23%







3 Month


1.18%







YTD


3.22%







1 Year


-8.04%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones




No Headlines Available










Closed-End Bond Funds: A Haven Amid Global Risk


Apr. 9, 2016 at 12:06 a.m. ET
on Barron's









Bond Funds Seek a Haven


Jun. 29, 2013 at 4:57 a.m. ET
on Barron's









Eaton Vance Lower Bar for Funds


Mar. 13, 2008 at 9:22 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Funds Use Leverage to Boost Returns


Nov. 1, 2002 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Nuveen Quality Muni Inc. Fund: Quality Still Shines?
Nuveen Quality Muni Inc. Fund: Quality Still Shines?

Jul. 21, 2017 at 3:36 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





MUI: Investment Opportunity For Investors On The Sidelines?
MUI: Investment Opportunity For Investors On The Sidelines?

Jul. 20, 2017 at 9:51 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hartford hires bankruptcy lawyers
Hartford hires bankruptcy lawyers

Jul. 6, 2017 at 2:18 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Moody's puts Illinois on review for downgrade to junk
Moody's puts Illinois on review for downgrade to junk

Jul. 5, 2017 at 4:39 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on municipal and taxable bond funds
Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on municipal and taxable bond funds

Jul. 5, 2017 at 12:44 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Municipal Bond Market Weekly - June 27, 2017
Municipal Bond Market Weekly - June 27, 2017

Jul. 3, 2017 at 3:45 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Q2 2017 Municipal Credit
Q2 2017 Municipal Credit

Jul. 1, 2017 at 7:19 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Illinois Senate minority leader to resign on July 1
Illinois Senate minority leader to resign on July 1

Jun. 29, 2017 at 3:36 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Illinois: 1st state with 'junk' credit?
Illinois: 1st state with 'junk' credit?

Jun. 25, 2017 at 8:36 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Illinois budget struggles ratchet higher
Illinois budget struggles ratchet higher

Jun. 21, 2017 at 12:15 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hope For The Best But Prepare For The Worst (With Gold And Munis)
Hope For The Best But Prepare For The Worst (With Gold And Munis)

Jun. 12, 2017 at 6:20 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





As Defaults Mount And Loom, It May Be Time To Dust Off Meredith Whitney's Analysis
As Defaults Mount And Loom, It May Be Time To Dust Off Meredith Whitney's Analysis

Jun. 12, 2017 at 9:37 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Muni Downgrades: Lessons From Illinois And Connecticut
Muni Downgrades: Lessons From Illinois And Connecticut

Jun. 5, 2017 at 6:54 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on municipal and taxable bond funds
Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on municipal and taxable bond funds

Jun. 2, 2017 at 4:34 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Muni Market Set For Wave Of Cash
Muni Market Set For Wave Of Cash

Jun. 1, 2017 at 10:32 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Sometimes It's Where You Don't Go
Sometimes It's Where You Don't Go

Jun. 1, 2017 at 8:58 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Kotok: 4% muni yields 'a gift' to high earners
Kotok: 4% muni yields 'a gift' to high earners

May. 19, 2017 at 12:11 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Fixed Income Market Views
Fixed Income Market Views

May. 18, 2017 at 6:43 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Connecticut credit rating downgraded at Fitch
Connecticut credit rating downgraded at Fitch

May. 12, 2017 at 2:21 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on muncipal and taxable bond funds
Eaton Vance declares monthly distributions on muncipal and taxable bond funds

May. 5, 2017 at 1:48 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha









Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds
Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds

Jun. 1, 2017 at 4:56 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Mar. 1, 2017 at 5:46 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Feb. 1, 2017 at 3:51 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Jan. 3, 2017 at 3:50 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Dec. 1, 2016 at 4:22 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Nov. 1, 2016 at 4:25 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Oct. 3, 2016 at 4:04 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Sep. 1, 2016 at 4:54 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Sep. 1, 2016 at 4:54 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Distribution Dates and Amounts Announced for Eaton Vance Closed-End Funds


Aug. 1, 2016 at 4:56 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF








  



 
   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





MCD

-0.19%








GILD

0.46%








CMP

1.78%








BIDU

0.97%








LE

-1.12%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.
















EANAX - Eaton Vance National Municipal Income Fund Class A | Fidelity Investments
























Skip to Main Content.
Site navigation
Fidelity.com Home


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 


Search Fidelity.com




 

 



Accounts & Trade



PortfolioLog In Required


Account PositionsLog In Required


TradeLog In Required


Active Trader ProLog In Required


TransferLog In Required


Cash ManagementLog In Required


BillPayLog In Required


Full ViewLog In Required


ProfileLog In Required


Account FeaturesLog In Required


StatementsLog In Required

Tax Information

Retirement DistributionsLog In Required



OFFER See our featured trading offer. Learn more.



Planning & Advice


What We Offer
Financial Basics
Building Savings
Managing & Growing Wealth
Retirement
Life Events



News & Research


News
Watch ListLog In Required
Quotes
AlertsLog In Required
Mutual Funds
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Markets & Sectors
IPOs
Annuities
Learning Center
Notebook
Notebook



Investment Products


Mutual Funds
Retirement & IRAs
Trading
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Sector Investing
Cash Management & Credit Cards
Managed Accounts
Fidelity Go
529 College Savings
Annuities
Life Insurance & Long Term Care



Why Fidelity


The Fidelity Advantage
Planning & Advice
Trading
Straightforward Pricing
Insights & Tools
Security & Protection


 


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 





























Mutual Funds Research | Fidelity Investments










Loading...














Skip to Main Content.
Site navigation
Fidelity.com Home


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 


Search Fidelity.com




 

 



Accounts & Trade



PortfolioLog In Required


Account PositionsLog In Required


TradeLog In Required


Active Trader ProLog In Required


TransferLog In Required


Cash ManagementLog In Required


BillPayLog In Required


Full ViewLog In Required


ProfileLog In Required


Account FeaturesLog In Required


StatementsLog In Required

Tax Information

Retirement DistributionsLog In Required



OFFER See our featured trading offer. Learn more.



Planning & Advice


What We Offer
Financial Basics
Building Savings
Managing & Growing Wealth
Retirement
Life Events



News & Research


News
Watch ListLog In Required
Quotes
AlertsLog In Required
Mutual Funds
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Markets & Sectors
IPOs
Annuities
Learning Center
Notebook
Notebook



Investment Products


Mutual Funds
Retirement & IRAs
Trading
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Sector Investing
Cash Management & Credit Cards
Managed Accounts
Fidelity Go
529 College Savings
Annuities
Life Insurance & Long Term Care



Why Fidelity


The Fidelity Advantage
Planning & Advice
Trading
Straightforward Pricing
Insights & Tools
Security & Protection


 


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 













 You are here: 

Home »
Mutual Funds Research
























Mutual Funds Research


Search funds by name, symbol, family, or Top 10 Holding Find a mutual fund
										










									You need to have JavaScript enabled in your browser to access this content.
								







 Gathering Results


NEW - Organize and track your favorite funds with My Research. Get Started  .


SEARCH AND COMPARE FUNDS








Learn more














* Compared to Morningstar category average








MatchingFunds



























Questions?
800-343-3548

Instant message a representative



Why choose Fidelity?
Investing with Fidelity gives you access to over 10,000 funds from hundreds of fund companies, making it easy to find the right funds for any investment need.

Learn more about investing with Fidelity



Education

What are Mutual Funds?
Types of Mutual Funds



Learn More

My Research 
Fidelity funds daily prices
Browse Fidelity funds
Browse all Funds




























© 1998 – 2015 FMR LLC.
All rights reserved.


Terms of Use


Privacy


Security


Site Map












 










Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Dynamic Global Bond Fund (RPIEX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Dynamic Global Bond Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				RPIEX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments



			
			 	 Formerly T. Rowe Price Global Unconstrained Bond Fund
			 	 				 	 
			
		







 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/21/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$9.85
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.02
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/21/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								-1.89%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$9.78
							
							-
							
								$10.22
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$358.54

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 05/31/2017



Overall

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


3 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


5 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


10 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						




				Morningstar rated the Dynamic Global Bond Fund among 
N/A,
N/A,
N/A
and 
N/A
Nontraditional Bond
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 05/31/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The objective is to seek high current income.
		
30-Day Yield2 



Annualized Dividend
							
								as of 
								 
									(07/21/2017)
								
							



						
						
							0.62%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/ Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							2.19%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/o Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							2.10%
						
					


Average Annual Total Returns 3



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					0.20%
				
			

				
					0.20%
				
			


3 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


5 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


10 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 2.76%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							2.76%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							January 22, 2015
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						1.16%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.65%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						Contractual
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
					
						
							April 30, 2019
						
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, yield and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   
			



2 The 30-day dividend yield represents the average daily dividends for the 
30-day period, annualized and divided by the net asset values per share 
at the end of the period; it is available the first quarter after the 
fund's inception.  The SEC standardized yield is computed under an SEC 
standardized formula and reflects an estimated yield to maturity 
(assuming all portfolio securities are held to maturity); it is 
available the first month after the fund's inception.  
			

3
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Sun Jul 23 03:02:47 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services | T. Rowe Price





















 










>
	




Home
Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services












Introducing T. Rowe Price® 
ActivePlus Portfolios.
Save time with a diversified portfolio-powered by our experts.



		                    Get Started
		                    
		                












My Account   





Remember User Name

Log In

Log In



Forgot user name


Register for online access 




Open an Account






















Mutual Funds









We offer over 120 no-load mutual funds to address your specific investing needs.











                        See All Mutual Funds
                    

















Rollover IRAs









Changing jobs or planning for retirement? Our specialists make rolling over your 401(k) account easy.











                        Learn More
                    

















IRA









Plan for retirement with the help of a Roth IRA or Traditional IRA.











                        Learn More
                    

















            
                
                    
                    See all Products and Services
                    
                         


















Find low-cost mutual funds to help you achieve your financial goals.












Search Mutual Funds
























129







No-Load Mutual Funds
Providing a broad set of opportunities



















Historical Performance





Daily Prices





Download a Prospectus
















Mutual Fund Categories





We offer a full range of investment strategies across multiple asset classes, capitalizations, sectors, and styles.







Fund Type
Number Available
Stock Funds
54
Asset Allocation Funds
34
Money Market Funds
8
Target Date Funds
26
Bond Funds
36






















            
                
                    
                    See all Mutual Funds
                    
                         


















Over 80% of our mutual funds beat their 10-year Lipper average as of 3/31/17*











            
                
                    
                    Learn More
                    
                         















T. Rowe Price Insights®





Access our latest investment thinking, information on retirement planning, and perspectives on the markets.







Asset Allocation





An Inside Look at T. Rowe Price® ActivePlus Portfolios

July 13, 2017









Retirement Planning





6 Key Ingredients for Retirement Planning

July 10, 2017









Markets & Economy





Quarterly Market Review

June 30, 2017













            
                
                    
                    See all Articles
                    
                         




















Ready to Get Started?







                        Open an Account
                    










Or Call 1-888-285-2612





















View firm's background on FINRA's BrokerCheck
T. Rowe Price mutual funds are subject to ongoing management fees and may be subject to redemption fees. An IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when an IRA is closed. See prospectus for details.

The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
*144 of our 330 mutual funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes and excludes funds used in insurance products). 122 of these 144 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 204 of 311 (66%), 175 of 213, 140 of 178 (79%), of T. Rowe Price funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
24 of our 39 Retirement Funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes). 23 of these 24 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 38 of 39, 35 of 36, and 35 of 36 of the Retirement Funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
Source: Lipper Inc. 168 of 213 funds (excluding institutional and bank institutional funds as defined by Lipper) more than 6 months old had expense ratios below their Lipper averages based on fiscal year-end data available as of 3/31/17.
The principal value of the Retirement Funds is not guaranteed at any time, including at or after the target date, which is the approximate year an investor plans to retire (assumed to be age 65) and likely stop making new investments in the fund. If an investor plans to retire significantly earlier or later than age 65, the funds may not be an appropriate investment even if the investor is retiring on or near the target date. The funds’ allocations among a broad range of underlying T. Rowe Price stock and bond funds will change over time. The funds emphasize potential capital appreciation during the early phases of retirement asset accumulation, balance the need for appreciation with the need for income as retirement approaches, and focus on supporting an income stream over a long-term postretirement withdrawal horizon. The funds are not designed for a lump-sum redemption at the target date and do not guarantee a particular level of income. The funds maintain a substantial allocation to equities both prior to and after the target date, which can result in greater volatility over shorter time horizons.















x


You are using an unsupported browser version that might prevent you from accessing certain features on our site.
 
We suggest clicking an icon below to download a supported browser version.
 
 

Google Chrome
Mozilla Firefox
Internet Explorer
Safari














404 Page Not Found















Page Not Found




We apologize for any inconvenience, but we are unable to locate the page you requested. 
                                This could be due to either of the reasons below: 


                                    If you manually entered the URL, please make sure it is correct. 
                                    Check that the capitalization matches, that all words are spelled correctly, 
                                    and that all the punctuation, like periods (.) and slashes (/) are correctly placed. 
                                    Be sure that you are using the forward slash (/) and not the backward slash (\). 
                                    Remember, there are no spaces in URLs.
                                

                                    If you have bookmarked this page, this page may have been renamed, moved, or deleted. 
                                    Please return to our homepage, and reset your bookmarks.
                                











	CEF Types & Strategies: Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt Funds | Nuveen















































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us















			Strategies



MF
CEF
SMA
ETF
COM
UIT



CEF




Overview
Taxable Income
Tax-Exempt Income
Multi-Strategy
Equity










			Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt Funds
			


		About Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt

		Tax-exempt municipal bonds are debt issued by a state, city, or other municipality for general governmental needs or to finance special
		projects. These municipal bonds pay interest that is free from regular federal income tax, and state-specific bonds can provide residents
		of those states with income free from state and, in some cases, local income taxes as well.* Tax-exempt municipal bonds can be an
		advantageous alternative to taxable investments, particularly for investors in higher tax brackets. To make a fair comparison between
		a tax-free investment like a municipal bond and a taxable investment, one should adjust the tax-free investment's yield to account
		for money saved in regular federal, and sometimes state, income tax.
	

* Interest on out-of-state bonds and dividends paid by national funds may be subject to state and local taxes. Income may also be
			subject to the Alternative Minimum Tax.



				About Nuveen Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt Closed-End Funds

				Nuveen offers several national tax-exempt municipal bond closed-end funds, and as well as state-specific funds focusing 15 different states. Municipal Closed-End
				Funds can potentially help you balance your desire for income and growth by:

Meeting current expenses with monthly tax-free income;
Potentially realizing attractive, long-term, after-tax total returns;
Diversifying your income portfolio;
Reducing the amount of your investment income subject to taxes.


				The Tax-Free Advantage






						Tax-Free Yield
					






						4%
					

						5%
					

						6%
					

						7%
					

						8%
					





Tax Rate


Taxable Equivalent Yield




						25%
					

						5.33%
					

						6.67%
					

						8.00%
					

						9.33%
					

						10.67%
					



						28%
					

						5.56%
					

						6.94%
					

						8.33%
					

						9.72%
					

						11.11%
					



						33%
					

						5.97%
					

						7.46%
					

						8.96%
					

						10.45%
					

						11.94%
					



						35%
					

						6.15%
					

						7.69%
					

						9.23%
					

						10.77%
					

						12.31%
					



						39.6%
					

						6.62%
					

						8.28%
					

						9.93%
					

						11.59%
					

						13.25%
					



				You can see you would need to earn much more from a taxable investment to match a municipal bond's after-tax yield. For instance,
				if your fund is yielding 5.00% tax-free and your tax rate is
				28%, you would need a taxable investment to yield 6.94% to match the same after-tax cash flow. 
			

This chart is for illustrative purposes only and is not intended to reflect past or predict future performance 
				for any particular investment. They do not take into account the effects of the federal alternative minimum tax (AMT) 
				or capital gains taxes.  This information is general in nature and should not be considered tax advice.  
				Nuveen is not a tax advisor and investors should consult with a qualified tax consultant as to their particular 
				situation.






						Investor Profile

						Are these CEFs right for you?

						The features and investment objectives of these funds might be especially appealing to investors seeking:


							Potential for attractive, monthly tax-free income

							Diversification of a portfolio otherwise comprised of taxable fixed-income
							and equity securities

							Reduction of the amount of investment income subject to taxes.


						What are potential risks?


							Municipal bond fund income may be subject to state and local income taxes and the alternative minimum tax. Capital gains, if any, will
							be subject to capital gains tax.

							Municipal bonds are subject to interest rate risk, or the risk
							that the bonds will decline in value because of changes in market interest rates.

							Municipal bonds are also subject to call risk, and credit risk.









			Nuveen's Municipal Bond Closed-End Funds


Select a national fund...
Nuveen Quality Municipal Income Fund-NAD
Nuveen Municipal Credit Income Fund-NZF
Nuveen Enhanced Municipal Value Fund-NEV
Nuveen Intermediate Duration Municipal Term Fund-NID
Nuveen Intermediate Duration Quality Municipal Term Fund-NIQ
Nuveen Municipal 2021 Target Term Fund-NHA
Nuveen Municipal High Income Opportunity Fund-NMZ
Nuveen AMT-Free Municipal Credit Income Fund-NVG
Nuveen AMT-Free Quality Municipal Income Fund-NEA
Nuveen Municipal Value Fund, Inc.-NUV
Nuveen Municipal Income Fund, Inc.-NMI
Nuveen Select Tax-Free Income Portfolio-NXP
Nuveen Select Tax-Free Income Portfolio 2-NXQ
Nuveen Select Tax-Free Income Portfolio 3-NXR
Nuveen Select Maturities Municipal Fund-NIM
Nuveen AMT-Free Municipal Value Fund-NUW




Select a state fund...
Nuveen Arizona Quality Municipal Income Fund-NAZ
Nuveen California Quality Municipal Income Fund-NAC
Nuveen California AMT-Free Quality Municipal Income Fund-NKX
Nuveen California Municipal Value Fund, Inc.-NCA
Nuveen California Select Tax-Free Income Portfolio-NXC
Nuveen California Municipal Value Fund 2-NCB
Nuveen Connecticut Quality Municipal Income Fund-NTC
Nuveen Georgia Quality Municipal Income Fund-NKG
Nuveen Maryland Quality Municipal Income Fund-NMY
Nuveen Massachusetts Quality Municipal Income Fund-NMT
Nuveen Michigan Quality Municipal Income Fund-NUM
Nuveen Minnesota Quality Municipal Income Fund-NMS
Nuveen Missouri Quality Municipal Income Fund-NOM
Nuveen New Jersey Quality Municipal Income Fund-NXJ
Nuveen New Jersey Municipal Value Fund-NJV
Nuveen New York Quality Municipal Income Fund-NAN
Nuveen New York AMT-Free Quality Municipal Income Fund-NRK
Nuveen New York Municipal Value Fund, Inc.-NNY
Nuveen New York Select Tax-Free Income Portfolio-NXN
Nuveen New York Municipal Value Fund 2-NYV
Nuveen North Carolina Quality Municipal Income Fund-NNC
Nuveen Ohio Quality Municipal Income Fund-NUO
Nuveen Pennsylvania Quality Municipal Income Fund-NQP
Nuveen Pennsylvania Municipal Value Fund-NPN
Nuveen Texas Quality Municipal Income Fund-NTX
Nuveen Virginia Quality Municipal Income Fund-NPV
























Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE







See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.

	14831-INV-AN-03/17




















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds




















	CEF Types & Strategies | Nuveen














































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us













Strategies


MF
CEF
SMA
ETF
COM
UIT



CEF




Overview
Taxable Income
Tax-Exempt Income
Multi-Strategy
Equity









CEF Types & Strategies

Find out more about the types of closed-end funds we offer and their investment
			strategies using the chart below.





Multi-Strategy



				 

Global Debt

Equity Option



Preferred Securities

MBS

Global Equity



Floating Rate

MLPs

Domestic Equity



Municipal Debt

REITs

				 





Chart Definitions
Income-oriented closed-end funds make payouts largely from interest	and dividends.
Income and capital appreciation funds seek regular cash	flow made up of interest and dividends, with the remainder from capital appreciation or, if necessary, return of capital.
Capital appreciation and income closed-end funds seek cash flow mainly from capital appreciation.
Single-asset-class funds invest primarily in one asset class, which can be used as components in a well-diversified income portfolio.
Pre-packaged combinations are funds featuring multiple asset types, which are designed to work together to diversify fund cash flow risks.






















Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE







See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.




















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds





















	Income Investing | CEF | Nuveen



















































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us


































Closed the Income Gap®
with Nuveen Closed-End Funds



Closed-End Funds Offer Attractive Income Potential
In the search for increased income opportunities, closed-end funds can be a smart choice. Designed and built for income, closed-end funds seek to provide regular, stable cash flow over time and can serve as a compelling tool for optimizing an income portfolio.
Consider closed-end funds if you’re seeking to:1


1


Enhance Income and Cash Flow
Because of their unique closed structure and ability to use leverage,2 closed-end funds offer potentially higher distributions3 than traditional income investments.4


2


Manage Interest Rate Risk 
Floating rate, shorter duration or equity closed-end funds may help reduce a portfolio’s interest rate sensitivity.


3


Protect Purchasing Power
Closed-end funds that invest in real assets and dividend-paying stocks, which typically increase their payments with rising inflation, may help buffer the effects of rising inflation.


4


Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Nuveen offers a wide array of national, state specific and AMT-free municipal closed-end funds that may help reduce your tax liability on investment income.5


5


Improve Diversification
With strategies that provide access to specialized asset classes, including alternatives, Nuveen closed-end funds may enhance portfolio diversification.





Additional Resources



How Do CEFs Compare? 


Additional Advisor Resources










What is a Closed-End Fund?
Anne KritzmireClosed-End Fund & Structured Products










Consider Nuveen closed-end funds if you’re seeking1



Fund Name
Ticker
Leveraged?
Primary Investment Focus 
Enhance Income
Manage Interest Rate Risk
Protect Purchasing Power
Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Improve Diversification 




Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt


Nuveen Quality Municipal Income Fund
NAD
•
Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen AMT-Free Municipal Credit Income Fund
NVG
•
AMT-Free, Hybrid Investment Grade/High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal Value Fund, Inc.
NUV

Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal High Income Opportunity Fund
NMZ
•
High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•





Taxable Debt


Nuveen Credit Strategies Income Fund
JQC
•
Senior Loans
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Mortgage Opportunity Term Fund
JLS
•
Mortgage-Backed Securities
•
•


•


Nuveen Preferred Securities Income Fund
JPS
•
Preferred Securities
•






Nuveen Global High Income Fund
JGH
•
Global High Yield Securities
•
•


•




Equity


Nuveen Real Asset Income and Growth Fund
JRI
•
Real Assets
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Tax-Advantaged Total Return Strategy Fund
JTA
•
Equity-Global
•
•
•

•


Nuveen S&P 500 Buy-Write Income Fund
BXMX

Equity-Option
•
•

•
•








There is no guarantee that any of the funds will achieve their stated objectives. For detailed information on the specific risks associated with each fund, please view the fund overview by clicking on the fund name above.
1 Goal classifications represent common investor concerns when evaluating portfolio needs, are provided for informational purposes only, and are not intended to be relied upon as investment advice or recommendations.
2 Leverage typically magnifies the total return of a fund’s portfolio, whether that return is positive or negative, and creates an opportunity for increased common share net income as well as higher volatility of net asset value, market price, and distributions. There is no assurance that a fund’s leveraging strategy will be successful.
3 Potential distribution sources include net investment income, realized gains and return of capital.  
4 Different types of asset investments have different types of risks, which may provide higher returns but also greater volatility. In general, equity securities tend to be more volatile that fixed income securities. The value of, and income generated by, debt securities will decrease or increase based on changes in market interest rates. As interest rates risk, bond prices fall. In general, below investment grade (high-yield) debt securities tend to be more volatile than investment grade securities. Preferred securities are subordinated to bonds and other debt instruments in a company's capital structure, and therefore are subject to greater credit risk. The interest and principal payments of U.S. Treasury securities are guaranteed.
5 Income may be subject to state and local income taxes and the alternative minimum tax. Capital gains, if any, will be subject to capital gains tax.














Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE









See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.
21247-INV-Y-03/17



















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds


















































































American Funds



































































































All Funds | American Funds


























HOME



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





FINANCIAL ADVISORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets













Contact Us
Preferences
Preferences


Log in / Register
Log out



American Funds Advisor ID

Log in to the Advisor Website


Register





Log out



Client Accounts (DST Vision ID)

Log in to Client Accounts



Log out





















Your Regional eWholesaler 



Schedule Meeting
Email
Call





Your Regional eWholesaler 



View LinkedIn Profile










Schedule
Schedule a phone meeting.





Call






Email
                    Receive a response within 24 hours
		    	









CLOSE X



Welcome!

						I'm , your regional contact at American Funds.  As you browse the site, you'll see that every page gives you the opportunity to email, call, or schedule a meeting with me. I look forward to answering your questions, discussing ideas, and helping you get the most out of the full range of American Funds products and services.  
					
OK, GOT IT!


















Forms & Literature


Search




















CLIENT
ACCOUNTS






										CLIENT ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








AMERICAN FUNDS ACCOUNTS





Dashboard / Client List


Recent Transactions
















Account Forms & Guidelines










PARTNER SITES









DST Vision A link to DST Vision is available on the Client Accounts page. 





PlanPremier®-Bundled PartnerLink®


PlanPremier®-TPA PartnerLink®









Recently Viewed Accounts

You must log in to access recently viewed accounts.

Log in to Client Accounts


You have no recently viewed accounts.














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Download Fund Data


Fund Literature


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs










MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Share Class Cost Comparison Calculator










OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products & Solutions





Target Date Retirement Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Insurance Series
































PRODUCTS & 
SOLUTIONS






										PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS
									
										
										See All

Close x







SOLUTIONS FOR:





Defined Contribution
Learn about retirement solutions that encourage favorable participant outcomes.



















Portfolio Construction
Find out how American Funds builds models and portfolios to meet the real-world needs of investors.






















Fixed Income
Learn about our fixed income strategies and how they pursue durable outcomes for investors.






















Retirement Income
Learn strategies that address a retiree’s withdrawal and longevity needs.













Investment Options





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Model Portfolios


Model Portfolios - ASR View



















Target Date Retirement Series


College Target Date Series


Portfolio Series


Retirement Income Portfolio Series













Retirement





401(k)/403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs


Traditional/Roth IRAs










College Savings





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts














 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















read















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















read












CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary


Defined Contribution Insights










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global


Innovation










  





International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Municipal Bonds


Portfolio Construction


Target Date


Taxable Bonds


United States














TOOLS & PRACTICE 
MANAGEMENT






										TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT
									
										
										See All

Close x







PLANNING TOOLS





Hypotheticals


Portfolio Resources


Portfolio Analyzer


Price-It Tool: Preliminary Fee Quote


Retirement Plan Cost Comparison Tool


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs






MORE PLANNING TOOLS






Capital Group Policy Spotlight






CLIENT CONVERSATIONS





Investing Basics


Investment Planning


College Savings


Individual Retirement Planning


Market Fluctuations






MORE CLIENT CONVERSATIONS






HOW-TO GUIDES









Client Servicing





Deliver More Effective Retirement Plan Reviews




 


Conduct a Portfolio Review










Business Development





Build Your IRA Business




 


Lead an Enrollment Meeting






MORE HOW-TO GUIDES










SERVICE
CENTER






										SERVICE CENTER
									
										
										See All

Close x







CURRENT












IRA BENEFICIARY REPORT See which clients haven’t designated a beneficiary or made an update in at least five years. 






LEARN MORE








SUBMIT DOCUMENTS ONLINE Any paperwork you currently fax can be submitted online. 






LEARN MORE










ACCOUNT FORMS & GUIDELINES





New Account Setup


CollegeAmerica 529


Traditional IRA


Roth IRA


SIMPLE IRA


Individual Account






More Forms & Guidelines






OTHER RESOURCES





Life Event Checklists


Tax Center


Forms & Literature










CONTACT US





Call


Mail


Submit Documents Online




























Forms & Literature











CLIENT ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS


INSIGHTS


TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT


SERVICE CENTER

































Investments


/ American Funds                                















American Funds















 ALL FUNDS


INVESTMENT TRACKER

-- FUNDS
								


COMPARE FUNDS


DOWNLOAD DATA
























Returns


			|
		

Daily Prices & Yields


			|
		

Symbols & Fund Numbers

			
|			
Literature







FILTER BY


Objective


Growth
Growth & Income
Equity-Income
Balanced
Bond
Tax-Exempt Bond
Money Market Funds
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
College Target Date
Retirement Target Date





Or



Asset Type 
					


Equity
Balanced
Fixed Income Taxable
Fixed Income tax exempt
Money Market







Investment Tracker
--
 Funds


					Add American Funds to your Investment Tracker by checking boxes below and choosing the Add To Tracker link above or below the table.
				





 American Funds

		Important: Class B and 529-B shares were no longer available for purchase as of April 21, 2009. All B and 529-B shares finished converting to A and 529-A shares on April 10, 2017.
	
















Share Class 
							



A
C
F-1
F-2
F-3
529-A
529-C
529-E
529-F-1
R-1
R-2
R-2E
R-3
R-4
R-5E
R-5
R-6






Returns
								









Monthly








Quarterly










at MOP/with CDSC








at NAV














Show Indices







ADD TO TRACKER





 PRINT

















Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.















Fund Name

		Prices & Returns


		Yields
		



Price 
				
	
Change  ($)
			
	
Change  (%)
			
	
YTD
		
	

7-Day
		 SEC Yield at NAV
		
	
30-day SEC Yield NAV


12-Month Dist. Rate at NAV
		




At NAV as of -- (updated daily)
As of -- (updated monthly)








Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.















1- of  results
0 results



ADD TO TRACKER


















































































































































American High-Income Trust - AHITX | American Funds


























HOME



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





FINANCIAL ADVISORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets













Contact Us
Preferences
Preferences


Log in / Register
Log out



American Funds Advisor ID

Log in to the Advisor Website


Register





Log out



Client Accounts (DST Vision ID)

Log in to Client Accounts



Log out





















Your Regional eWholesaler 



Schedule Meeting
Email
Call





Your Regional eWholesaler 



View LinkedIn Profile










Schedule
Schedule a phone meeting.





Call






Email
                    Receive a response within 24 hours
		    	









CLOSE X



Welcome!

						I'm , your regional contact at American Funds.  As you browse the site, you'll see that every page gives you the opportunity to email, call, or schedule a meeting with me. I look forward to answering your questions, discussing ideas, and helping you get the most out of the full range of American Funds products and services.  
					
OK, GOT IT!


















Forms & Literature


Search




















CLIENT
ACCOUNTS






										CLIENT ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








AMERICAN FUNDS ACCOUNTS





Dashboard / Client List


Recent Transactions
















Account Forms & Guidelines










PARTNER SITES









DST Vision A link to DST Vision is available on the Client Accounts page. 





PlanPremier®-Bundled PartnerLink®


PlanPremier®-TPA PartnerLink®









Recently Viewed Accounts

You must log in to access recently viewed accounts.

Log in to Client Accounts


You have no recently viewed accounts.














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Download Fund Data


Fund Literature


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs










MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Share Class Cost Comparison Calculator










OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products & Solutions





Target Date Retirement Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Insurance Series
































PRODUCTS & 
SOLUTIONS






										PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS
									
										
										See All

Close x







SOLUTIONS FOR:





Defined Contribution
Learn about retirement solutions that encourage favorable participant outcomes.



















Portfolio Construction
Find out how American Funds builds models and portfolios to meet the real-world needs of investors.






















Fixed Income
Learn about our fixed income strategies and how they pursue durable outcomes for investors.






















Retirement Income
Learn strategies that address a retiree’s withdrawal and longevity needs.













Investment Options





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Model Portfolios


Model Portfolios - ASR View



















Target Date Retirement Series


College Target Date Series


Portfolio Series


Retirement Income Portfolio Series













Retirement





401(k)/403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs


Traditional/Roth IRAs










College Savings





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts














 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















read















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















read












CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary


Defined Contribution Insights










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global


Innovation










  





International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Municipal Bonds


Portfolio Construction


Target Date


Taxable Bonds


United States














TOOLS & PRACTICE 
MANAGEMENT






										TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT
									
										
										See All

Close x







PLANNING TOOLS





Hypotheticals


Portfolio Resources


Portfolio Analyzer


Price-It Tool: Preliminary Fee Quote


Retirement Plan Cost Comparison Tool


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs






MORE PLANNING TOOLS






Capital Group Policy Spotlight






CLIENT CONVERSATIONS





Investing Basics


Investment Planning


College Savings


Individual Retirement Planning


Market Fluctuations






MORE CLIENT CONVERSATIONS






HOW-TO GUIDES









Client Servicing





Deliver More Effective Retirement Plan Reviews




 


Conduct a Portfolio Review










Business Development





Build Your IRA Business




 


Lead an Enrollment Meeting






MORE HOW-TO GUIDES










SERVICE
CENTER






										SERVICE CENTER
									
										
										See All

Close x







CURRENT












IRA BENEFICIARY REPORT See which clients haven’t designated a beneficiary or made an update in at least five years. 






LEARN MORE








SUBMIT DOCUMENTS ONLINE Any paperwork you currently fax can be submitted online. 






LEARN MORE










ACCOUNT FORMS & GUIDELINES





New Account Setup


CollegeAmerica 529


Traditional IRA


Roth IRA


SIMPLE IRA


Individual Account






More Forms & Guidelines






OTHER RESOURCES





Life Event Checklists


Tax Center


Forms & Literature










CONTACT US





Call


Mail


Submit Documents Online




























Forms & Literature











CLIENT ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS


INSIGHTS


TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT


SERVICE CENTER

































Investments


/ American High-Income Trust                                                ®


















BOND FUNDS


American High-Income Trust ®
								(AHITX)
JUMP TO A FUND 












Share Class
							


A
C
F-1
F-2
F-3
529-A
529-C
529-E
529-F-1
R-1
R-2
R-2E
R-3
R-4
R-5E
R-5
R-6





 
                                PRINT
                            
DOWNLOAD DATA

 
								ADD TO COMPARE
							

 
								ADD TO TRACKER
							












SUMMARY
RETURNS
RATINGS & RISK
HOLDINGS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
FEES & EXPENSES
RESOURCES





























Summary
		





A well-researched approach to high-yield investing.						  
Holds carefully researched, higher yielding, lower rated bonds with the potential for capital appreciation as company and economic fundamentals improve. More correlated with stocks than bonds.					





						Price at NAV 
					

$10.49					
as of 07/21/2017 (updated daily)



						Fund Assets
						(millions)
						
					

						$17,382.2
					


Portfolio Managers 
						

4					


Expense Ratio 
					

0.71%


Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet  (PDF)
					

Prospectus  (PDF)



















Returns at NAV
	




									Returns at MOP
						
	







Read important investment disclosures



11.74%
1-year return

        


5.36%
5-year return

        


5.48%
10-year return

        



3.79%	

		30-day SEC Yield (Fund at MOP)
		 
	




			Returns as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)
					. Yield as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly).

	



Read important investment disclosures



7.59%
1-year return

        


4.57%
5-year return

        


5.08%
10-year return

        



3.79%	

		    30-day SEC Yield (Fund at MOP)
	




			Returns as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)
					. Yield as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)

	







Asset Mix
				









U.S. Equities1.4%

Non-U.S. Equities0.4%



U.S. Bonds76.1%

Non-U.S. Bonds16.8%



Cash & Equivalents5.3%





As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).









Volatility & Return
	


VIEW LARGER CHART


Read important investment disclosures


Fixed-Income



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the 
																						 fixed income   
																				  funds
		

 AHITX
 Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index
																												   

 Other AF Funds




			Standard Deviation as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). Annualized return as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). 
		
 






Fund Statistics 
			




4.1 years
Average Life 


3.3 years
Average Duration 


6.5%
Average Yieldto Maturity 


6.4%
Average Coupon 




					% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).   
		
		







Morningstar Style BoxTM— Fixed-Income













Low Quality


Limited Interest-Rate Sensitivity



 Morningstar data as of 6/30/17 updated quarterly.














Description





				            Objective
				        

				            The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income. Its secondary investment objective is capital appreciation.
				        



						Distinguishing Characteristics
					

A diversified portfolio of lower rated, higher yielding bonds. The fund's portfolio managers pay close attention to balancing the fund's high current income objective with potential principal risk when selecting securities.					



						Types of Investments
					

At least 65% of the portfolio will be invested in high-yield, lower rated bonds (Ba or BB or below at the time of purchase, or unrated, but determined by the fund’s investment adviser to be of equivalent quality) and other similar securities, including preferred stocks. Up to 25% of assets may be invested in common stocks or equity-related securities.					





			             Holdings Outside the U.S.
			         

Up to 25% of assets may be invested in securities of issuers outside the U.S., which may be denominated in currencies other than the U.S. dollar.			         



			            Maturity
			        

Typically, the fund will be invested in intermediate- to long-term securities.			        











Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							02/19/1988

						Fund Assets (millions) As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).

							$17,382.2

						Companies/Issuers
						Holdings are as of 9/30/2016 (updated as of most recent fiscal year-end).

							380+

						Shareholder Accounts
						Shareholder accounts are as of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).

							717,858

						Regular Dividends Paid
						

							Monthly



 


						Minimum Initial Investment
						
					
							$250

						Capital Gains Paid
						

							--

						Portfolio Turnover (2016)
						
					
							76%

						Fiscal Year-End
						
					
							Sep

						Prospectus Date
						
					
							04/07/2017

						CUSIP
						
					
							026547 10 9

						Fund Number
						
					
							21












        Returns
        
    






Month-End Returns as of 6/30/17


Quarter-End Returns as of 6/30/17




ANNUAL RETURNS CHART

Returns at NAV  
	
 | 
	
at MOP			



Read important investment disclosures




 AHITX
 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index 















Growth of 10K
	



High & Low Prices
		            







Read important investment disclosures
For Class A Shares, this chart tracks a hypothetical investment with dividends reinvested through 12/31/2016.


VIEW LARGER CHART



 AHITX
 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index  





For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for AHITX through 07/21/2017.
            

 AHITX




 






Yield
		







						12-month
					




						Distribution Rates
							




						30-day SEC Yield
							







Fund at NAV

5.31%					

							N/A   
					


Fund at MOP

5.11%					

3.79%					




As of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly).











Portfolio Management
	



LEARN ABOUT THE CAPITAL SYSTEMSM





 Years of Experience with Fund
 Years of Experience with Capital Group
 Years of Experience with Investment Industry



David C. Barclay

36
29
27



Tom Chow

28
2
2



David A. Daigle

23
23
13



Tara L. Torrens

14
14
2



A boldface number indicates that years of experience with Capital Group is equal to years of experience with investment industry.














Ratings & Risk




Morningstar Rating TM







Overall Morningstar RatingTM
Funds rated (590)










3-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(590 funds rated)










5-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(474 funds rated)










10-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(317 funds rated)











Overall Morningstar Risk 


			 Above Average

HIGH
 
 
 
LOW





Category 

					High Yield Bond
				




ADVANTAGES AND DISADVANTAGES OF MORNINGSTAR RATINGS


 Ratings are based on risk-adjusted returns as of
6/30/2017						(updated monthly).








Lipper Leader Scorecard
	

Read important investment disclosures







Overall
3 yr.
5 yr.
10 yr.


Consistent Return Within Category 
Funds Rated


(564)



(564)



(457)



(303)



Expense Within Category  Funds Rated


(167)



(167)



(138)



(102)



Preservation Within Category Funds Rated



							(5783)



(5783)



(4861)



(3179)



Tax Efficiency Within Category Funds Rated


(566)



(566)



(458)



(304)



Total Return Within Category Funds Rated


(566)



(566)



(458)



(304)





Category
High Yield Funds







KEY

HIGHEST







LOWEST


 As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).







Risk Measures

For the 10 Years ending 6/30/17 (updated monthly). 





Fund


Standard Deviation 


9.99                        


Sharpe Ratio 


0.53                        









                            American Funds Benchmark 
As of 6/30/17  (updated quarterly)


                            Morningstar  Benchmark 
As of 6/30/17  (updated monthly)




                            Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index
                        

                            BBgBarc US Agg Bond TR USD
                        


R-squared 

97                        

5                        


Beta 

0.93                        

0.66                        


Capture Ratio (Downside/Upside) 
103/89
99/114










Quality Summary
					 
Read important investment disclosures






U.S. Treasuries/Agencies
1.3%


A
0.0%


BBB/Baa
2.0%


BB/Ba
22.1%


B
43.4%


CCC & Below
22.4%


Unrated
1.7%


Cash & equivalents
5.3%


% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).



 

Average Life Breakdown
	   





0-4.9 Years
61.1%


5-9.9 Years
28.8%


10-19.9 Years
1.3%


20-29.9 Years
1.6%


30+ Years
0.1%


% of net assets as of 06/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
 





Holdings





Bonds Breakdown 







Bond Details





Total bond holdings








Corporate bonds & notes
+
91.1%


Industrials
9%


Information technology
7.4%


Utilities
4%


Financials
3.1%


Other corporate bonds & notes
2.4%


Consumer staples
2.2%


Energy
14.8%


Health Care
13.2%


Consumer discretionary
12.9%


Materials
11.2%


Telecommunication services
10.9%









Other bonds & notes
1.5%







Convertible securities
1.1%



% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).










Top Fixed-Income Issuers




Valeant Pharmaceuticals International

2.7%



Sprint

1.8%



Tenet Healthcare

1.8%



Altice

1.6%



First Quantum Minerals

1.6%

% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).





				QUARTERLY HOLDINGS

HOLDINGS SEARCH












Geographic Breakdown 
		



Regions
					 |
							Currency Weighting  
					|
			
							Top Countries 
				










United States
77.50%


Europe
7.50%


Asia & Pacific Basin
1.90%


Other (Including Canada & Latin America)
7.80%


Cash & equivalents
5.30%



            % of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
        






Non-U.S. Dollar Denominated

0.2%
			


Other currencies
0.2%


U.S. Dollar
99.8%


				Data as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
			










United States
77.5%


Canada
6.1%


Netherlands
2.0%


United Kingdom
1.3%


Luxembourg
1.1%

% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).












Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2017
			

















2008-2017
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS

CURRENT DAILY DIVIDENDS









2017








RecordDate
CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




Daily
01/31/17
02/01/17
$0.0455357
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.36


Daily
02/28/17
03/01/17
$0.0402637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.46


Daily
03/31/17
04/03/17
$0.0484023
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.40


Daily
04/28/17
05/01/17
$0.0470432
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.44


Daily
05/31/17
06/01/17
$0.0488094
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.47


Daily
06/30/17
07/03/17
$0.0448773
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$10.43






2017 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.27493161


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.27493161




				 as of 7/21/17
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00468870
07/03/2017


0.00312428
07/05/2017


0.00158506
07/06/2017


0.00158493
07/07/2017


0.00477266
07/10/2017


0.00158523
07/11/2017


0.00166222
07/12/2017


0.00167723
07/13/2017


0.00158405
07/14/2017


0.00484819
07/17/2017


0.00154268
07/18/2017


0.00160174
07/19/2017


0.00159160
07/20/2017


0.00159972
07/21/2017


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date





Daily

01/31/2017
02/01/2017








 






 











						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00468870
07/03/2017


0.00312428
07/05/2017


0.00158506
07/06/2017


0.00158493
07/07/2017


0.00477266
07/10/2017


0.00158523
07/11/2017


0.00166222
07/12/2017


0.00167723
07/13/2017


0.00158405
07/14/2017


0.00484819
07/17/2017


0.00154268
07/18/2017


0.00160174
07/19/2017


0.00159160
07/20/2017


0.00159972
07/21/2017


















Fees & Expenses





Fees
					







Annual Management Fees
0.29%


Other Expenses
0.18%


Service 12b-1
0.24%


As of each fund's most recent prospectus.







Expense Ratio



Fund
	

0.71%


Lipper 		 High Yield
 Funds Average
	


1.05%			








Resources






			Literature for AHITX
		




Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet
(PDF) 
05/17




Quarterly Attribution Report
(PDF) 
07/17





		Single Sheet
	
(PDF) 
11/16




Summary Prospectus
(PDF) 
04/17




Prospectus
(PDF) 
04/17




Statement of additional information
(PDF) 
04/17





		Semi-Annual Report
	
(PDF) 
05/17





		Annual Report
	
(PDF) 
11/16











            About Our Funds
        





Share Class Pricing and Breakpoints 





American Funds Portfolio Resources 





Advisor’s Guide 




Dividend Calendar 
(PDF) 




Stats Update 
(PDF) 




Resource Guide 
(PDF) 













Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns shown at maximum offering price (MOP) for Class A shares reflect payment of the 3.75% maximum sales charge. 
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Funds are managed, so holdings will change.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
The portfolio managers shown are as of the fund's most recent prospectus dated 04/07/2017.
Lipper ratings for Consistent Return reflect funds’ historical risk-adjusted returns at NAV, adjusted for volatility, relative to peers. Lipper ratings for Expense reflect funds’ expense minimization relative to peers with similar load structures. Lipper ratings for Preservation reflect funds’ historical loss avoidance relative to other funds within the same asset class. Preservation ratings are relative, rather than absolute, measures, and funds named Lipper Leaders for Preservation may still experience losses periodically; those losses may be larger for equity and mixed equity funds than for fixed income funds. Lipper ratings for Tax Efficiency reflect funds’ historical success in postponing taxable distributions relative to peers. Tax Efficiency offers no benefit to investors in tax-sheltered accounts such as 401(k) plans. Lipper ratings for Total Return reflect funds’ historical total return performance relative to peers. The Lipper ratings are subject to change every month and are based on an equal-weighted average of percentile ranks for the Total Return, Consistent Return, Preservation, Tax Efficiency and Expense metrics.
  The highest 20% of funds in each classification are named Lipper Leaders for Total Return, the next 20% receive a rating of 4, the middle 20% are rated 3, the next 20% are rated 2, and the lowest 20% are rated 1. Lipper ratings are not intended to predict future results, and Lipper does not guarantee the accuracy of this information. More information is available at www.lipperleaders.com. Lipper Leader © 2017, Thomson Reuters, All Rights Reserved.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The Morningstar Rating™ for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods. Past results are not guarantee of results in future periods. Morningstar Rating is for Class A only; other classes may have different performance characteristics.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
Bond ratings, which typically range from AAA/Aaa (highest) to D (lowest), are assigned by credit rating agencies such as Standard & Poor's, Moody's and/or Fitch, as an indication of an issuer's creditworthiness. If agency ratings differ, the security will be considered to have received the lowest 
  of those ratings, consistent with the fund's investment policies. Securities in the Unrated category have not been rated by a rating agency; however, the investment adviser performs its own credit analysis and assigns comparable ratings that are used for compliance with fund investment policies.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Source for Lipper expense ratio comparison: Lipper, based on front-end load funds, excluding funds of funds, for the most recent fiscal year-ends available as of 06/30/2017.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.
The SEC yield reflects the rate at which the fund is earning income on its current portfolio of securities while the distribution rate reflects the fund’s past dividends paid to shareholders. Accordingly, the fund's SEC yield and distribution rate may differ.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Except for Lipper rating information, the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High-Yield 2% Issuer Capped: Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index covers the universe of fixed-rate, non-investment-grade debt. The index limits the maximum exposure of any one issuer to 2%.
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Currency Weighting  Short Breakdown: The fund's exposure to a specific currency before taking into consideration any forward currency contracts that may increase or decrease that currency's exposure.
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Morningstar rating: In an effort to classify funds by what they own, as well as by their prospectus objectives and styles, Morningstar developed Morningstar Categories. While the prospectus objective identifies a fund's investment goals based on the wording in the fund prospectus, the Morningstar Category identifies funds based on their actual investment styles as measured by their underlying portfolio holdings (portfolio and other statistics over the past three years).  
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
	



Read important investment disclosures

This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 American High-Income Trust (AHITX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested



 
Index 
 


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index     
Lipper High Yield Funds Index     















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .











Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High-Yield 2% Issuer Capped: Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index covers the universe of fixed-rate, non-investment-grade debt. The index limits the maximum exposure of any one issuer to 2%.








Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Friday, February 19, 1988) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1988), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 American High-Income Trust (AHITX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index
Lipper High Yield Funds Index
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns shown at maximum offering price (MOP) for Class A shares reflect payment of the 3.75% maximum sales charge. 
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High-Yield 2% Issuer Capped: Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index covers the universe of fixed-rate, non-investment-grade debt. The index limits the maximum exposure of any one issuer to 2%.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income
 
Index 
 


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index
Lipper High Yield Funds Index






				Standard Deviation as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). Annualized return as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for AHITX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.














































































































































The Bond Fund of America - ABNDX | American Funds


























HOME



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





FINANCIAL ADVISORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets













Contact Us
Preferences
Preferences


Log in / Register
Log out



American Funds Advisor ID

Log in to the Advisor Website


Register





Log out



Client Accounts (DST Vision ID)

Log in to Client Accounts



Log out





















Your Regional eWholesaler 



Schedule Meeting
Email
Call





Your Regional eWholesaler 



View LinkedIn Profile










Schedule
Schedule a phone meeting.





Call






Email
                    Receive a response within 24 hours
		    	









CLOSE X



Welcome!

						I'm , your regional contact at American Funds.  As you browse the site, you'll see that every page gives you the opportunity to email, call, or schedule a meeting with me. I look forward to answering your questions, discussing ideas, and helping you get the most out of the full range of American Funds products and services.  
					
OK, GOT IT!


















Forms & Literature


Search




















CLIENT
ACCOUNTS






										CLIENT ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








AMERICAN FUNDS ACCOUNTS





Dashboard / Client List


Recent Transactions
















Account Forms & Guidelines










PARTNER SITES









DST Vision A link to DST Vision is available on the Client Accounts page. 





PlanPremier®-Bundled PartnerLink®


PlanPremier®-TPA PartnerLink®









Recently Viewed Accounts

You must log in to access recently viewed accounts.

Log in to Client Accounts


You have no recently viewed accounts.














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Download Fund Data


Fund Literature


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs










MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Share Class Cost Comparison Calculator










OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products & Solutions





Target Date Retirement Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Insurance Series
































PRODUCTS & 
SOLUTIONS






										PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS
									
										
										See All

Close x







SOLUTIONS FOR:





Defined Contribution
Learn about retirement solutions that encourage favorable participant outcomes.



















Portfolio Construction
Find out how American Funds builds models and portfolios to meet the real-world needs of investors.






















Fixed Income
Learn about our fixed income strategies and how they pursue durable outcomes for investors.






















Retirement Income
Learn strategies that address a retiree’s withdrawal and longevity needs.













Investment Options





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series


Separately Managed Accounts


Model Portfolios


Model Portfolios - ASR View



















Target Date Retirement Series


College Target Date Series


Portfolio Series


Retirement Income Portfolio Series













Retirement





401(k)/403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs


Traditional/Roth IRAs










College Savings





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts














 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















read















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















read












CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary


Defined Contribution Insights










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global


Innovation










  





International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Municipal Bonds


Portfolio Construction


Target Date


Taxable Bonds


United States














TOOLS & PRACTICE 
MANAGEMENT






										TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT
									
										
										See All

Close x







PLANNING TOOLS





Hypotheticals


Portfolio Resources


Portfolio Analyzer


Price-It Tool: Preliminary Fee Quote


Retirement Plan Cost Comparison Tool


Target Date ProView: Evaluate TDFs






MORE PLANNING TOOLS






Capital Group Policy Spotlight






CLIENT CONVERSATIONS





Investing Basics


Investment Planning


College Savings


Individual Retirement Planning


Market Fluctuations






MORE CLIENT CONVERSATIONS






HOW-TO GUIDES









Client Servicing





Deliver More Effective Retirement Plan Reviews




 


Conduct a Portfolio Review










Business Development





Build Your IRA Business




 


Lead an Enrollment Meeting






MORE HOW-TO GUIDES










SERVICE
CENTER






										SERVICE CENTER
									
										
										See All

Close x







CURRENT












IRA BENEFICIARY REPORT See which clients haven’t designated a beneficiary or made an update in at least five years. 






LEARN MORE








SUBMIT DOCUMENTS ONLINE Any paperwork you currently fax can be submitted online. 






LEARN MORE










ACCOUNT FORMS & GUIDELINES





New Account Setup


CollegeAmerica 529


Traditional IRA


Roth IRA


SIMPLE IRA


Individual Account






More Forms & Guidelines






OTHER RESOURCES





Life Event Checklists


Tax Center


Forms & Literature










CONTACT US





Call


Mail


Submit Documents Online




























Forms & Literature











CLIENT ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


PRODUCTS &  SOLUTIONS


INSIGHTS


TOOLS & PRACTICE  MANAGEMENT


SERVICE CENTER

































Investments


/ The Bond Fund of America                                                ®


















BOND FUNDS


The Bond Fund of America ®
								(ABNDX)
JUMP TO A FUND 












Share Class
							


A
C
F-1
F-2
F-3
529-A
529-C
529-E
529-F-1
R-1
R-2
R-2E
R-3
R-4
R-5E
R-5
R-6





 
                                PRINT
                            
DOWNLOAD DATA

 
								ADD TO COMPARE
							

 
								ADD TO TRACKER
							












SUMMARY
RETURNS
RATINGS & RISK
HOLDINGS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
FEES & EXPENSES
RESOURCES





























Summary
		





A Core Bond Portfolio With Broad Diversification.						  
Our most diversified bond fund invests in nearly every sector of the bond market, with a focus on securities rated A or above.					





						Price at NAV 
					

$12.98					
as of 07/21/2017 (updated daily)



						Fund Assets
						(millions)
						
					

						$34,575.9
					


Portfolio Managers 
						

7					


Expense Ratio 
					

0.61%


Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet  (PDF)
					

Prospectus  (PDF)



















Returns at NAV
	




									Returns at MOP
						
	







Read important investment disclosures



0.24%
1-year return

        


2.27%
5-year return

        


3.12%
10-year return

        



1.80%	

		30-day SEC Yield (Fund at MOP)
		 
	




			Returns as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)
					. Yield as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly).

	



Read important investment disclosures



-3.51%
1-year return

        


1.49%
5-year return

        


2.73%
10-year return

        



1.80%	

		    30-day SEC Yield (Fund at MOP)
	




			Returns as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)
					. Yield as of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)

	







Asset Mix
				









U.S. Equities0.0%

Non-U.S. Equities0.0%



U.S. Bonds81.3%

Non-U.S. Bonds13.3%



Cash & Equivalents5.4%





As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).









Volatility & Return
	


VIEW LARGER CHART


Read important investment disclosures


Fixed-Income



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the 
																						 fixed income   
																				  funds
		

 ABNDX
 Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index
																												   

 Other AF Funds




			Standard Deviation as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). Annualized return as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). 
		
 






Fund Statistics 
			




7.1 years
Average Life 


5.2 years
Average Duration 


3.0%
Average Yieldto Maturity 


2.9%
Average Coupon 




					% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).   
		
		







Morningstar Style BoxTM— Fixed-Income













Medium Quality


Moderate Interest-Rate Sensitivity



 Morningstar data as of 6/30/17 updated quarterly.














Description





				            Objective
				        

				            The fund's investment objective is to provide as high a level of current income as is consistent with the preservation of capital.
				        



						Distinguishing Characteristics
					

Broadly diversified fixed-income fund with flexibility to respond to various bond market conditions.					



						Types of Investments
					

Primarily invests in corporate debt securities, U.S. and other government securities, mortgage-related securities and cash.					





			             Holdings Outside the U.S.
			         

May invest up to 25% of assets in fixed-income securities of corporations and government entities outside the United States.			         



			            Maturity
			        

Typically, the fund will be invested in intermediate- to long-term securities.			        



			            Portfolio Restrictions
			        

The fund generally invests at least 80% of its assets in bonds, including corporate bonds, U.S. government securities and money market instruments. At least 60% of its assets will be invested in securities rated A3/A- or better at the time of purchase (or unrated but determined by the fund’s investment adviser to be of equivalent quality). It is the fund’s current practice not to invest more than 10% of its assets in debt securities rated Ba1 and BB+ or below.			        











Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							05/28/1974

						Fund Assets (millions) As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).

							$34,575.9

						Companies/Issuers
						Holdings are as of 12/31/2016 (updated as of most recent fiscal year-end).

							710+

						Shareholder Accounts
						Shareholder accounts are as of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).

							1,223,218

						Regular Dividends Paid
						

							Monthly



 


						Minimum Initial Investment
						
					
							$250

						Capital Gains Paid
						

							--

						Portfolio Turnover (2016)
						
					
							363%

						Fiscal Year-End
						
					
							Dec

						Prospectus Date
						
					
							04/07/2017

						CUSIP
						
					
							097873 10 3

						Fund Number
						
					
							8












        Returns
        
    






Month-End Returns as of 6/30/17


Quarter-End Returns as of 6/30/17




ANNUAL RETURNS CHART

Returns at NAV  
	
 | 
	
at MOP			



Read important investment disclosures




 ABNDX
 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index 















Growth of 10K
	



High & Low Prices
		            







Read important investment disclosures
For Class A Shares, this chart tracks a hypothetical investment with dividends reinvested through 12/31/2016.


VIEW LARGER CHART



 ABNDX
 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index  





For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for ABNDX through 07/21/2017.
            

 ABNDX




 






Yield
		







						12-month
					




						Distribution Rates
							




						30-day SEC Yield
							







Fund at NAV

1.78%					

							N/A   
					


Fund at MOP

1.71%					

1.80%					




As of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly).











Portfolio Management
	



LEARN ABOUT THE CAPITAL SYSTEMSM





 Years of Experience with Fund
 Years of Experience with Capital Group
 Years of Experience with Investment Industry



Pramod Atluri

19
1
1



Andrew F. Barth

32
32
7



David J. Betanzos

17
15
1



David A. Hoag

29
26
8



Fergus N. MacDonald

25
14
2



Robert H. Neithart

30
30
8



John H. Smet

35
34
28



A boldface number indicates that years of experience with Capital Group is equal to years of experience with investment industry.














Ratings & Risk




Morningstar Rating TM







Overall Morningstar RatingTM
Funds rated (856)










3-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(856 funds rated)










5-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(767 funds rated)










10-yr. Morningstar RatingTM
(540 funds rated)











Overall Morningstar Risk 


			 Above Average

HIGH
 
 
 
LOW





Category 

					Intermediate-Term Bond
				




ADVANTAGES AND DISADVANTAGES OF MORNINGSTAR RATINGS


 Ratings are based on risk-adjusted returns as of
6/30/2017						(updated monthly).








Lipper Leader Scorecard
	

Read important investment disclosures







Overall
3 yr.
5 yr.
10 yr.


Consistent Return Within Category 
Funds Rated


(422)



(422)



(382)



(287)



Expense Within Category  Funds Rated


(128)



(128)



(124)



(102)



Preservation Within Category Funds Rated



							(5783)



(5783)



(4861)



(3179)



Tax Efficiency Within Category Funds Rated


(427)



(427)



(387)



(292)



Total Return Within Category Funds Rated


(427)



(427)



(387)



(292)





Category
Core Bond Funds







KEY

HIGHEST







LOWEST


 As of 6/30/2017 (updated monthly).







Risk Measures

For the 10 Years ending 6/30/17 (updated monthly). 


Fund

Standard Deviation 

4.35                        


Sharpe Ratio 

0.61                        










                            American Funds/Morningstar Benchmark 
As of 6/30/17 (updated monthly)





                            BBgBarc US Agg Bond TR USD
                        


R-squared 

56                        


Beta 

1.00                        


Capture Ratio (Downside/Upside) 
135/93










Quality Summary
					 
Read important investment disclosures






U.S. Treasuries/Agencies
28.7%


AAA/Aaa
29.7%


AA/Aa
4.2%


A
12.6%


BBB/Baa
16.5%


BB/Ba
2.0%


B
0.5%


CCC & Below
0.1%


Unrated
0.3%


Cash & equivalents
5.4%


% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).



 

Average Life Breakdown
	   





0-4.9 Years
44.5%


5-9.9 Years
40.3%


10-19.9 Years
1.5%


20-29.9 Years
8.1%


30+ Years
0.2%


% of net assets as of 06/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
 





Holdings





Bonds Breakdown 







Bond Details





Total bond holdings








Corporate bonds & notes
+
31.4%


Financials
7.6%


Health Care
5.1%


Energy
4.7%


Utilities
3.4%


Consumer discretionary
3.3%


Consumer staples
1.8%


Information technology
1.4%


Other corporate bonds & notes
1.3%


Industrials
1.1%


Telecommunication services
1%


Materials
0.7%









U.S. government & government agency bonds & notes
28.7%







Mortgage-backed obligations
+
21.9%


Agency
20.3%


Non-Agency
1.1%


Commercial
0.5%









Asset-backed obligations
9%







Non-U.S. government/agency securities
2.4%







Municipal securities
1.2%



% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).










Top Fixed-Income Issuers




U.S. Treasury

28.6%



Fannie Mae

8.3%



Freddie Mac

7.9%



Ginnie Mae

4.0%



Chase Issuance Trust

1.6%

% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).





				QUARTERLY HOLDINGS

HOLDINGS SEARCH












Geographic Breakdown 
		



Regions
					 |
							Currency Weighting  
					|
			
							Top Countries 
				










United States
81.30%


Europe
7.20%


Asia & Pacific Basin
2.40%


Other (Including Canada & Latin America)
3.70%


Cash & equivalents
5.40%



            % of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
        






Non-U.S. Dollar Denominated

2.8%
			


Japanese yen
2.3%


Mexican peso
0.1%


Euros
0.1%


Other currencies
0.3%


U.S. Dollar
97.2%


				Data as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).
			










United States
81.3%


United Kingdom
1.8%


Germany
1.5%


Canada
1.1%


Japan
1.0%

% of net assets as of 6/30/2017 (updated quarterly).












Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2017
			

















2008-2017
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS

CURRENT DAILY DIVIDENDS









2017








RecordDate
CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




Daily
01/31/17
02/01/17
$0.0181691
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.76


Daily
02/28/17
03/01/17
$0.0174214
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.82


Daily
03/31/17
04/03/17
$0.0230002
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.80


Daily
04/28/17
05/01/17
$0.0202585
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.88


Daily
05/31/17
06/01/17
$0.0184525
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.95


Daily
06/30/17
07/03/17
$0.0191101
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$12.92






2017 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.11641176


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.11641176




				 as of 7/21/17
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00174905
07/03/2017


0.00119462
07/05/2017


0.00060210
07/06/2017


0.00067807
07/07/2017


0.00180535
07/10/2017


0.00061957
07/11/2017


0.00059981
07/12/2017


0.00062132
07/13/2017


0.00065259
07/14/2017


0.00183369
07/17/2017


0.00061809
07/18/2017


0.00060668
07/19/2017


0.00063126
07/20/2017


0.00066526
07/21/2017


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date





Daily

01/31/2017
02/01/2017








 






 











						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00174905
07/03/2017


0.00119462
07/05/2017


0.00060210
07/06/2017


0.00067807
07/07/2017


0.00180535
07/10/2017


0.00061957
07/11/2017


0.00059981
07/12/2017


0.00062132
07/13/2017


0.00065259
07/14/2017


0.00183369
07/17/2017


0.00061809
07/18/2017


0.00060668
07/19/2017


0.00063126
07/20/2017


0.00066526
07/21/2017


















Fees & Expenses





Fees
					







Annual Management Fees
0.19%


Other Expenses
0.18%


Service 12b-1
0.24%


As of each fund's most recent prospectus.







Expense Ratio



Fund
	

0.61%


Lipper 		 Core Bond
 Funds Average
	


0.81%			








Resources






			Literature for ABNDX
		




Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet
(PDF) 
05/17




Quarterly Attribution Report
(PDF) 
07/17





		Single Sheet
	
(PDF) 
02/17




Summary Prospectus
(PDF) 
04/17




Prospectus
(PDF) 
04/17




Statement of additional information
(PDF) 
04/17





		Semi-Annual Report
	
(PDF) 
08/16





		Annual Report
	
(PDF) 
02/17




Fund Highlights
(PDF) 
05/17











            About Our Funds
        





Share Class Pricing and Breakpoints 





American Funds Portfolio Resources 





Advisor’s Guide 




Dividend Calendar 
(PDF) 




Stats Update 
(PDF) 




Resource Guide 
(PDF) 













Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns shown at maximum offering price (MOP) for Class A shares reflect payment of the 3.75% maximum sales charge. 
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Funds are managed, so holdings will change.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
The portfolio managers shown are as of the fund's most recent prospectus dated 04/07/2017.
Lipper ratings for Consistent Return reflect funds’ historical risk-adjusted returns at NAV, adjusted for volatility, relative to peers. Lipper ratings for Expense reflect funds’ expense minimization relative to peers with similar load structures. Lipper ratings for Preservation reflect funds’ historical loss avoidance relative to other funds within the same asset class. Preservation ratings are relative, rather than absolute, measures, and funds named Lipper Leaders for Preservation may still experience losses periodically; those losses may be larger for equity and mixed equity funds than for fixed income funds. Lipper ratings for Tax Efficiency reflect funds’ historical success in postponing taxable distributions relative to peers. Tax Efficiency offers no benefit to investors in tax-sheltered accounts such as 401(k) plans. Lipper ratings for Total Return reflect funds’ historical total return performance relative to peers. The Lipper ratings are subject to change every month and are based on an equal-weighted average of percentile ranks for the Total Return, Consistent Return, Preservation, Tax Efficiency and Expense metrics.
  The highest 20% of funds in each classification are named Lipper Leaders for Total Return, the next 20% receive a rating of 4, the middle 20% are rated 3, the next 20% are rated 2, and the lowest 20% are rated 1. Lipper ratings are not intended to predict future results, and Lipper does not guarantee the accuracy of this information. More information is available at www.lipperleaders.com. Lipper Leader © 2017, Thomson Reuters, All Rights Reserved.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The Morningstar Rating™ for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods. Past results are not guarantee of results in future periods. Morningstar Rating is for Class A only; other classes may have different performance characteristics.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
Bond ratings, which typically range from AAA/Aaa (highest) to D (lowest), are assigned by credit rating agencies such as Standard & Poor's, Moody's and/or Fitch, as an indication of an issuer's creditworthiness. If agency ratings differ, the security will be considered to have received the highest 
  of those ratings, consistent with the fund's investment policies. Securities in the Unrated category have not been rated by a rating agency; however, the investment adviser performs its own credit analysis and assigns comparable ratings that are used for compliance with fund investment policies.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Source for Lipper expense ratio comparison: Lipper, based on front-end load funds, excluding funds of funds, for the most recent fiscal year-ends available as of 06/30/2017.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.
The SEC yield reflects the rate at which the fund is earning income on its current portfolio of securities while the distribution rate reflects the fund’s past dividends paid to shareholders. Accordingly, the fund's SEC yield and distribution rate may differ.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Except for Lipper rating information, the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate: Represents the U.S. investment-grade fixed-rate bond market.
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Currency Weighting  Short Breakdown: The fund's exposure to a specific currency before taking into consideration any forward currency contracts that may increase or decrease that currency's exposure.
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Morningstar rating: In an effort to classify funds by what they own, as well as by their prospectus objectives and styles, Morningstar developed Morningstar Categories. While the prospectus objective identifies a fund's investment goals based on the wording in the fund prospectus, the Morningstar Category identifies funds based on their actual investment styles as measured by their underlying portfolio holdings (portfolio and other statistics over the past three years).  
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
	



Read important investment disclosures

This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Bond Fund of America (ABNDX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested



 
Index 
 


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index     















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .











Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate: Represents the U.S. investment-grade fixed-rate bond market.








Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Tuesday, May 28, 1974) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1974), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Bond Fund of America (ABNDX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index
Lipper Core Bond Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns shown at maximum offering price (MOP) for Class A shares reflect payment of the 3.75% maximum sales charge. 
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
This material is intended for use by financial professionals or in conjunction with the advice of a financial professional.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
Investing outside the United States involves risks, such as currency fluctuations, periods of illiquidity and price volatility, as more fully described in the prospectus. These risks may be heightened in connection with investments in developing countries.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate: Represents the U.S. investment-grade fixed-rate bond market.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income
 
Index 
 


Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index






				Standard Deviation as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). Annualized return as of 06/30/2017 (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for ABNDX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.

















































































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft





















Tax-Efficient Solutions | Columbia Threadneedle Investments














Welcome to our website for Financial Advisors. To visit our site for Individual Investors, please use the arrow below to change your selection.








Contact Us
Help








                    Financial Professionals 


Financial Professionals
Individual Investors
Institutional Investors
Global Home








 Toggle navigation
   









Menu




Home


Products





Products
Mutual Funds
529 Plans
Closed-End Funds
Variable Products
Managed Accounts
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs)








Discover products designed to achieve your clients’ goals.
Watch Video







Perspectives





Perspectives
Our Blog
Market Outlook
Contributors







Learn how our culture of innovation fosters thought leaders and new ideas.
Watch Video







Resources





Resources
Fiduciary Insights
Forms & Applications
Investor Goals
Learning Center
Literature
RIA Resource Center
Tax Center






Find resources designed to help you succeed.
Watch Video







About Us





About Us
Leadership
Our Philosophy
Press Center







Meet the people behind the work and get to know Columbia Threadneedle.
Watch Video























Contact Us
Help





Financial Professionals
Individual Investors
Institutional Investors
Global Home












 



Resources
Investor Goals 
Tax Efficiency












Tax Efficiency






















Municipal bonds may help maximize your clients' after-tax returns. Help counteract rising taxes with tax-efficient solutions from Columbia Threadneedle Investments.

Your clients have worked too hard building their wealth to lose it to taxes. And in the current financial climate, what you keep is more important than what you earn. Fortunately municipal bonds can help offset higher taxes while providing attractive yields. Discover ways to maximize your clients’ investment returns while preserving their capital with more tax-efficient* solutions.
Solutions for Tax Efficiency




Columbia Short Term Municipal Bond Fund
Morningstar Category: Muni National Short

Fund Strategy and Benefits
Quarterly Fact Sheet

Strategy
				This fund seeks to minimize the fluctuation of principal with the potential to deliver an attractive level of income through investing in short-term investment-grade municipal securities.
Benefits

Emphasizes stability of net asset value and preservation of capital
Barbell approach limits volatility and provides liquidity while striving to enhance income
Diversifies across a wide range of issuers, sectors and geographical regions




Columbia AMT-Free Intermediate Muni Bond Fund
Morningstar Category: Muni National Interm

Fund Strategy and Benefits
Quarterly Fact Sheet

Strategy
				This fund strives to deliver strong total returns with an emphasis on capital preservation by identifying relative value opportunities and managing risks through independent, fundamental credit research.
Benefits

Focuses on intermediate maturities to offer attractive yields with lower duration than longer maturities
Invests in lower rated, investment-grade municipal bonds for enhanced income
Adds value by actively managing structural components such as maturity, quality, sector and coupon relative to fund’s index






Columbia High Yield Municipal Fund
Morningstar Category: High Yield Muni

Fund Strategy and Benefits
Quarterly Fact Sheet

Strategy
				This fund aims to deliver a high level of income and price appreciation — with an emphasis on risk management — through investments in higher yielding, lower quality securities.
Benefits

Offers above average liquidity in the form of cash and higher quality securities
Disciplined risk-management process sets restrictions on concentration and volatile credit exposure
Less sensitive to interest rate changes than high-quality counterparts





































 Award-Winning Investor Newsletter






Recognized by industry peers as best-in-class for mutual fund marketing and communications,1 our Investor Newsletter features timely economic trends, investment strategies and solutions, and more.
Read the current issue



1The Mutual Fund Education Alliance STAR Awards competition recognizes excellence in mutual fund marketing and communications. Materials were evaluated on educational value, message comprehension, effective design and stated objectives. The Columbia Threadneedle Investor Newsletter won best Retail Electronic Newsletter in the Large Plus Asset Level category in 2011, 2012, 2013 and 2016.
 












































                                    Contact Us
                                













Mutual Funds Marketing Support and Literature
                                RequestsMonday - Thursday, 8
                        a.m. - 7 p.m. ET; Friday 8 a.m. - 6 p.m. ET


                                Financial Institutions
                            

                                800.718.9009
                            



                                Broker/Dealers
                            

                                800.215.5005
                            



                                Registered Investment Advisors
                            

                                866.444.5435
                            



                                Independent Advisors
                            

                                800.446.4008
                            



                                Dealer Services Monday - Friday, 8 a.m. - 7 p.m. ET
                            

                                800.322.2847
                            





                                Service inquiries
                            






                                Product inquiries
                            






                                Sales/Prospecting questions
                            




Shareholder Account ServicesMonday - Friday, 8 a.m. - 7 p.m. ET



                                Shareholder Services
                            

                                800.345.6611
                            



                                Transaction Department
                            

                                800.422.3737
                            



More Contact Options

Help


















 





What Makes Us Exceptional— And Sets Us Apart | The DRL Group




































Skip to main content





















 



Home
Trading Philosophy
Weekly Offerings
Bond Information Looking For Specific Bonds
Bond Analyzer
Dealer's Only

In the Media
Publications Market News Commentary
Blog
DRL Group In The News
Social Media

About Us What Makes Us Exceptional 
Our Team
Clearing Firm

Client Login


 

 


You are hereHomeAbout UsWhat Makes Us Exceptional— And Sets Us Apart 


What Makes Us Exceptional— And Sets Us Apart 

Masters of One. Most financial professionals are “jack-of-all-trades, master of none.” The DRL Group has taken a different approach to financial services. “We are Masters of One”, having spent decades doing one thing well: fixed-income investing. We specialize in the bond market, helping provide fixed-income solutions for our clients. You can expect this singular focus from the DRL Group.
Price-Efficient Trade Execution: Thanks to our state-of-the-art technology, DRL Group clients have access to both the primary and secondary bond markets. This provides you with efficient pricing because we can execute trades on both the buy and sell side of the transaction, which in most cases, could result in higher returns.
Municipal and Corporate Bond Specialists. Our team of professionals is focused on providing fixed-income solutions to produce a stable income stream—and help protect principal value. We create customized bond portfolios to preserve capital and minimize risk, while maximizing client returns in unpredictable market environments.
Tax Free Investment Solutions. Our clients are interested in shielding their investment income from taxes. For investors who want tax-exempt investment solutions, we can purchase at dealer level pricing, with a nominal mark up on attractive tax-free bonds. This results in higher yields for our clientele.
Well Versed with Major Market Fluctuations. With over 35 years of collective industry expertise, we have been through significant ups and downs of the economy and the market. We have extensive experience adapting our clients’ portfolios to ever-changing market conditions. We will do the same for you.
Personalized Process. All clients receive the personal attention they deserve. We take the time to understand each client’s needs based on their tax bracket, age, goals, and financial situation. We continuously analyze and update strategies to meet our clients’ evolving individual objectives for income, growth, and asset protection. And, our clients deal directly with the owners of the firm—not junior advisors or a call center. We know our clients’ time is extremely valuable, so when a client calls, we pick up the phone. You can always expect good, old-fashioned service.
Award Recognition. The DRL Group has been consistently recognized as one of Houston’s Top Wealth Managers. The National Association of Board Certified Advisory Practices (NABCAP) named us among the Top Wealth Managers two years running, and the Houston Business Journal featured us in both 2012 and 2013. We have also been showcased as one of the Best Businesses of Katy, TX, for 2013, 2014, 2015, and 2016. You’ll be taken care of by an award-winning team.
Independent. Since we are not owned by a bank or an insurance company, we sell no proprietary, high commission products. Instead, the financial products we do offer are dependent on what’s in the best interest of our clients. All of our operations are highly regulated. Your investment funds are held at our custodian, National Financial Services, a 100%-owned subsidiary of Fidelity Investments.















 


About Us


What Makes Us Exceptional 
Our Team
Clearing Firm









Sign up for current Industry News & Bond Offerings
  
 







View our Municipal Bond & Corporate Bond Offerings
Complete this form to gain access to our Bond Offerings.
Sign Up 
 

 
 











As Seen on Asset TV

​


Proudly Featured In The Wall Street Journal

​

Experience From An Award-Winning Team
Click Below To Find Out More
 

























​ 
 

  







Securities are offered through Mid Atlantic Capital Corporation (MACC), a registered Broker Dealer, Member FINRA & SIPC. The DRL Group is not registered entity or a subsidiary or control affiliate of SIPC. The DRL Group is not registered entity or a subsidiary or control affiliate of MACC. We currently have individuals licensed to offer securities in the states of: AL, AR, AZ, CA, CO, FL, GA, IL, IN, LA, MA, MD, MI, MS, NC, NJ, NM, NV, NY, OH, OK, PA, TN, TX, UT, VA, WA, WI. This is not an offer to sell securities in any other state or jurisdiction. DRL Group and Mid Atlantic Capital Corporation are not affiliated with Advisorwebsites.com.
Bonds are subject to market and credit risk of the company as well as interest rate risk and may be worth less than the principal amount is sold prior to maturity. Bonds may be subject to AMT, state or local income tax depending on residence. Please consult with your tax advisor. Discount bonds may be subject to capital gains tax. Prices and availability may change at any time without notice. Insured bonds do not cover potential market loss and are subject to the claims paying ability of the insurance company.
Privacy Policy

 

 



© 2017 The DRL Group. All rights reserved. 





















Ask.com - What's Your Question?
















Ask.com



















            
Answers



|

Videos














Eaton Vance municipal bond fund






Web Results



Municipal Bond Fund (EIM) | Eaton Vance Funds

funds.eatonvance.com/municipal-bond-fund-eim.php
The information contained herein is provided for informational purposes only and 
does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell Fund shares.



California Municipal Bond Fund (EVM) | Eaton Vance Funds

funds.eatonvance.com/california-municipal-bond-fund-evm.php
The information contained herein is provided for informational purposes only and 
does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell Fund shares.



EIM 12.64 0.00 0.00% : Eaton Vance Municipal Bond Fund - Yahoo ...

finance.yahoo.com/quote/EIM
View the basic EIM stock chart on Yahoo Finance. Change the date range, chart 
type and compare Eaton Vance Municipal Bond Fund against other companies.




More Results »



What is the definition of a municipal bond fund?





Municipal Bond Fund - Investopedia

www.investopedia.com/terms/m/municipalbondfund.asp
A mutual fund that invests in municipal bonds, or "munis." Municipal bonds are 
debt ... DEFINITION of 'Municipal Bond Fund'. A mutual fund that invests in ...



Municipal bond - Wikipedia

en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Municipal_bond
A municipal bond, commonly known as a Muni Bond, is a bond issued by a local 
government or ... The key defining feature of such bonds is that they are issued 
by a public-use entity at a lower level of government than the sovereign. .... The 
ability to raise such funds is an exercise of the municipal issuer's buying power.



Municipal Bond - Investopedia

www.investopedia.com/terms/m/municipalbond.asp
Municipal bonds are exempt from federal taxes and from most state and local 
taxes, especially if you live in the state in which the bond is ... Municipal Bond 
Fund ...




More Results »



Where can one receive a municipal bond fund?





The Top 5 Municipal Bond Funds for 2016 | Investopedia

www.investopedia.com/articles/investing/010716/top-5-municipal-bond-funds-2016.asp
Jan 7, 2016 ... For individual investors seeking tax-advantaged investment strategies in the fixed 
... Understand how the addition of municipal bond mutual funds can ... The 
interest received on a municipal bond is generally exempt from federal tax, ... Tax
-Exempt Fund has an inception date of 1977, making it one of the ...



How do Municipal Bonds Work? Learn the Basics

www.municipalbonds.com/education/the-basics-of-municipal-bonds
Jun 24, 2015 ... Investing in municipal bonds can be a great way for investors to preserve ... of 
muni that are repaid using the revenues from the projects the bonds helped fund. 
.... to determine if the municipal bond path is the right one for you. ... Subscribe to 
receive FREE updates, insights and more, straight to your inbox.



What's the Difference Between a Muni Bond Fund and a Muni Bond ...

neighborly.com/learn/muni-bond-funds-vs-municipal-bonds
May 26, 2016 ... You might think that because a muni bond fund is a collection of individual muni 
... But from an investment perspective, bond funds can react very .... to get a 
sense of what returns investors in that fund have been receiving, but ...




More Results »



Eaton Vance municipal bond fund







1


2


3


4


5


Next










Related Search



Eaton Vance Mutual Funds




Eaton Vance Corporation




                                Pimco Total Return Fund




                                Growth Fund of America




                                Fidelity Funds




                                Templeton Funds




                                Oppenheimer Funds




                                Morningstar




                                American Funds




                                Vanguard




                                Yahoo Finance




                                Loomis Sayles



















About


Privacy


Terms


Careers


Help


Feedback


Sitemap


© 2017 IAC Publishing, LLC


















Why Choose FMSbonds, Inc.? | FMSbonds.com      
HomeBond OfferingsMuni Market YieldsMunicipal Bond ForumNews and PerspectivesAnalyze Your Municipal BondsWhy Choose FMSbonds, Inc.?About Us



×
How to buy bondsLoginContactHomeInvestment BankingValue for muni investors
Call: 1-800-FMS-BOND
1-800-367-2663
Skip to contentBond OfferingsMuni Market YieldsMuni InsightMuni Bond ForumMuni News and PerspectivesAnalyze Your BondsWhy Choose FMSbonds, Inc.?About UsAbout FMSbondsTestimonials


Menu
Call: 1-800-FMS-BOND
(1-800-367-2663)

Home Why Choose FMSbonds, Inc.?Why Choose FMSbonds, Inc.?
We’re specialistsFMSbonds, Inc. specializes in tax-free municipal bonds. That’s all we do.Since our founding in 1978, we have served individual investors, providing exceptional value and insight in the municipal bond market.Unlike the mega firms whose brokers sell stocks and a variety of other securities, our specialists aren’t distracted by other investments. We understand the role of munis in investors’ portfolios and can offer an unmatched level of insight into the municipal bond market.We own the bonds we sellMost online companies that sell bonds today do not own the bonds they sell. Instead, they display the compiled offerings of many different bond firms and many of their offerings may not be suitable for every individual investor. If you ask them about their bonds, they likely lack the insight to help you.As a genuine municipal bond specialist firm, we own the inventory we sell. Our trading desk finds value in the tax-free bond market and secures bonds that make sense for our clients. Our highly trained specialists understand the distinctive nature of our offerings and are able to convey their unique attributes.At FMSbonds, Inc., clients are empowered to invest easily, knowledgeably and with peace of mind.You get insight, not just informationThrough our Muni News and Perspectives, we provide investors with original commentary and analysis of the bond market. In addition, we offer a Muni Bond Forum, where we answer questions and respond to comments submitted by investors.No one offers a similar level of expertise and service for the individual investor.You’ll know more about your bondsEvery so often, the status and description of your municipal bonds can change. Our patented Muni-TracTM system gathers all the pertinent information about your bonds in one organized, easy-to-read report.Visit our Analyze Your Bonds page and get a deeper understanding of the bond market and your own portfolio.It’s easyOnline, we offer investors sophisticated yet easy-to-navigate interactive investing opportunities, including access to a live inventory of tax-free bonds available for real-time pricing and trading.On the telephone, or for investors who wish to visit one of our offices, our experienced, highly trained specialists will help find the munis uniquely suited to you.You’re coveredAll accounts at FMSbonds are insured up to $25 million. The firm is a member of FINRA and SIPC. Explanatory brochures are available upon request or at www.sipc.org.








Looking for Specific Bonds?Do you have specific criteria for bonds you're looking for? Let us know and we'll e-mail you bonds that fit your needs. There is no charge for this service.
Yes, please send me customized offeringsYes, please send me bond strategies and commentaries.

Select Your Preferred StateNo PreferenceAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming
Minimum RatingNo PreferenceAaa/AAAA/ABaa/BBBBa/BBNR/NR
Subject to AMTYesNo 

     

	Muni Bond Landing Page- VanEck


































































  






   Corporate Home 






 VanEck 


Home  
Choose Your ETF 
About Us 


 Menu

























  


Targeted Exposures | Tax-Exempt Income | Low Cost 


 Print   


   






VanEck's suite of municipal income ETFs offers investors the ability to exercise control over their portfolio yield, duration, and credit exposure at different points in the interest rate cycle. The indices underlying each ETF target specific maturity ranges or credit exposures, resulting in distinct performance, yield, and duration characteristics.





Yield Curve-Focused ETFs


SMB  AMT- Free Short Municipal Index ETF 

ITMS  AMT-Free 6-8 Year Municipal Index ETF 

ITM  AMT-Free Intermediate Municipal Index ETF 

ITML  AMT-Free 12-17 Year Municipal Index ETF 

MLN  AMT-Free Long Municipal Index ETF   

Credit-Focused ETFs


PRB  Pre-Refunded Municipal Index ETF 

SHYD  Short High-Yield Municipal Index ETF 

HYD  High-Yield Municipal Index ETF   

Smart Beta ETF


XMPT  CEF Municipal Income ETF     

Source: VanEck Research. As of 06/30/17. The performance data quoted represents past performance. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment returns and principal value of an investment will fluctuate. An investor’s shares, when redeemed, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Current performance may be lower or higher than the performance data quoted. Index performance is not illustrative of fund performance. Effective Duration measures a bond's sensitivity to interest rate changes that reflects the change in a bond's price given a change in yield. This duration measure is appropriate for bonds with embedded options. Yield to Worst measures the lowest of either yield-to-maturity or yield-to-call date on every possible call date. 

Click here for Fund standardized performance.     


 
Yield Curve-Focused ETFs
 Our investment grade municipal ETF product offerings seek to track indices that reflect a unique segmentation of the investment grade municipal yield curve: short (years 1-6: SMB), intermediate (years 6-8: ITMS) (years 6-17: ITM) (years 12-17: ITML), and long (years 17-30+: MLN). 

 
Credit-Focused ETFs
Our credit-focused municipal ETF product offerings seek to track indices that include both the highest credit quality available in the municipal asset class (pre-refunded: PRB) and municipal high yield: short (years 1-12: SHYD) and all maturity (years 1-30+: HYD). The high yield indices include an investment grade component to help enhance liquidity.  


 
Smart Beta ETF
Our smart beta municipal ETF (XMPT) seeks to track an index that includes municipal closed-end funds (CEFs). Because CEFs have a fixed number of shares, discrepancies between NAVs and share prices can be common and generally result from changing investor sentiment. When such a fund's share price is lower than its net asset value (NAV) it's called "being at a discount." When its share price is higher than its NAV it's called "being at a premium."
This index has intelligently designed weighting rules that underweight CEFs trading at higher premiums and overweight CEFs trading at wider discounts. This built-in "buy low, sell high" mechanism is one way investors can potentially benefit from investing in the municipal CEF market.  


 
ETFs Provide Low Cost Access to Munis
The fees of an investment vehicle are important; they affect an investor's ultimate return. The average net expense ratio of municipal bond ETFs was 63 bps lower as compared to municipal bond mutual funds and 77 bps lower as compared to municipal bond closed-end funds. Many investors may prefer municipal bond ETFs for this reason.

 

Source: Morningstar. As of 06/30/17. Fees for municipal bond ETFs compared against the average net expense ratio of mutual funds and closed-end funds in the Morningstar Municipal Bond U.S. Category Group. There were 37 funds in the Muni ETF Category, 1,879 funds in the Muni Mutual Fund Category, 167 funds in the Muni Closed-End Fund Category.     




Talk to a Muni Specialist
Set up a time to speak to a municipal bond ETF specialist who can answer any questions you may have.

Schedule a One-on-One Call 
 
Learn About ITMS and ITML

ITMS Fund Page »

ITML Fund Page » 
 
Subscribe to Blog Updates
Receive Muni Nation in your inbox automatically.

Register Now 



VanEck Resources





 ITMS ITML Presentation    


 Muni Suite  


 Muni Investment Case  


 Muni Investment Process    


 NAIC Designations    


 Muni Fund Monitor  


 Yield Monitor  


 SHYD Investment Idea  


 XMPT Investment Case  


 XMPT Investment Idea    
 
  



  






Important Disclosure
Municipal bonds are subject to risks including those related to litigation, legislation, political changes, local business or economic conditions, conditions in underlying sectors, bankruptcy or other changes in the financial condition of the issuer, and/or the discontinuance of the taxation supporting the project or assets, or the inability to collect revenues for the project or from the assets. Additional risks include: credit risk, interest rate risk, and call risk. High yield bonds may be subject to a greater risk of loss of income and principal, and are likely to be more sensitive to adverse economic changes than higher rated securities. Some portion of Fund distributions may be subject to the Alternative Minimum Tax (AMT).
Taxable equivalent yields are used by investors to compare yields on taxable and tax-exempt securities after accounting for federal income taxes. TEY represents the yield a taxable bond investment would have to earn in order to match, after deducting federal income taxes, the yield available on a tax-exempt municipal bond investment. TEY = Tax-Free Municipal Bond Yield/(1 -Tax Rate).
The investment management agreement between VanEck Vectors ETF Trust (the "Trust") and Van Eck Associates Corporation (the "Adviser") provides that the Adviser will pay all expenses of the Fund, except for the fee payment under the investment management agreement, interest expense, offering costs, trading expenses, taxes and extraordinary expenses. TER, or Total Expense Ratio, is also referred to as "Net Expense Ratio. Expenses for XMPT are capped contractually at 0.40% until 09/01/17. Cap excludes certain expenses, such as interest.
The market for municipal bonds may be less liquid than for taxable bonds. Income from corporate bonds is subject to state and Federal tax. There is no guarantee that a Fund's income will be exempt from federal or state income taxes. Federal or state changes in income or alternative minimum tax rates or in the tax treatment of municipal bonds may make them less attractive as investments and cause them to lose value. Capital gains, if any, are subject to capital gains tax. Please refer to the Funds' 
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                            
                            prospectus for complete risk information.
The "Net Asset Value" (NAV) of a VanEck Vectors exchange-traded fund (ETF) is determined at the close of each business day, and represents the dollar value of one share of the fund; it is calculated by taking the total assets of the fund, subtracting total liabilities, and dividing by the total number of shares outstanding. The NAV is not necessarily the same as the ETF's intraday trading value. VanEck Vectors ETF investors should not expect to buy or sell shares at NAV.
Fund shares are not individually redeemable and will be issued and redeemed at their NAV only through certain authorized broker-dealers in large, specified blocks of shares called "creation units" and otherwise can be bought and sold only through exchange trading. Creation units are issued and redeemed principally in kind. Shares may trade at a premium or discount to their NAV in the secondary market.
Investing involves substantial risk, including possible loss of principal. Bonds and bond funds will decrease in value as interest rates rise. Consider a Fund's investment objective, risks, charges and expenses before investing. To obtain a prospectus and summary prospectus, call 800.826.2333 or visit vaneck.com. Read carefully before investing. 
 
            Van Eck Securities Corporation, Distributor, 666 Third Avenue, New York, NY 10017
            
     

 
 


















Contact Details
Corporate Home Offices
(212) 293-2000  
 666 Third Avenue 
          New York, NY 10017 


Follow Us
 LinkedIn  
 Twitter  
 YouTube  






 ©  VanEck. VanEck®, VanEck Vectors®, VanEck Access the opportunities™, and the VanEck design™ are trademarks of Van Eck Associates Corp.  


  



















&amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;lt;p&amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;lt;img alt="Clicky" width="1" height="1" src="//in.getclicky.com/100816796ns.gif" /&amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;lt;/p&amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;gt;

























































×













	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads







































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































